CSO 

<F P=106> [Foreword, Table of Contents and Contents of review </F>
Rossiyskiye Finansy V 1993 Godu (Russian Finances in 
1993) by B. G. Fedorov, Russian Federation Ministry of 
Finance, Moscow, January 1994] 
  [Text] 
<H5>  Foreword </H5>
  Dear Readers: 
  The review, "Russian Finances in 1993," is basically a first 
attempt at an integrated analysis of the state of Russia's 
financial policy and the past year's results from the standpoint 
of principles generally accepted throughout the civilized world. 
The review provides a great deal of data not published 
previously in our economic literature. 
  The review's main task is to tell the truth about Russia's 
financial policy in 1993, which was carried out consistently 
despite the opposition of the Supreme Soviet and a large part of 
the government. The new market-oriented financial policy went 
through and was adequately effective, although it could not 
solve all the problems against the background of the failures in 
the industrial and agrarian policies, which the reformers were 
unable to influence to an adequate extent. 
  The review is a unique Minfin [Ministry of Finance] report 
on 
the work performed and a response to criticism which was 
frequently unprofessional and incorrect. The arguments in 
defense of the chosen position are given in it, the necessary 
stresses are placed and conclusions are drawn about the reasons 
for the successes and the failures. Those problems which must be 
solved in 1994, in the event the chosen path continues to be 
followed, are defined at the end of each section. The Ministry 
of Finance's predictions about the development of the economic 
situation in the country in 1994 are given at the end of the 
review. 
  The most important conclusions are the following: 
  1) Over the course of 1993, the anti-inflation orientation 
of 
Russia's financial policy was maintained successfully on the 
whole and a substantial step forward was taken. At the same 
time, the most elementary analysis shows that there was not even 
a trace of any kind of "shock therapy." 
  2) Almost all the radical decisions have already been made 
and all that remained was to pursue the set policy calmly and 
consistently, to develop its set of tools and to construct the 
market institutes and mechanisms. 
  3) A market economy exists in Russia and it can be regulated 
by market methods, i.e., by cash or monetary methods. There is 
no real alternative to the policy pursued and there cannot be 
one. 
  4) The results would have been much more ponderable if the 
government and the TsB [Central Bank] had supported and carried 
out the announced financial and economic policies to the fullest 
extent. The Ministry of Finance alone cannot rebuild the entire 
country. 
  5) The change outlined in January of 1994 in the economic 
policy (shifting to mythical non-monetary methods, raising 
production through emission and abandoning basic financial 
discipline) is doomed to failure. The situation in the economy 
will inevitably worsen. It is impossible to regulate a market 
economy using state planning methods. 
  6) Any deviation may be only momentary and politically 
motivated. It is no longer possible to make a cardinal change in 
the course of the development of Russia's economy peacefully. 
However, the people will pay for the recoil out of their own 
pockets. The "Red Economic Managers" are again plunging the 
country into the abyss of withering disorganization and 
incompetence. 
  The review has been constructed primarily on the Russian 
Ministry of Finance's data, drawing on the materials of 
Goskomstat [State Committee for Statistics], the Central Bank, 
the Ministry of Finance's Macroeconomics and Finances Group, 
Gosnalogsluzhba [State Tax Service], the Department of Tax 
Investigation and other governmental organs. Given in the 
appendices are the most important documents of the government's 
economic policy, memoranda to the government, document drafts, 
articles and Ministry of Finance press releases, which give an 
idea about the evolution of the views and approaches and the 
struggle for the reforms. 
  The review has been prepared in record time -- 2 weeks -- 
and 
this is why it inevitably contains deficiencies and errors. It 
is possible that individual aspects of Ministry of Finance 
activities have been left untouched and certain statistical data 
have not been published. The compressed preparation time was 
caused by objective reasons -- the change in the economic policy 
has already become a real threat. I hope that such reviews will 
become a tradition of the Russian Ministry of Finance and their 
quality will improve from year to year. 
  All of the Ministry of Finance's main departments and dozens 
of its staff members, as well as workers of my secretariat, as 
Deputy Chairman of the Russian Government, participated in the 
review's preparation. 
  I hope that this work will make its own contribution to the 
matter of the reforming of the Russian economy, which has as its 
sole purpose the improvement of the lives of the people through 
greater efficiency and rationality. 
  The victory of our approaches is inevitable! It is a matter 
of time. 
  [Signed] B.G. Fedorov, 22 January 1994. 
<H5>  Key Measures in the Realization of the Financial Policy in </H5>
1993 
  1. The liberalization of coal prices. 
  2. The liberalization of grain prices. 
  3. The liberalization of bread prices. 
  4. The abolition of subsidized credits. 
  5. The abolition of import subsidies. 
  6. The consolidation in the budget of all of the state's 
foreign economic operations, credits to CIS [Commonwealth of 
Independent States] countries and credits to enterprises. 
  7. The raising of interest rates. 
  8. The abolition of the compulsory sale of a portion of 
currency earnings through the Central Bank. 
  9. The admittance of non-residents to the currency market. 
  10. The lowering of export duties. 
  11. The reduction in export quotas. 
  12. The sharp reduction in centralized importing. 
  13. The ban on the circulation of cash currency. 
  14. The abandonment of conducting mutual crediting. 
  15. The abandonment of indexing working capital. 
  16. The imposition of quarterly limits on the increase in 
Central Bank credits. 
  17. The abolition of technical credits to the CIS countries 
and the sharp reduction in the overall amount of credit extended. 
  18. The reduction in the sphere of the circulation of the 
Russian ruble outside Russia. 
  19. The expansion of the issuance of state securities. 
  20. The preparations for the compulsory conversion of 
enterprises' mutual debts into promissory notes. 
  21. The sharp reduction in the use of foreign credits for 
funding the budget deficit. 
  22. The prevention of the unification of the monetary 
systems 
of Russia and a number of CIS countries. 
<H5>  The Basic Achievements of 1993 </H5>
  1. The stabilization of the ruble's exchange rate. 
  2. The containment of the budget deficit within the limits 
of 
10 percent of the VVP [GDP -- Gross Domestic Product]. 
  3. Some lowering of inflation. 
  4. The convergence of domestic and world prices. 
  5. The increase in the public's real incomes and average 
wages in terms of dollars. 
<H5>  The Failures of 1993 </H5>
  1. The government's lack of financial discipline and the 
abandonment of spending reduction. 
  2. The government's lack of agrarian and industrial policies 
which meet the demands of the times. 
  3. The weak control over the budget system's revenues and 
the 
use of a substantial share of the gold and currency reserves for 
funding current expenditures. 
  4. The budget's transformation from an instrument of 
economic 
policy into a means for solving immediate problems. 
  "Emission is opium for the national economy." -- G.Ya. 
Sokolnikov. 
<H5>  1. Basic Directions of the Financial and Economic Policies </H5>
<H5>  1.1. The Political and Economic Calendar </H5>
  The confirmation of V. Chernomyrdin as prime minister on 14 
December 1992 had been originally interpreted as a change in the 
economic policy, although the make-up of the government had 
changed little. The first actions -- the demand for additional 
credits for the TEK [Fuel and Energy Complex] and the adoption 
of a decree on the regulation of prices through profitability, 
confirmed this. However, the president and the government 
managed to restrain the pressure and to correct the situation 
and, in 1993, nearly all the government's official documents, 
especially program ones, were aimed at financial stabilization 
and continuation of the economic reforms. 
  The financial policy in 1993 can be divided into 5 stages: 
  -- the first is January-March; 
  -- the second is April-the beginning of July; 
  -- the third is July-September; 
  -- the fourth is September-12 December; 
  -- and the fifth is the end of December. 
  Distinguishing the stages has been associated with the 
political situation and the financial policy in each stage 
depended on one event or another. 
  The First Stage (January-March). This period can 
be conditionally characterized as the period of start of the new 
government's involvement in the matter, analysis of the 
situation and regrouping of forces. The decree on prices was 
abolished in point of fact; regular meetings of the Commission 
on Credit Policy began; the basic directions of the financial 
and economic policies for 1993 were officially adopted; many 
decisions were prepared, which were later adopted over the 
course of the year; and pressure began to be put on the Central 
Bank in order to force it to adhere to the anti-inflation policy. 
  Simultaneously, attempts were made to set up a constructive 
dialog with the opposition. The government participated in a 
"round table" and met with the Supreme Soviet's factions. The 
political background of the first stage was the decision of the 
7th Congress of People's Deputies on holding an All-Russian 
referendum on the new constitution's basic provisions and this 
decision's revocation by the 8th Congress on 13 March. 
  The first period's main result was a better 
understanding of the situation, the determination of priorities, 
the assessment of 1992's errors and the expansion of cooperation 
with international organizations and the "Big Seven." 
  The Second Stage. The arbitrary start of this 
stage is 20 March, the president's famous declaration, the 
announcement of the April referendum, and the intensification of 
the struggle with the Supreme Soviet. At this time, a turning 
point arrived, the Central Bank yielded to the pressure from the 
government and began to raise interest rates, the Ministry of 
Finance received the right to abolish import subsidies, for the 
first time, a quarterly limit on the centralized extension of 
credit was approved and the liberalization of coal prices was 
begun. On 20 April 1993, with the aid of a Supreme Soviet 
decision, the granting of technical credits to CIS countries was 
successfully stopped, something for which the Ministry of 
Finance had been fighting with the Central Bank since the 
beginning of the year. The stabilization of the currency 
exchange rate began. 
  The most important event during this period was the signing 
of a joint declaration on economic policy by the government and 
the Central Bank, which opened up the path to obtaining the 
first part of the MVF [IMF -- International Monetary Fund] 
system credit at the beginning of July, on the eve of the summit 
in Tokyo. The limits were maintained, the budget deficit was 
substantially restrained and, during this period, a real 
lowering of inflation began. At the beginning of June, the 
president's key edict on the rejection of new spending decisions 
in the second half of the year and the deferment of a number of 
budget payments was successfully issued. Unfortunately, it was 
not fulfilled, but it was extremely important. 
  At the same time, the government was unable to use the 
referendum's positive results to the fullest extent and the 
internal conflicts within the government intensified. On 
the whole, the second stage can be characterized as forward 
movement, although, by its end, the opposition forces had 
noticeably consolidated their forces, gambling on the events in 
May in Moscow. 
  The Third Stage actually began right after the 
summit meeting at the beginning of July in Tokyo and can be 
characterized as the stage of the recoil's beginning. During 
this period, taking into account the lack of practical steps for 
accelerating the reforms after the referendum, certain forces in 
the government, assisted by the Central Bank, launched a 
concentrated attack on the financial stabilization policy. The 
basic elements of this attack were: 
  -- the exceeding of the established limits on the 
centralized 
extension of credit; 
  -- the adoption of excessive purchase prices for grain, 
which 
deliberately wrecked the federal budget; 
  -- the Central Bank's unexpected conducting of a money 
exchange and then the continuous pressure with a view toward the 
rapid creation of a so-called ruble zone. 
  As a result, the inflation indicators soared again 
(especially in August because of the money exchange) and it had 
already become clear in August that the credit limits for the 
third quarter were being violated (an increase of 60 percent 
instead of 30 percent), even taking into account the use of the 
$1.5 billion received from the IMF. An appropriate letter was 
sent to the IMF and the hopes of obtaining the second part of 
the system credit in 1993 disappeared. 
  Since the end of August, the Ministry of Finance has 
persistently proposed sets of stabilization proposals which have 
basically included measures for reducing expenditures and 
increasing revenues. The government has repeatedly considered 
these proposals, but they were not adopted to the fullest extent 
in 1993. An increase in the pace of the reforms was not 
obtained. 
  This stage was characterized by an increase in tension in 
relations with the Supreme Soviet, which attempted to force the 
government to execute a budget with a many times larger deficit. 
The government used the presidential veto method in order to 
avoid fulfilling the Supreme Soviet's demand and falling into 
hyperinflation. 
  The Fourth Stage began with the issuing of 
Presidential Edict No 1400 of 21 September 1993 and the Supreme 
Soviet's dissolution. This made it possible, for a time, to 
change the course of events, in particular, to go on to the 
abolition of subsidized credits, to decide to liberalize the 
prices for grain and bread, to force the Central Bank to raise 
its rates, to lower the export customs duties and to reduce the 
export quotas. The president issued an edict on the budget for 
the fourth quarter, which made it possible to intensify the 
struggle against inflation. On 5 November, the prime minister 
signed a declaration on the economic policy at the end of 1993 
and in 1994, which could become the basis for accelerating the 
reforms. 
  However, the polarization within the government gradually 
intensified and the conflicts began to increase again. Instead 
of decentralizing the decision-making process, the prime 
minister attempted to concentrate in his own hands full control 
over the Commission on Credit Policy and other important 
directions. To some extent, this contributed to financial 
stabilization, since the approval of decisions was being dragged 
out for weeks and credits were not being granted. This stage's 
political background was the confrontation with the Supreme 
Soviet up to the events of 3-4 October and then the preparations 
for the elections. 
  The Fifth Stage was the period after 12 December 
1993. The election results were used by some as a signal for a 
shift in the financial and economic policies. Many of those who 
had sworn to be faithful to the course of the reforms began 
talking about the need for a greater social orientation and a 
change in priorities, making statements like "more therapy and 
less shock." As a result, almost nothing occurred during this 
period, although the desire to dip into the Central Bank's 
profits intensified and the consultations on the new make-up of 
the government began. 
  This shift in no way ensued from the year's actual economic 
results. And even the election results themselves were by far 
not as bad as some are trying to make them out, since the number 
of supporters of sensible financial and economic policies 
increased in comparison with the former Supreme Soviet. 
  The lack of a normally functioning parliament over the 
course 
of several months demonstrated the need for a counterweight to 
executive power -- dozens of new spending decisions poured out, 
including for the support of the apparat and unfounded and 
uncontrolled expenditures for purposes of no importance for the 
country. Unfortunately, the start of the Duma's work is still 
not inspiring optimism for the future. 
<H5>  1.2. The Ministry of Finance's Position </H5>
  The Russian Ministry of Finance, over the course of 1993, 
tried to pursue moderate financial and economic policies aimed 
at a relative reduction of the budget deficit, a tightening up 
of the monetary policy and corresponding measures in the 
currency sphere in order to reduce inflation. A concept was 
adopted, according to which: 
  -- under the conditions of high inflation, real investments 
and savings are impossible, the shortage of working capital and 
the non-payments will not disappear and a rise in production is 
impossible; 
  -- and, under the existing political conditions, it is 
impossible to achieve a radically rapid lowering of inflation, 
i.e., the tactics of progressive movement have been selected, 
especially since the market infrastructure has still not taken 
its final shape. 
  As is obvious, no kind of "shock" was envisioned. 
  A premise was adopted within the framework of this concept 
about the intolerability of mutual crediting and the 
replenishing of working capital through emission, since, in 
addition to the inflationary effect, this will slow down the 
structural reorganization and take away from the enterprises the 
incentives for increasing labor productivity and efficiency as a 
whole. An achievement of 1993 is the fact that we managed to 
avoid the crediting and indexing of working capital, although 
the Central Bank constantly pushed this idea and tried to 
persuade the government. 
<H5>  1.3. Several Myths </H5>
  Over the course of all of 1993, the greatest disputes were 
caused by the following questions which have been transformed 
into distinctive myths: 
  -- what is first, financial stabilization or a rise in 
production? 
  -- what is the nature of inflation in Russia? 
  -- and should there be more or less social orientation? 
  At the same time, the policy pursued by the government was 
declared to be monetaristic, a policy of shock therapy and so on. 
  The majority of the indicated myths are based on the 
opponents' lack of understanding of the basic ABC's of a market 
economy. A typical example of this ignorance is: prices in 1992 
increased by a factor of 26, while the M3 money supply increased 
by a factor of 10 and this means that there is not enough money 
in the economy. 
  The first myth springs from a basic principle of 
socialism -- the primacy of production over the sphere of 
services and turnover, which were declared to be secondary. This 
ordinary kind of logic says that, first, it is necessary to 
"raise" production and to produce goods and inflation itself 
will disappear. Any restriction of the deficit and credit is 
perceived as anti-production and even one which leads to an 
increase in inflation (for example, an increase in interest 
rates leads to an increase in prices). Such delusions are 
encountered in the West also and, in the twenties, People's 
Commissar of Finance G. Sokolnikov, surrounded by "Red Economic 
Managers," struggled with them. 
  The "supporters" of a rise in production always forget to 
say 
how they intend to raise it. Money and credits are needed for 
this and they can be obtained quickly only through an increase 
in the deficit and through emission, which will increase 
inflation and devalue investments and working capital, which 
will have to be replenished anew through emission and so on ad 
infinitum. The references to Keynes, Erhard and Japan are 
ignorant. No sensible person anywhere has recommended the 
stimulation of production through emission. In Germany and Japan 
after the war the budget deficits were not funded through 
emission. 
  The second myth consists of the incantation-like 
repetition by the executives of the Central Bank and others of 
the thesis that inflation in Russia is of a non-monetary, 
consumptive nature, which is associated with the high degree of 
monopolization of the economy and the absence of competition. 
The so-called "cost-push" inflation is set off against the 
"demand-pull" inflation (the inflation of the costs of 
production against the inflation of demand). 
  Actually, inflation does not have a single solitary cause 
and 
monopolism makes it possible to increase prices groundlessly. 
However, in our instance, it is evident that: 
  -- the degree of monopolization of the economy is rapidly 
diminishing; 
  -- competition is developing rapidly, including through 
importing; 
  -- and there is a proven direct connection between the size 
of the money supply and the rate of price increases. 
  It may be said with good reason that, in 1993, monetary 
factors made up something on the order of 70-75 percent of the 
inflation, while the remainder was made up of the expenditure 
mechanism, the currency exchange rate and other factors. The 
enterprises' behavior is becoming more and more market-oriented 
and they are beginning to draw closer to reducing expenses and 
increasing labor productivity as they understand that there will 
no longer be any free handouts from the state. 
  The third myth is associated with the allegations 
that the policy being pursued is shock therapy and a 
monetaristic experiment and does not have a social orientation. 
This also does not correspond to reality. 
  First, on the basis of any kind of criteria, it is 
impossible 
to regard as shock therapy a policy under which a budget deficit 
amounting to 10 percent of the GDP is being funded through 
emission, inflation over the year amounted to 900 percent, the 
public's monetary incomes and the average wages in all sectors 
increased faster than prices did, unemployment remained at the 
level of 1 percent, there are no bankruptcies and enterprise 
closings and the consumption of all types of foodstuffs and many 
consumer goods has increased. 
  Second, for the same reasons, the accusation of a harsh 
monetaristic policy is unfounded. The critics, in an absolute 
majority of instances, do not have the slightest understanding 
of monetarism as a theory and do not understand that, given the 
lack of desire on the part of the Central Bank and the lack of 
the basic instruments of a monetary policy, a real monetaristic 
policy is simply impossible. 
  We are at the stage where the broad variables of the economy 
are being brought into line with common sense. In order to do 
this, it is necessary: 
  -- to reduce the budget deficit and to fund it by civilized 
means; 
  -- to change the budget's structure, decreasing in it the 
share of inefficient subsidies; 
  -- to reduce centralized credit, converting it into normal 
refinancing, in favor of normal bank credit; 
  -- and to bring interest rates into line with inflation, 
thereby establishing a basis for savings and investments and so 
on. 
  At the same time, we are talking about eliminating to the 
maximum extent the factors which distort the effect of market 
forces and lower the effectiveness of state funding and monetary 
regulation: 
  -- the mass subsidizing of credits; import subsidies; the 
withdrawal from the budget of enormous sums in the form of 
non-budget-controlled funds, credits and subsidies; and tax 
breaks, currency benefits and foreign economic benefits; 
  -- the flight of capital; dollarization [the use of 
dollars]; 
and the gratis distribution of credits and cash in the ruble 
zone and the covert subsidizing of foreign states through prices; 
  -- and tax evasion and other items. 
  All this is necessary in order to convert the currency 
exchange rate, the interest rates, taxes and the budget into 
real economic regulators. Only after these tasks are carried out 
will it be possible to talk about the development of an actually 
refined monetaristic policy or some other monetary policy, when 
the struggle proceeds with the restriction of all credit and not 
just centralized credit. 
  The fourth myth is about the construction of a 
socially-oriented market economy. Based on the number of 
different socially oriented measures, Russia probably surpasses 
all the other countries of the world by several factors. There 
are the continuous indexing above the inflation level and the 
dozens of grants, benefits and subsidies. The problem is that 
the majority of these subsidies and benefits do not have a 
clearly identified recipient and are being distributed to 
millionaires and the really indigent alike. The benefits have 
been and are being given out irrespective of actual means and 
without consideration of available financial and other 
resources. If all the people were to attempt to come and to get 
all the benefits which exist on paper, then we would need two 
more budgets. 
  A significant portion of health care and education and a 
number of other areas, which had not been reformed even after 
the start of the reforms, are leftovers from the old system, 
which are attempting to survive under the new conditions. This 
means extremely low efficiency, inflated staffs, low quality and 
a lack of incentives. This is precisely why alternative 
educational and medical systems on a private and paid basis are 
spreading so swiftly. 
  This is why we should not talk about a mythical social 
orientation, but rather about a radical reform of social 
security, health care, education, increasing the specific 
tailoring of state assistance, public works, the support of 
small business, programs for retraining specialists and many 
other items. 
  The policy of financial stabilization and the policy of 
economic reforms have as the final goal only one thing -- 
raising the standard of living and the quality of life through 
production efficiency and maximum rationality in the 
distribution of financial and other resources. This is why any 
attempts to oppose financial stabilization and social protection 
are ignorant and shortsighted. 
<H5>  1.4. The Political Opposition </H5>
  The large problems of Russia's financial and economic 
policies in 1993 were associated with the complete lack of unity 
and basic financial discipline in the executive power, 
especially considering the continuous confrontation with the 
representative power. The pre-election struggle at year's end 
confirmed that the government, from the very start, was a 
coalition, uniting within itself people with diametrically 
opposed views, giving rise to constant conflicts. It is clear 
that achieving large results in this situation is complicated. 
  The undermining of the financial stabilization policy is 
directly associated with the continuous unfulfilled promises of 
the representative and executive powers. The Supreme Soviet 
continuously adopted deliberately impractical laws in the race 
for popularity in the eyes of the voters, wanting to annoy the 
government and the president as much as possible. It is 
staggering but, for example, the laws on grain, on social 
guarantees to the military personnel and on assistance to the 
northerners did not have the basic preliminary calculations and 
their full-scale implementation would have been a catastrophe 
for the country. 
  The executive power did not lag behind the Supreme Soviet. 
In 
1993, hundreds of spending decisions were made, for which no 
provision had been made in the budget. The referendum and the 
elections and any strike or threat of a strike gave rise to 
additional spending decisions. The attempt to freeze fuel prices 
before the referendum, the numerous gifts to students and 
academicians and the dozens of decrees on assistance to regions 
-- all these things were done through emission and they whipped 
up inflation. In the Supreme Soviet, they adopted the relay race 
of irresponsible indexing of wages, without having the means for 
this (for example, by a factor of 1.9 in December). The most 
important task of 1994 is to learn to live within our means. 
<H5>  1.5. Economic Resistance </H5>
  Finally, it is necessary to talk about the mutual relations 
between the Ministry of Finance and the Central Bank. Our 
Central Bank is a unique phenomenon in world practice, since, 
even despite the clear wording in the constitution and the laws, 
it resists the fulfillment of its own responsibilities in the 
struggle against inflation and adheres to the ideology of the 
"Red Economic Managers" and this is why it basically does not 
want to fulfill the functions of a real Central Bank. 
  Over the course of the year, the Ministry of Finance had to 
resort many times to the methods of public pressure on the 
Central Bank in order to force it to pursue a reasonable policy. 
On the whole, this was successful, especially when political 
factors helped, but this occurred with resistance, delay and 
provocations, although a mutual understanding did occur, as a 
rule, on the specialists' level. Without a solution to the 
problem of the Central Bank in 1994, it will be impossible to 
count on a successful financial and economic policy. 
  On the whole, based on 1993's results, it is possible 
to draw the following conclusions: 
  1. In 1993, the government pursued a more consistent and 
effective financial policy, which is confirmed by the specific 
results analyzed in the report. Russia's economy is rapidly 
reorganizing and it can be regulated using market-oriented 
methods. 
  2. The inadequately perceptible results, first of all, are 
explained by the executive power's internal conflicts, the lack 
of understanding and the unwillingness of part of the leadership 
to carry out the needed reforms and the incompatibility of the 
financial, agrarian and industrial policies. 
<H5>  2. The Year's Basic Economic Results </H5>
  In 1993, it was not possible to sustain fully the financial 
and economic policies' orientation toward lowering inflation and 
stabilizing the economy. Therefore, although we avoided the 
"Ukrainization" of the Russian economy, the majority of set 
parameters was not achieved. 
  At the same time, within the framework of this moderate 
policy, some progress was achieved: 
  -- the rate of inflation in December amounted to less than 
13 
percent per month in comparison with the 25-30 percent at the 
beginning of the year, but the trend was not clear and a strong 
burst of inflation was noted in the summer; 
  -- the ratio of net domestic assets to the GDP decreased; 
domestic funding of the budget deficit decreased from 19 percent 
in 1992 to 5 percent and foreign funding decreased from 17 
percent to 4 percent; 
  -- the ruble exchange rate stabilized and approached parity 
with purchasing power; wages increased in terms of dollars; 
import subsidies were eliminated and the transition to a single 
exchange rate was completed (the ratio of import subsidies to 
the GDP decreased from 12 percent to 1 percent); 
  -- interest rates, including those for deposits, converged 
with the level of inflation and became favorable in December; 
thus, the conditions for the resumption of saving and investing 
were created; 
  -- and the process of transferring covert subsidies into the 
budget was begun (for example, CIS credits, the share of which 
in the GDP decreased from 6 percent to less than 1 percent). 
<H5>  2.1. The Development of Inflation Processes </H5>
  It is possible to distinguish two stages in the development 
of 1993's inflation: from the beginning of the year to July and 
from August to December. The rate of increase dropped in March 
through June and later in September through December. At the 
beginning of the year and in August, the rate of increase in 
prices reached almost 30 percent per month. Over the year as a 
whole (from December to December), prices increased by an 
approximate factor of 10 as against a factor of 26 in 1992. 
  The development of inflation processes in the first half of 
the year occurred to a large extent due to the influence of the 
emission inflation of the money turnover in the fall of the 
preceding year after conducting mutual crediting of the debts of 
state enterprises and other decisions which intensified 
inflation expectations. This period was characterized by a rapid 
increase in the turnover rate and a simultaneous increase in 
inflation and the dollar exchange rate. As a result, by spring, 
the flight from the ruble to foreign currencies had begun to 
take on a threatening nature and holding on to available 
currencies became a method of saving for the people. The rate of 
dollarization continued to increase until June, when foreign 
deposits amounted to 46 percent of the money supply as against 
19 percent in January of 1992. 
  Slowing down the development of this dangerous trend was 
managed successfully thanks to the shifting of new streams of 
foreign currency into the currency market, the rise in interest 
rates and the shrinking of the deficit and the credit supply 
(see the section on the currency policy [5.1.]). As a result, 
the exchange rate stabilized, the dollar inside the country 
began to depreciate and the flight from the ruble eased up. The 
currency deposits in August amounted to 29 percent of the money 
supply. The Central Bank began to raise intensively the rate for 
refinancing, which became favorable by year's end, this 
stimulated an increase in deposit interest rates and the 
inclination toward saving began to increase. 
  As a result, the degree of monetization of the economy began 
to increase and the rate of inflation began to decrease but the 
Ministry of Finance began to be subjected to ever fiercer 
pressure. The demands for money, subsidies and loans 
intensified. The on-going events make it possible to draw the 
conclusion that what is taking shape is a distinctive, 
economy-straining inflation cycle: as soon as favorable results 
are successfully achieved, due to the pressure of the sectorial 
lobbies and political events, there follows a breakdown which 
then makes it necessary to intensify anew the struggle against 
inflation. 
  It is believed that the hyperinflation threshold is at the 
level of 50 percent per month. In point of fact, even an average 
rate of inflation of 20 percent per month is catastrophic. 
Russia has been living under the conditions of hyperinflation 
for 2 years now and one achievement of the policy pursued is the 
fact that the situation has not become much worse. If decisive 
measures are not adopted in 1994, then savings, investments and 
the development of the economy as a whole will be in great 
danger. Without the renewal of fixed capital and without capital 
investments, the economy will continue to stagnate, precluding 
the possibility of raising the people's standard of living. 
  The state budget's gigantic deficit, funded almost 
exclusively through Central Bank emissions, remained the main 
cause of inflation in 1993. Among the other most important 
"monetary" causes of inflation, it is possible to isolate the 
following: 
  1) The increase in the rate of turnover of money as a result 
of inflation expectations. The decrease in the supply of money 
did not lead to a proportional decrease in inflation, i.e., the 
rate of turnover increased. The interrelationship is: Central 
Bank emission -- the monetary base -- the aggregates of the 
money supply; inflation in 1993 assumed a stable nature. Central 
Bank credits over the course of 1 month are reflected in the 
increase of the monetary base and the aggregates, while changes 
in the aggregates, with a lag of 3- 4 months with consideration 
of the change in the rate of turnover, have telling effects on 
the rate of inflation. 
  2) The increase in the Central Bank's net purchases of 
currency (the monetization of foreign assets) and, 
correspondingly, the increase in Russia's net international 
reserves were accompanied by a ruble emission not included in 
the quarterly limits established by the Commission on Credit 
Policy. 


Table 1. Credits, Monetary Aggregates and Inflation: 1993 (data at the end 
of a period in billions of rubles) 

                  1992      First       Second      Third       Fourth 
                            Quarter     Quarter     Quarter     Quarter of 
                            of 1993     of 1993     of 1993     1993 
                                                                (Estimate) 

Government's      2,789     3,927       5,291       7,942       12,062 
Gross Credit 

Banks' Gross      2,624     3,888       5,791       8,655       11,272 
Credit 

CIS Credits       907       1,703       2,022       2,109       2,533 
(without cash 
transfers) 

Increase in       35        20          12          12          9 
Central Bank 
Credits as a 
Portion of the 
GDP in 
Percentages 

Monetary Base     4,284     6,344       9,304       14,817      21,426 

Multiplier        1.68      1.70        1.73        1.76        1.78 

M2 Monetary       7,178     10,932      16,219      38,138      35,775 
Aggregate 

Turnover Rate     5.0       7.4         6.9         8.2         8.7 

Average Monthly Increase in Inflation in Percentages 

-- Consumer       25        24          21          23          17 
Price Index 

-- Industrial               29          20          25          17 
Wholesale Price 
Index 

-- Including                29          22          24          16 
Without 
Consideration 
of the Increase 
in Energy 
Resource Prices 


Explanation: The monetary base is calculated as the amount of money in 
circulation, required reserves and funds in Central Bank basic accounts. The 
multiplier is estimated as the quotient from the division of the M2 monetary 
aggregate by the value of the monetary base. The rate of turnover is 
calculated at the monthly GDP (at the end of a period) in annual terms 
divided by the M2 monetary aggregate. 


  3) The increase in the multiplier. In 1993, an insignificant 
increase was noted in the multiplier, which also contributed to 
the saving of credit resources and an increase in the money 
supply. This was a consequence of the commercial banks' 
reduction of their own surplus reserves. In 1993, a recution 
occurred in the commercial banks' surplus reserves from 37 
percent of the total ruble deposits in January of 1993 to 23 
percent by year's end, which increased the supply of money in 
the economy. 
  4) Not all commercial banks are observing the requirements 
for the quota of required reserves, which amounts to from 15 
percent to 20 percent depending on the term of the deposit. It 
is precisely this portion of the ruble deposits which should be 
held by the commercial banks in an interest-free account in the 
Central Bank. According to the statistical data, at the end of 
1993, only 11 percent of the total ruble deposits was being held 
as reserve requirements. 
  Non-observance of the established rules also increased the 
opportunities for the commercial banks to grant credits. In 1993 
liberalization of coal prices was implemented, unregulated 
prices for oil were increased and wellhead gas prices were 
indexed. With the establishment of RAO YeES [Russian Joint-Stock 
Company Unified Power System], as of the summer, a rapid 
increase in the tariffs for electricity began. However, the 
impact of these factors on inflation was not of an evident 
nature. No substantial correlation was observed between 
inflation and energy prices. The level of inflation did not 
reveal a tendency to increase after significant increases in 
energy prices. Rather, the understated prices for energy had an 
inflationary effect on the economy. 
  The combination of fixed or limited prices for energy and 
high domestic inflation leads to the need for large state 
subsidies to producers, which stimulates an increase in 
inflation. On the whole, the inflation process was determined by 
the monetary policy, the budget policy and the amounts of the 
non-payments to the Fuel and Energy Complex. This testifies to 
the fact that maintaining high rates of inflation against the 
background of a real reduction in the money supply cannot be 
explained as an intensification of its non- monetary factors. On 
the contrary, this is the result of the rapid monetization of 
the economy. Statistically, the dynamics of inflation are 
explained highly reliably by inflation expectations and the 
increase in the money supply, i.e., monetary factors are 
prevailing, which are unclear to the economic managers and 
bankers, who have not studied a market economy. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-USR-004L-09A>      Figure 1. Inflation and the Dynamics of the M2 Money Supply </FIG>



<FIG ID=JPRS-USR-004L-10A>      Figure 2. The Size of the Actual Money Supply (December 1992 = 1) </FIG>


<FIG ID=JPRS-USR-004L-11A>      Figure 3. The Dynamics of the Actual Money Supply and Industrial Production (January 1992 = 1) </FIG>



  The attempts to explain the dynamics of the wholesale prices 
as the result of a rise in the cost of material expenditures are 
unsound. Given the formally obvious connection between 
expenditures and prices, there is no evidence for the prevalence 
of this factor. The increase in prices for many goods rests on 
demand and the competition from more inexpensive imported goods. 
Many enterprises are reacting to the increase in expenditures 
for energy resources with non-payments rather than with 
bankruptcies. The greater the possibilities are for 
non-payments, currency and other benefits and centralized 
credits, the less efficient production is and the more room 
there is for inflation's non-monetary factors. 
<H5>  2.2 Incomes and Wages </H5>
  A positive trend of 1993 was the restoration of the dynamics 
of the increase in the actual level of the public's monetary 
incomes after their twofold decrease in 1992. The nominal 
incomes increased by an approximate factor of 11.1, while prices 
increased by an approximate factor of 10. The public's real 
incomes increased by approximately 10 percent, while wages in 
terms of dollars increased by a factor of 3 or up to $100 per 
month (by a factor of 9 in comparison with the end of 1991), 
which is much more than, for example, in Ukraine. The 
convergence of domestic and world prices contributed to an 
increase in the availability of imported goods. On the whole, in 
1993, the increase in average wages in nearly all sectors 
exceeded the increase in consumer prices. 
  However, under the conditions of maintaining high rates of 
price increases, the people of Russia have constantly borne the 
burden of the cruelest inflationary tax, which empties out the 
consumers' pockets. The result was an insignificant increase in 
real monetary incomes, especially among the low-income sections 
of the public. In essence, the income policy of 1992, which led 
to the sharp differentiation of incomes, was continued. 
  Nominally not restrictive, it led to real disproportions in 
the system for the distribution of incomes, creating 
opportunities for their accelerated increase in the production 
sphere and maintaining the "outsider" status of the 
budget-controlled workers. The sporadic attempts to reduce this 
disparity caused an increase in the budget deficit, then -- an 
inflationary tax, and later a reproduction of the disproportions 
at the new level of prices and incomes occurred. 
  The launching as of the end of 1992 of a legislatively 
authorized indexing mechanism made it possible in 1993 to reduce 
the lag of fixed incomes behind unregulated ones, but it 
basically did not change the situation. The mechanism's 
imperfect nature and its use in the political struggle gave rise 
to new, absurd disproportions in the distributions (for example, 
a two- to threefold increase in the minimum pension and the 
minimum wage). The intersectorial differentiation in wages 
intensified, which intensified the social discontent. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-USR-004L-13A>      Figure 4. The Actual Level of the Public's Incomes, Average Wages, Pensions and Allowances in </FIG>



<FIG ID=JPRS-USR-004L-14A>      Figure 5. The Level of Indexing </FIG>



<FIG ID=JPRS-USR-004L-15A>      Figure 6. The Average Monthly Wages for the National Economy in U.S. Dollars (Based on the </FIG>


  The structure of the people's monetary incomes changed -- 
the 
proportion of wages increased from 70 percent to 75 percent with 
a simultaneous drop in the share of social payments (pensions, 
allowances and stipends) from 22 percent to 14 percent while the 
incomes from the financial system were maintained at an 
extremely low level -- 3.5 percent (14 percent in 1991 and 4 
percent in 1992). The people's incomes from the sale of 
agricultural products increased from 4 percent to 7 percent. 
These trends, on the whole, correspond to the normal development 
of market relations. 
  The main result, even though it went contrary to the 
government's wishes, of the income policy pursued in 1993 
consisted of the inflationary redistribution of incomes between 
groups of the population without substantial changes in the 
dynamics of the total actual amount of incomes. Despite the 
seasonal tendency toward the acceleration of the increase in 
monetary incomes in the fourth quarter, their average monthly 
amount in real terms up to year's end remained almost at the 
level of the fourth quarter of 1992. 
  Inflation is objectively leading to the polarization of 
society, to the disappearance of the middle class and to an 
increase in the disparity between the rich and the poor. The 
opposition was unable to understand this, attributing everything 
to the results of the reforms. At the same time, the proposals 
of the Ministry of Finance and the Ministry of Labor regarding 
the introduction of tax regulators in order to reduce the 
differentiation in incomes invariably ran into resistance. 
  It must also be noted that a tendency toward a real increase 
in consumption was noted in 1993. For example, the consumption 
of all types of foodstuffs increased in comparison with 1992 and 
also for many of them in comparison with 1991. Signs of an 
improvement in the structure of consumption appeared -- the 
share of foodstuffs in the retail goods turnover decreased from 
56 percent to 53 percent and the sales of many industrial 
consumer goods increased, although this occurred frequently due 
to importing. 
  At the same time, the actual volume of services used fell 
quite strongly. It is precisely in this area that the inflation 
of costs acquired important significance since the subsidies to 
the housing and municipal services complex, passenger tranport, 
health care, education and communications were reduced, spending 
for energy resources increased and many enterprises of the 
service sphere were closed or reconfigured after their 
privatization. A new sphere of services developed swiftly, but, 
for the time being, it is geared basically toward society's 
prosperous strata. 
<H5>  2.3. The Public's Savings </H5>
  In 1993, we failed to overcome negative trends: the 
extremely 
low rate of saving; the inadequacy of savings for the 
stimulation of investments; and the uncivilized nature of the 
majority of methods of saving. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-USR-004L-17A>      Figure 7. The Dynamics of the Basic Types of the Public's Monetary Assets in 1993 (January 1, </FIG>



<FIG ID=JPRS-USR-004L-18A>      Figure 8. The Public's Inclination Toward Consumption and Saving. (The Relationship of </FIG>


  The low rates of the population's real monetary incomes, the 
unfavorable interest rates for deposits, the constant inflation 
expectations and the lack of basic investing know-how are the 
main reasons for the low savings activity. Nevertheless, in 
1993, the process of the accumulation of monetary assets using 
civilized methods intensified somewhat and the average annual 
indicator of the inclination toward saving came to more than 6 
percent as against 3.8 percent in 1992. 
  The Ministry of Finance constantly exerted pressure on the 
Sberbank [Savings Bank] in order to force it to raise the 
interest rates for the public's deposits. To this end, a portion 
of the state's debt to the Savings Bank was repaid. An 
especially substantial increase occurred at the beginning of the 
year and in October. As a result, especially marked positive 
changes were noted at the end of the year, when the rates 
converged with inflation. 
  The rapid increase in the public's deposits in banks 
testifies to the high elasticity of the amount of monetary 
deposits of natural persons in relation to the interest rate 
level and the expansion of the range of banking services 
offered. The Savings Bank's role is continuously diminishing 
due to the commercial banks, which are offering their services 
more and more widely, at least to the prosperous layers of the 
population. According to estimates, in 1993 the amount of the 
public's deposits in commercial banks increased by a factor of 
32, while their share in the overall amount of the public's bank 
deposits on 1 January 1994 came to around 27 percent as against 
7 percent at the beginning of 1993. 
  Substantial assets of the population went into stocks and 
other obligations (AVVA and Olbi-Diplomat), for which lines have 
formed. The public's inexperience caused the widespread 
propagation of dubious companies which are attracting the assets 
of small investors (for example, the Russian House of Seleng). 
In many instances, these forms of investments do not differ from 
savings in their economic content. 
  The legalization and expansion of the currency market 
stimulated in the year's second half the redistribution 
processes in the ready cash portion of the public's assets. The 
ratio of the increase in ready cash in the public's hands to the 
disposable incomes decreased from 15 percent on average in 1992 
to 11 percent in the third quarter of 1993 and to 8-9 percent at 
year's end. However, ready cash remains an important part of the 
public's savings, which testifies to the lack of understanding 
of the impact of the inflation tax, the lack of skill in 
investing and the lack of faith in the credit system and 
securities. 
  The decrease in the growth of ready cash in rubles was 
partially compensated for by the increase in spending for the 
purchase of foreign currency in commercial banks for protection 
from inflation. In the second half of the year, these 
expenditures amounted to 8-10 percent of the people's incomes as 
against 2 percent in the first quarter of 1993. At the same 
time, this phenomenon is partially explained by the legalization 
of the currency turnovers of the "black market." 
  Private importing, especially that of small merchants, is 
noticeably geared toward the use of foreign currency. In 1993, 
the share of consumer spending in currency increased, i.e., 
"dollarization" continued to intensify. Under the conditions of 
high inflation and the high liquidity of cash currency, the 
increase in currency assets, to a significant extent, acted not 
as a method for saving, but rather, as a method for maintaing 
the public's "current cash fund" for payments for services and 
goods. It is clear that this cash fund is better protected from 
inflation than a ruble cash fund. 
<H5>  2.4. The GDP, Production and Employment </H5>
  The production of the GDP in Russia in current prices as a 
whole in 1993 amounted, according to preliminary data, to around 
162 trillion rubles [R], while the physical volume was around 88 
percent of 1992's level. 
  The need for a structural reorganization of industry, the 
loss of markets, the reduction in subsidies and preferential 
credits, the high inflation, the political and economic 
uncertainties, the inertia of the leaders, and the lack of 
incentives for increasing efficiency made the slump in 
production inevitable. 
  In 1993, industrial production in current prices amounted to 
R109.4 trillion. The physical volume of production had decreased 
compared to 1992 by 18 percent, while, in the third and fourth 
quarters, the level of production stabilized relatively at the 
level of 65-70 percent of the first quarter of 1992. Capital 
investments from all sources amounted to 85 percent compared to 
1992. 
  The structure of production is slowly but surely changing 
and, in a number of sectors, there are changes associated with 
the change in demand and the expansion of exporting 
opportunities. The slump is of an ever more clearly structural 
nature. The slump is greater in machine building and light 
industry, which are producing an enormous amount of 
noncompetitive products which are being replaced by imports. The 
picture is similar for certain foodstuffs and products of light 
industry. At the same time, the production of fuel and raw 
material resources decreased substantially less, including in 
connection with exporting opportunities. The production of 
individual types of complicated household equipment increased. 
Residential housing starts using all sources of financing 
increased by 1 percent, although a significant portion of 
housing construction has simply not been taken into 
consideration. 
  The overall number of persons out of work and actively 
seeking it, as well as of those working part-time, amounted at 
year's end to 8.0 million people or 10.4 percent of the active 
population. In accordance with the methodology of MOT [ILO -- 
International Labor Organization], 3.8 million people (5 
percent) can be classified as unemployed. At the beginning of 
1994, 836,000 people or 1 percent of the economically active 
population were officially classified as unemployed. At the 
beginning of 1993, this indicator came to 577,000 people (0.6 
percent). 
  High inflation and the distribution of preferential credits 
did not prevent the production slump. The inadequately 
consistent monetary policy caused some drop in the actual money 
supply, but it did not ward off the high inflation expectations 
and this is why it intensified the scale of the industrial slump. 
  In the sphere of macroeconomic regulation, a practice 
extremely adverse from the economic point of view arises when 
periods for a real reduction in the scope of the emission 
inflation of the economy are replaced by the expansion of 
credits and the budget deficit. The expansion of the money 
supply just for a short period stimulates an increase in 
production, but it rapidly speeds up inflation and inflation 
expectations. The inevitable measures which follow this for 
restricting credits and inflation cause a reduction in the 
actual money supply and a more substantial slump in production. 
  As a result, the wave-like movement of credits and the 
periodic change in the vector of the harshness of the monetary 
policy lead to an unending slump in production. The 
inconsistency in the monetary policy will never make it possible 
to stabilize production and, in some countries, the governments 
of which adhered to such a policy for many years, the matter 
ended in deindustrialization and the loss of the industrial 
potential base. The last 2 years of reforms have demonstrated to 
the fullest extent the futility of such a policy. 
  It is necessary to take into account the fact that the 
indicators for production, the people's incomes and inflation 
cannot currently be considered to be entirely reliable. There is 
every reason to assume that the data published by the 
statistical organs concerning production do not take into 
account a significant part of the products produced and sold 
(previously, they devoted themselves to padding the accounts and 
now they are devoting themselves to understating them). This is 
being done in order to evade taxes and to obtain additional 
revenues. 
  Many methods have appeared for understating paid monetary 
compensation and for using material incentives (for example, 
leased vehicles, apartments and free meals), paying wages 
through savings accounts, which are untaxed, the use of benefits 
for the construction of individual housing, travel allowances, 
expense accounts, the distribution of securities, the depositing 
of a portion of the wages abroad and dozens of others. 
  Many new private enterprises will not fall into the 
statistician's field of view for a long time, since their number 
has increased by hundreds of thousands. For example, just in 
Moscow, over 2 years, the number of taxpayers increased from 
40,000 to 250,000. 
<H8>  Tasks for 1994 </H8>
  1. The main goal formulated on the government's plan for 
intensifying the economic reforms is the attainment of 
substantially lower inflation (3-5 percent per month by year's 
end). 
  2. A subsequent reduction in the Central Bank's net credits 
for funding government expenditures of up to 3-4 percent of the 
GDP. 
  3. A subsequent lowering of inflation expectations and the 
creation of conditions for stimulating accumulation. 
<H5>  3. The Budget Policy </H5>
<H5>  3.1. The Budget Process </H5>
  The government's budget policy and the Ministry of Finance's 
position on this matter were one of the sharpest points of 
conflict of the different opinions, around which passions 
seethed all year long. 
  The unsettled nature of the relations between the 
legislative 
and executive powers in the first half of 1993 led to the 
wrecking of the deadlines for the adoption of budget legislation 
and frequent adjustments of it occurred. The Russian 
Federation's republic budget for 1993 was approved by the 
Russian Federation [RF] Law No 4968-1 only on 14 May 1993. The 
measures undertaken by the government in the area of the pursuit 
of a restrained financial policy were not supported by the 
deputies, rather, on the contrary, attempts were undertaken to 
increase state spending without consideration of the state's 
financial condition. In order to do this, the unfounded 
forecasts of the macroeconomic indicators, which were based on 
overstated data about the receipts of revenues into the budgets 
of all levels, were foisted on the government. 
  The fulfillment of all the decisions of the VS [Supreme 
Soviet] could have led to the growth of the federal budget 
beyond the limits, which would have caused a colossal 
intensification of inflation and the final destruction of the 
country's financial system. In the summer, the government, 
supported by the president, refused to carry out the July 
refinements of the law on the budget, which were adopted by the 
parliament, according to which the deficit would have exceeded 
the total amount of revenues. This position was reflected in the 
RF Presidential Directive No 2234 of 12 August 1993. 
  The final period mark in the budget planning was written by 
Presidential Edict No 2234 of 21 December 1993 on Refinement of 
the Indicators of the Russian Federation's Republic Budget for 
the Fourth Quarter of 1993, which established the procedure for 
funding budget expenditures within the limits of the actual 
receipt of revenues and for the involvement of Central Bank 
credits while observing the established budget deficit limit. 
This meant, first, the priority funding of the protected 
spending items. And second, keeping the amount of the 
expenditures within the limits determined by the total budget 
revenues and Central Bank credit. At the same time, the amount 
of credit had been severely restricted beforehand in the 
calculations for the upcoming quarter and month. 
  Thus, additional restraining of the increase in state 
spending was accomplished, which made it possible for the 
government to avoid going beyond the agreed bounds of the limits 
for the increase in indebtedness for Central Bank credits and to 
restrain the increase in the supply of money in the economy. 
This system of using the budget was of critical importance for 
the realization of the entire anti-inflation program. 
  At the same time, the established practice for the 
organization of budget funding had obvious shortcomings. It made 
the use of budget resources unstable and insufficiently 
systematic, inasmuch as, for many items, there occurred a 
substantial restriction of expenditures, which occurred 
unexpectedly for the recipients of budget funds. The acute 
problem of the underfunding of planned expenditures included in 
the republic budget emerged. The various sections of the budget 
turned out to have been funded to varying degrees. 
  The indicated shortcomings were a heavy but unavoidable 
price 
to pay for a policy of limiting the budget deficit under 
conditions when expenditures were not adequately supported by 
revenues and, first and foremost, by the tax receipts. However, 
the Ministry of Finance's moderate policy, which was aimed at 
limiting the state's expenditures over the course of the year, 
yielded fruit in the form of a lowering of inflation in November 
and December. 
<H5>  3.2. The Tax Policy </H5>
<H5>  3.2.1. Tax Legislation </H5>
  Russia's tax legislation did not undergo substantial changes 
in 1993. However, because of the change in the rate for the 
value-added tax (NDS [VAT]), over the course of the year changes 
in the structure of the tax revenues occurred: the share of 
indirect taxes decreased and the share of direct taxes, 
including payments associated with the use of natural resources, 
increased. 
  At the end of 1993, two presidential edicts were adopted, on 
changes in the taxation of natural and legal persons who, on the 
one hand, contributed to the improvement of the tax legislation 
and the elimination of "loopholes" in it and, on the other hand, 
supported the set of mutually balancing decisions on increasing 
the tax rates (on profits, value added and property) and the 
narrowing of the tax base or the expansion of tax breaks. The 
basic changes were as follow: 
  1. An increase in the brackets of income groups for the 
taxation of the incomes of natural persons; 
  2. A potential opportunity for increasing the corporate 
profits tax rate (at the discretion of the regional authorities) 
from 32 percent to 38 percent (to 43 percent for banks and 
insurers) or decreasing it down to 13 percent. At the same time, 
changes occurred in the calculation of the taxable profit, which 
lead to a reduction in the tax burden for enterprises despite 
the tax rate increase: 
  a) there was a revaluation of fixed capital (by a factor of 
26 on average), which led to an increase in depreciation 
allowances and a decrease in profits with an increase in the 
resources remaining at the enterprises; 
  b) the standardized wage level was increased from four times 
the minimum wage to six times the minimum wage and any excess 
above this level is subject to the profits tax; a change was 
made in the procedure for ultrahigh taxation (at the rate of 50 
percent) of a wage level higher than eight times the minimum 
wage; together with an increase by a factor of 1.9 in the 
minimum wage, this led to an increase in the standardized wage 
level by a factor of 3. According to estimates, the impact of 
this factor alone is equivalent to a reduction in the profits 
tax burden by approximately 20 percent. 
  3. Tax breaks are being introduced for enterprises which 
invest assets in production development and social construction: 
  a) exempted from taxation are enterprise profits directed 
toward these goals using the proportional financing procedure, 
but not directly, and profits directed toward paying off 
long-term bank credits obtained in order to solve investment 
problems; 
  b) exempted from taxation are bank profits from the granting 
of special purpose long-term investment credits, which will make 
it possible for banks to lower the interest rates for the issued 
credits; 
  c) the time frame for recovering the value-added tax amounts 
paid by enterprises when purchasing equipment has been reduced 
from 2 years to 6 months; when equipment is imported, the VAT 
amounts are written off once only when the equipment is placed 
into service; 
  4. In order to compensate partially for budget losses, a 
special purpose fee is being introduced to support the national 
economy's most important sectors at a rate of 3 percent, as well 
as excise taxes on certain types of goods; 
  5. Real steps have been taken to federalize the tax system: 
the rights of federation entities and local organs of power in 
establishing tax rates and impositng new taxes have been 
expanded and the basic principles of budget federalism in Russia 
have been formulated. 
<H5>  3.2.2. Customs Duties </H5>
  In accordance with the RF Law on Customs Tariffs, as well as 
for the purpose of creating favorable conditions for stimulating 
Russian exporters and partial compensation for the loss of their 
competitiveness as a result of the stabilization of the ruble 
exchange rate, as of 1 November 1993, new rates have been 
introduced for export customs duties and a list of goods to 
which they apply. The Ministry of Finance proposed this back in 
August, but the sectorial lobbies opposed it, all the while 
professing the slogan of the saturation of the domestic market 
due to the ban on exporting goods. 
  In the list of goods subject to the imposition of export 
duties, provision has been made for a reduction in the rates by 
50 percent on average and the number of groups of goods 
subjected to customs duties has been reduced from 53 to 29. At 
the same time, the volume of export quotas has been reduced -- 
quotas have been established only for 12 groups of strategically 
important raw material goods, the exporting of which, as of 
1994, will be carried out by enterprises and organizations 
registered by the MVES [Ministry of Foreign Economic Relations] 
for this purpose. 
  As of 19 November 1993, new, increased rates were introduced 
for excise taxes on the importing into Russia of certain types 
of alcoholic drinks, cigarettes and passenger cars with engines 
larger than 1800 cubic centimeters. 
  A new list has been drawn up of goods subject to the 
imposition of import duties and of import duty rates, which 
provides for an increase in the level of the rate basically for 
non-necessities, for example, alcoholic drinks, articles made of 
precious metals and stones, carpets, furs and so on. At the same 
time, it is being proposed that import duties be removed almost 
completely from investment-purpose goods and, first of all, from 
modern manufacturing equipment not produced in Russia. 
  In 1993, the danger of excessive protectionism for domestic 
producers intensified. This theme is being actively used by all 
the political forces trying to enhance their popularity among 
the voters. It is alarming that they are trying to include cars, 
household electronics and foodstuffs among the non-necessities. 
With the aid of the customs duties, they are trying to 
camouflage the extreme inefficiency of agriculture and a number 
of sectors of industry, the products of which are ceasing to be 
in demand in the domestic market. 
  They are thereby forcing Russian consumers to purchase 
notoriously lesser quality and more expensive goods, so that, in 
fact, outdated sectors are being subsidized at the expense of 
their pockets, the incentives for increasing efficiency are 
disappearing and industry is being doomed to progressive 
stagnation. This directly contradicts the course of the reforms 
for the liberalization of foreign economic activities and the 
opening up of the domestic market. 
<H5>  3.2.3. International Agreements </H5>
  An important direction of the Ministry of Finance's work is 
the preparation of intergovernmental agreements with other 
countries on avoiding double taxation. As the rightful successor 
of the USSR, Russia took upon itself all the obligations of the 
USSR for similar agreements (21 agreements, including 2 
multilateral agreements with the member countries of CEMA), 
which made it possible to encompass all of Russia's basic 
economic trading partners. 
  At present, in connection with the change in the economic 
and 
political situation and the expiration of the period of validity 
of the previously signed agreements, work is being performed on 
the preparation of new agreements on these matters. After 
ratification by the Russian Supreme Soviet, revised agreements 
with the USA and Poland went into effect as of 1 January 1994. 
Signed agreements with seven countries (Luxembourg, Korea, 
Turkey, Vietnam, Bulgaria, Sweden, and Romania) are awaiting 
ratification in the State Duma. Initialed and ready for signing 
are agreements with another 13 countries, among which are 
Canada, Great Britain, Ireland, Finland, Ukraine, Belarus, 
Israel, Hungary, and the RSA [Republic of South Africa]. The 
negotiating process has been started with nine countries, among 
which are China, France, Germany, Argentina and Uzbekistan: it 
is contemplated that, before the end of 1994, the agreements 
with these countries will also be ready for signing. 
Negotiations will begin in 1994 with a number of countries, in 
particular, with Switzerland, India, Italy and the Baltic States. 
<H5>  3.2.4. Tax Amnesty </H5>
  On 27 October 1993, Presidential Edict No 1773 on the 
Implementation of a Tax Amnesty in 1993 was issued. In 
accordance with this edict, the submission of arrears to the 
budget for taxes was done in November without penalties, while, 
as of 1 December, the amount of the penalties was tripled. 
  Despite the skeptical attitude toward this step, the tax 
amnesty worked: in November, on the whole, across Russia, more 
than 43,000 legal persons and over 2,000 natural persons 
declared their debts to the budget. The total amount of payments 
submitted to the budget came to R270 billion or 5 percent of all 
the receipts in November of 1993. 
<H5>  3.3. Budget Revenues </H5>
  In 1993, the revenues for Russia's budget system amounted to 
around R48 trillion, including R40.4 trillion due to state taxes 
and other obligatory payments. According to the preliminary 
report data, in 1993, the share of budget revenues amounted to 
29.5 percent of the GDP (29.3 percent in 1992), while the share 
of tax receipts decreased from 28.7 percent to 25.1 percent. 
  The share of receipts for the VAT in the GDP decreased by 
4.4 
points, of which 2.6 points were associated with the lowering as 
of 1 January 1993 of the rate for this tax from 28 percent to 20 
percent. The remaining losses were associated, primarily, with 
the underpayment of the VAT because of the enterprises mutual 
non-payments -- around 0.8 percent of the GDP, tax breaks and so 
on. 
  On the other hand, the share of the withdrawal of the 
enterprises' book profits into budgets of all levels increased 
to 49.9 percent as against 46.7 percent in 1992, which entailed 
an increase in the revenues from this tax as a share of the GDP. 
The increase in the taxable profits base basically occurred 
through an increase in the amount of the wage fund above its 
standardized value and a reduction in the share of depreciation 
allowances in the production cost of products. 


Table 2. Budget System Revenues in 1992 and 1993 (as a Percentage of the 
GDP) 

                          1992's Reported Data     1993's Preliminary Data 

Total Budget System       29.4                     29.5 
Revenues 

Including 

Total Tax Receipts        28.7                     24.9 

Including 

1. Direct Taxes and       13.0                     14.4 
Payments 

Including 

-- Profits Tax            8.7                      10.4 

-- Taxes from the         2.4                      2.7 
Public 

2. Indirect Taxes         12.3                     7.5 

Including 

-- VAT                    11.1                     6.7 

-- Excise Taxes           1.2                      0.8 

3. Customs Duties         2.6                      1.4 

4. Other Taxes,           0.8                      1.5 
Revenues and Fees 

Non-tax Revenues          0.7                      4.6 


  The problem of the overall tax burden remains the most 
painful matter of the tax policy. It is being asserted that 
taxes are smothering the producers, that the tax burden is 
unbearable and so on. The listed figures testify to the fact 
that the total tax burden in Russia in 1993 decreased in 
comparison with 1992, although it is somewhat higher in 
comparison with the world's developed countries. 
  The numerous suggestions about lowering taxes in order to 
stimulate the economy are not causing any major objections 
except for one -- how to compensate the budget for the drop in 
revenues. If it is compensated for through a reduction in 
spending, then this can be welcomed, but if it is compensated 
for through emission -- then this is a catastrophe for the 
economy. The experience of the past year showed that a lowering 
of taxes and every possible kind of tax break did not lead to an 
increase in production in a single sector of the national 
economy and if the tax stimulation of investments had an effect, 
then its size does not lend itself to statistical evaluation. 
  A serious problem during the raising of the revenue portion 
of the republic budget in 1993 was the tendency toward a sharp 
decrease in the share of the tax payments being paid into the 
republic budget in the overall amount of the GDP. Thus, whereas 
the share of tax receipts in the GDP in the first quarter of 
1993 amounted to 16.7 percent, it decreased to 12.3 percent in 
the second quarter, to 9 percent in the third quarter and it was 
9.7 percent in the fourth quarter. Of course, it is not entirely 
correct to compare the 1993 results with the data for 1992's 
second half, when inflationary pumping up of the economy 
occurred under the influence of the mutual crediting carried 
out, but the trend itself is obvious. 
  The basic cause of this process was the lowering, beginning 
as of 1 January 1993, of the rate for the value-added tax from 
28 percent to 20 percent, which was not compensated for by an 
increase in other taxes. The effect of this factor began to be 
tracked clearly as of March 1993 and especially as of May, when 
the recalculation of taxes based on the results of the preceding 
year was completed. But, undoubtedly, this factor was not the 
only one and this is confirmed by the decrease in tax receipts, 
which continued up to the end of the year. Only the decrease in 
the inflation rate at year's end influenced a change in this 
tendency (in the short term, the increase in the collection of 
taxes as a share of the GDP, given the decreasing inflation, is 
explained by the technique for remitting the tax payments). In 
our opinion, it is possible to find several more factors which 
have caused such a development of events. 
  It is impossible not to acknowledge the fact that the tax 
collection system is operating poorly. Over the course of the 
year, there was a steady increase in the arrears for payments 
into the budget. According to the State Tax Service's data, 
based on the status on 1 January 1994 as a whole for the 
Republic Budget, they amounted to R1.8 trillion, including R1.0 
trillion for the value-added tax, R500 billion for the profits 
tax and R300 billion for the payments for the use of mineral and 
natural resources. 
  This is especially noticeable in the example of the excise 
taxes: the introduction over the course of 1993 of excise taxes 
for oil and gas did not lead to an increase in actual receipts 
(as a percentage of the GDP or in prices deflated by the rate of 
increase) from this type of taxes in comparison with 1992's 
first quarter, when, in point of fact, the excise taxes had just 
been introduced. Apparently, we should talk about the fact that 
the taxpayers have found very widespread opportunities for tax 
evasion, against which it is necessary to begin to conduct a 
struggle in the very near future. It must be noted that, due to 
the pressure from the sectorial lobby, the excise tax rates for 
oil for five of the largest producers (the share of which 
exceeds 50 percent of the overall amount of oil production in 
the country) were set at the level of 8 percent when the average 
rate is 24 percent. 
  The continuing process of a nominal increase in non-payments 
in the economy is having an adverse impact on the tax receipts. 
Inasmuch as the value-added tax (the cornerstone of the tax 
payments into the federal budget) is being levied on the basis 
of the sale of products and the receipt of money in the 
enterprises' current accounts, the slower settlements in the 
economy proceed, the greater the delays in the collection of 
this tax and the larger the devaluation of the tax receipts. 
According to the data of Rosnalogsluzhba [Russian Tax Service], 
the total of the indebtedness for this tax amounts to around 
R1.3 trillion. 
  It is also impossible to disregard the practice which became 
widespread in the second half of 1993 of granting mass tax 
deferments to large industrial enterprises by the Ministry of 
Finance and local finance organs. According to the Ministry of 
Finance's data, the overall amount of granted deferments just 
for industrial enterprises for the remittance of taxes into the 
federal budget over the period from July through December of 
1993 came to more than R230 billion, of which only R55 billion 
had been paid by year's end. The tax deferments became one of 
the basic methods for financial support of industrial 
enterprises. 
  Serious complications also exist in the collection of all 
types of taxes from a new sector of the economy. Here, a number 
of aspects are intermingled: the imperfect nature of the 
legislation and the availability of tax shelters, the 
organizational weakness and the low level of training of the tax 
workers, the difficulties in recording the activities of many 
entrepreneurs and the progressive development of cash 
settlements in the economy, caused by the low quality of the 
system of bank clearing operations, and simply the striving of 
many entrepreneurs to evade remitting taxes and so on. 
Overcoming these factors will take a long time, but this task is 
one of the priority ones for the state's financial system. 
  The real decrease in the share of tax receipts into the 
republic budget in the GDP was accompanied by the redistribution 
of revenues in favor of the lower levels of the budgets. This 
occurred partially, contrary to the laws, because of the 
decisions of local authorities. Thus, the change for this reason 
in the ratio for dividing receipts from the VAT in favor of the 
regional and local budgets meant a loss for the republic budget 
of approximately R550 billion based on the results for the year 
(see the section "Budget Federalism" [3.6.]). 
  To a large extent, the underpayment of revenues into the 
budget system is associated with the tax evasion which is 
occurring both through concealing the very fact of economic 
activities, through the refusal to register business ventures 
and also through the falsification of the records of commercial 
and production enterprises and banks. 
  As a result of all this, the tendency toward a decrease in 
tax revenues by the end of 1993 seriously concerned the 
government, which decided to increase the tax burden (the 
increase in the VAT rate and the rate for the profits tax and in 
the portion designated for the federal budget). It is true that, 
at the same time, a series of decisions was made which will lead 
to aggravation of the situation involving the collection of 
taxes, inasmuch as they will really have a telling effect on the 
decrease in receipts from the profits tax (which currently, in 
light of a number of reasons, amount to a very large figure in 
comparison with other Eastern European countries). We are 
talking about a revaluation of fixed capital (consequently, the 
depreciation allowances will increase and profits will 
decrease), an increase in the standardized figure for wages from 
four times the minimum wage to six times the minimum wage and an 
increase in the level itself of the minimum wage by a factor of 
1.9. As a consequence, there is no reason to expect an increase 
in tax collections in 1994. 
  The substantial decrease in tax receipts and the limitation 
on the budget deficit were inevitably supplemented by some 
decrease in expenditures and an increase in non-tax receipts. 
The last of the indicated processes became highly significant in 
the second half of 1993, when the ratio of the federal budget's 
overall revenues to the tax revenues (without consideration of 
customs duties) increased from the level of 1.3-1.4 (typical for 
1992 and the beginning of 1993) to 1.7-1.9. Even though, 
according to all the methodological canons, the non-tax revenues 
are budget revenues and not a method for financing, under 
Russian conditions, the budget's non-tax revenues have become an 
inflation-causing factor. The explanation is simple, there were 
two basic methods for obtaining an increase in non-tax revenues: 
the transfer of the Central Bank's profits into the budget and 
the sale of precious metals and stones, again by the Central 
Bank, i.e., in both instances, the increase in budget revenues 
was accompanied by an increase in net internal assets. 
  Around 3.2 percent of the GDP (a little bit less than R5 
trillion) was obtained from the sale of precious metals and 
stones and currency assets of the Central Bank. The use of the 
Central Bank's profits made up approximately 1.3 percent of the 
GDP (R2 trillion). These receipts combined amounted to 4.5 
percent and compensated for the decrease in the share of tax 
receipts in the GDP. 
  But, if the transfer of the Central Bank's profits into the 
budget is a method for the subsequent withdrawal of emission 
income into the budget -- seigniorage (essentially an inflation 
tax) is even better from society's point of view, when this 
profit is spent on state needs rather than on the financing of 
the CIS states and bonuses for Central Bank staff members (as 
was done in 1992), then the sale of precious metals to the 
Central Bank, paid for by the Central Bank through emission, 
contains additional negative aspects. 
  First, the illusion is created that there is no need to 
reorganize the budget funding system, inasmuch as it is possible 
to find the money for funding the state's expenditures. Second, 
it is obvious that the liquid reserves of precious metals (the 
liquidity of which can be confirmed by the world market) are not 
that large and, when reserves of dubious or low liquidity enter 
into the matter, then we should talk about shifting the burden 
of the problems to the banking system. (Although this is a 
separate theme, we consider it necessary to note that the threat 
of a large-scale crisis in the banking system in Russia, as 
before, is extremely high and, in its own consequences, such a 
crisis may be much more serious than the industrial production 
crisis, because internal stabilizers and reserves of any kind 
are lacking in the Russian banking system.) 
  The monitoring work of the tax service and the tax 
investigation department of the observance of the tax 
legislation had an effect on the total volume of tax receipts 
and other payments. During 1993, the total amount of additional 
payments, including penalties based on checks, came to 
approximately R2.6 trillion or 7 percent of the total amount of 
tax receipts (4.7 percent in 1992). 
  Concealing or understating revenues, overstating 
expenditures, which are taken into account during the 
calculation of the taxable base, and incorrectly applying the 
tax rates and breaks remain the basic violations of the tax 
legislation. The instances of direct evasion of the remittance 
of taxes and other obligatory payments and of gross tax 
violations in foreign economic activities have become more 
frequent. For example, after a check of these aspects of the 
activities of Ingosstrakh [Foreign Insurance Main 
Administration], R21.5 billion have been paid into the budget, 
as have R5.5 billion and $400,000 based on the results of a 
check of Sovfrakht [freight administration] and R6 billion from 
Gorknefteorgsintez. 
  It may be stated that the struggle against tax delinquencies 
intensified in 1993, powerful structures are being formed for 
the tax inspectorate (126,000 persons now and 200,000 in the 
future) and the tax investigation department (8,000 persons now 
and 40,000 in the future), they are acquiring experience and 
modern equipment and they are establishing contacts with foreign 
colleagues. In 1994, a sharp increase in operating efficiency is 
possible. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-USR-004L-25A>      Figure 9. The Dynamics of Book-Listed Profit and the Share of its Withdrawal from January </FIG>



<FIG ID=JPRS-USR-004L-26A>      Figure 10. The Enterprises' Indebtedness and the Collection of the VAT as a Share of the GDP </FIG>



<FIG ID=JPRS-USR-004L-27A></FIG>


<H5>         3.4. Budget Expenditures </H5>
  The way in which the budget funding of state expenditures in 
1993 occurred showed the entire depth of the crisis in which the 
Russian budget policy and Russia's state finances happen to be. 
The reason for this is obvious: while the economic reforms on 
the whole have been proceeding throughout the country, at least 
without slowing down, for 2 years now, reforms in the budget 
process have not even occurred. To a large extent, the lack of 
changes in 1992 can be explained by the disintegration of the 
USSR and the changes in the staff of the Ministry of Finance, 
the annual cycle of budget planning and the lack of time at the 
end of 1991. 
  However, from the present standpoint, it is evident that 
these are only the external causes. Ultimately, nothing impeded 
the introduction of substantial changes in the budget practice 
as of the middle of 1992 or the beginning of 1993, but this was 
not done. A quite obvious conclusion comes to mind -- the old 
practice of budget planning and the implementation of the budget 
was outdated, while the reformers in the government limited 
themselves to the external indicators of the budget policy's 
successfulness (the level of the budget deficit, first of all). 
  The matter of real budget reform, just the realization of 
which is capable of laying a solid foundation for successes in 
the government's economic policy in the future, is still an even 
more urgent item on the agenda. 
  Most alarming from the standpoint of budget policy is the 
fact that the budget in Russia is being transformed more and 
more from an instrument of economic policy into a tool for 
plugging current holes and for solving short-term political 
problems before a referendum or elections. As a result, there 
are clashes between the planned requirements embedded in the 
annual budget and the stream of daily decisions of the 
government and the president about the necessity of carrying out 
one expenditure or another -- the latter's victory in the 
struggle for the budget ruble is more likely, but less 
efficient. It is obvious that, until this situation is overcome 
or restricted to the limits of the reserve funds, the budget 
will not be able to become a competent instrument of economic 
policy, but rather, it will only be summarized, based on the 
year's results, as the sum of the decisions on expenditures. 
  In 1993, this situation led to the fact that the state, by 
giving priority to the immediate problems, turned out to be in 
no condition to fulfill its planned decisions about raising 
wages and about the funding of investment programs and to pay 
for ordered products and mined precious metals, the bills for 
electricity and the domestic debt liabilities. As a result, the 
state itself, to a certain extent, is initiating the development 
of non-payments and condemning itself to a shortfall in taxes, 
the sum total of the budget expenditures is only a cash result 
and the amount of budget indebtedness remains unknown. 
  Of course, 1993's indebtedness can be carried over into 
1994, 
but it is obvious that, without changes in the attitude toward 
the budget, this situation will be reproduced annually on an 
ever-increasing scale. 
  The next problem is the problem of the promises and the 
excessiveness of the planned expenditures. Even in the budget 
planning stage, spending amounts are embedded in it which 
deliberately exceed the state's capabilities. For every ruble of 
the expenditures recorded in the budget, there is interest on 
the part of one department or another or one group of people or 
another. As a result, the funds are being allocated not to those 
who need them or for whom they would be most effective from the 
viewpoint of public interests, but rather, to those who are 
capable of securing the support of highly placed persons and 
exerting pressure on the Ministry of Finance when need be. As a 
result, the total amount of the republic budget's expenditures 
came to 75 percent of the planned budget, so that, during the 
compiling of the budget, the government, at the urging of the 
Ministry of Finance, in the course of refining the budget, twice 
sequestered all spending items (by 15 percent in the summer of 
1993 and by 20 percent during the determination of expenditures 
for the fourth quarter of 1993). Only this made it possible to 
prevent the uncontrolled growth of the budget deficit. 
  The total amount of the expenditures of the RF consolidated 
budget came to around R61 trillion and amounted with respect to 
the GDP in 1993 to 37.8 percent as against 33 percent of the GDP 
in 1992. This is associated with the increase in social spending 
and the inclusion in the budget of expenditures for a number of 
quasi-budget operations such as the credits for Roskhleboprodukt 
[Russian cereal products] for purchasing grain, conversion and 
investment credits and credits to the CIS states. In a 
comparable structure, the level of budget spending with respect 
to the GDP in 1993 decreased in comparison with 1992 by 1.6 
percent of the GDP. The structure of the consolidated budget's 
expenditures in comparison with 1992 is shown in Table 3. 


Table 3. Structure Consolidated Budget Expenditures in 1992 and 1993 (in 
Percentages) 

                                 1992                    1993 

1. The National Economy          34.5                    27.3 

2. Social and Cultural           23.1                    24.9 
Measures 

3. Science                       1.8                     1.6 

4. Defense                       14.3                    12.4 

5. Law Enforcement Agencies      4.1                     4.7 

6. Organs of Power and           1.8                     2.6 
Administration 

7. Foreign Economic Activities   7.0                     5.1 


8. Other Expenditures            13.4                    21.4 

Total                            100.0                   100.0 


  The republic budget's expenditures in 1993 amounted to 
R34.079 trillion. Implemented completely was the funding for 
socially protecting spending items to the extent of incoming 
revenues and the involvement of Central Bank credits. This 
determined the scale of the underfunding of the spending items 
as against the budget plan adopted in the RF law of 14 May 1993. 
The total amount of the underfunding came to R13.8 trillion. In 
capital construction, the state's overdue accounts payable 
amounted on 1 January 1994 to around R1.5 trillion; the 
indebtedness for the payment of deliveries of arms, military 
equipment, foodstuff, fuel and stores, for state defense order 
projects and installations and for other expenditures, which, 
proceeding on the basis of the actual prices and tariffs in 
effect in accordance with signed agreements, amounted to around 
R2.7 trillion; the indebtedness for transfers to the regional 
budgets was around R440 billion. The most urgent unfunded 
expenditures will be paid off during the implementation of the 
budget for the first quarter of 1994. 
<H5>  3.5. The Priority Directions of the Budget Expenditures </H5>
<H5>  3.5.1. The National Economy </H5>
  A substantial decrease in actual expenditures for the 
"national economy" (as a share of the GDP) occurred: from 6 
percent in 1992 they fell to 2.7 percent in 1993. In and of 
itself, this process is an indicator of the qualitative change 
in the RF budget, inasmuch as, instead of talking about "the 
necessity of separating the finances of the state and the 
enterprises," the state actually started to do this and is 
reducing its own meddling in the economy through the budget. At 
the same time (and this was mentioned above), quasi-budget 
methods are being developed for the financial support of 
enterprises through the granting of deferments for tax payments, 
the allocation of budget loans and individual tax breaks 
(basically, for foreign economic activities, although there are 
precedents for domestic taxes as well). 
  In this way, over the course of 1993, AO Rosselmash [Russian 
agricultural machinery] received around R100 billion (so that, 
of the R22 billion in profits derived over 9 months of 1993, 
this enterprise directed only R0.4 billion toward the 
replenishment of its working capital, while it remitted R1.6 
billion out of its profits for exceeding the standardized wage 
level), the Norilsk Nickel concern received around R70 billion, 
AO Kondpetroleum [Condpetroleum] -- more than R50 billion and 
AZLK [Motor Vehicle Plant imeni Leninist Komsomol] -- more than 
R30 billion. 


Table 4. The Republic Budget's Expenditures in 1993 (Preliminary Data in 
Billions of Rubles) 

                               Planned                 Actual 

The National Economy           4,429.9                 2,962.6 

Including 

-- Geological Surveying        552.9                   331.8 

-- Price Difference            2,277.2                 1,860.4 
Compensation 

-- State Subsidies             824.9                   209.4 

Conversion Budget Fund         346.4                   254.6 

Capital Investments            3,890.3                 3,163.4 

Social and Cultural Measures   3,139.0                 2,504.0 


Science                        1,161.5                 849.9 

Law Enforcement Agencies       2,325.6                 2,379.6 

Organs of Power and            689.8                   632.0 
Administration 

Special-Purpose Programs       540.8                   362.2 
(Chernobyl and others) 

Fund for the Social Support    919.3                   198.3 
of the Northerners 

Defense                        8,327.2                 7,201.6 

Servicing the Domestic Debt    3,665.7                 1,032.0 

Elections and Voting           273.1                   271.9 

Regional Subsidies and         1,173.7                 1,156.3 
Subventions 

Clearing Accounts              2,516.1                 2,076.6 

Bread Subsidies                294.0                   269.7 

Foreign Economic Activities    4,191.7                 2,703.9 

Budget Loans                   --                      2,276.3 

Investment, Conversion and     722.5                   700.0 
Other Credits 

Other Expenditures             2,237.8                 106.5 

Total Expenditures             45,357.5                34,079.3 


  One more method for the financial support of enterprises of 
the national economy was centralized importing, i.e., purchasing 
goods abroad for the enterprises' needs using the state's 
resources (basically through foreign loans). The enterprises 
partially paid for the imported goods by using the so-called 
subsidy factors. The amounts of these subsidies for 1992 and 
1993 are shown below. 


Table 5. Subsidies for Import Purchases of Goods Using Foreign Credits (in 
Millions of U.S. Dollars) 

Types of Credits    Amount Used                   Amount of Subsidies 

                    1992           1993           1992           1993 

Raw Material and    7,360          1,860          5,980          1,195 
Foodstuffs 

Investment          2,000          900            1,300          540 

Total               9,360          2,760          7,280          1,735 


<H5>  3.5.2. Financial Support of the Agro-Industrial Complex </H5>
  Proceeding on the basis of the necessity of state support of 
the Agro-Industrial Complex during the period of the transition 
to market relations and its priority in the Russian Government's 
economic policy, R3.422 trillion rubles were provided for this 
purpose in the past year in the republic budget and they were 
distributed according to the following basic directions: 
  -- R1.260 trillion for the funding of federal capital 
construction programs; 
  -- R1.234 trillion to compensate for the difference in 
interest rates for preferential credits for agricultural 
commodity producers; 
  -- R444 billion for subsidies to cover part of the 
expenditures for the production of agricultural products, 
including subsidies for breeding and selected seed growing, 
compensation of part of the cost of fertilizers, energy 
resources and insurance payments and other subsidies; 
  -- and R372 billion for operating expenses for the 
maintenance of budget-controlled institutions and the 
implementation of measures in the Agro-Industrial Complex. 
  The strained situation involving the budget revenues was 
also 
reflected in the funding of the planned expenditures for the 
Agro-Industrial Complex: R2.198 trillion were allocated for all 
directions or 64 percent of the planned amount. The agricultural 
commodity producers were fully compensated through budget funds 
for the difference in the interest rates for preferential 
credits and the operating expenses of the ministries and 
departments were funded by 85 percent. 
  The situation involving investments and subsidies is worse. 
The lowest fulfillment occurs in the policy for state capital 
investments -- agriculture was allocated for this purpose 34.5 
percent of the planned amounts. Funding at the level of 35 
percent was provided for the subsidies to agricultural 
producers, including for such directions as breeding, selected 
seed growing and insurance. However, under the conditions of the 
strict limitation on financial resources, the budget funds were 
spent on extremely inefficient types of subsidies -- the 
acquisition of fertilizer and agricultural equipment, i.e., it 
was not agriculture which was supported, but rather, inefficient 
industrial production. 
  Substantial support is being given to the Agro-Industrial 
Complex using tax methods as well: all the agricultural 
producers have been exempted from paying the tax on profits 
derived from the production of agricultural products and, as of 
1 January 1994, from their processing. The total amount of the 
tax breaks for agriculture are estimated to be R500 billion 
based on 1993's results. However, a number of the breaks granted 
turned out to be extremely ineffective and they are being used 
for tax evasion. Thus, the farms have been exempted from payment 
of the VAT when selling their own products and acquiring 
agricultural equipment and instances have already been recorded 
when the agricultural equipment purchased by the farms simply 
cannot be housed on their plots of land. 
  One of the most important directions in the Ministry of 
Finance's work was the extension of credit for 1993 grain 
harvest purchases, for which FKK Roskhleboprodukt [farm sales 
concern Russian cereal products] was allocated R1.566 trillion 
in budget loans at 10 percent annual interest. In addition, R455 
billion in centralized credit resources were directed toward 
covering expenses associated with the purchasing of grain and 
oilseeds. 
  At the same time, the agrarian lobby asserted that the 
allocated funds were insufficient and that the state owed large 
sums (around R600 billion) to the commodity producers. As is 
well known, the problem of the payments for grain arose because 
the state, first of all, promised to purchase an enormous 
quantity of grain, while funding was included in the federal 
budget for purchases not only of grain for federal needs, but 
also for the regions' needs; and second, the state was obligated 
to pay a price for the grain which was approximately 40 percent 
higher than the exchange's price and to index these prices 
monthly by 10 percent. All these decisions were made without 
consideration of the state's financial capabilities and adopted 
despite the Ministry of Finance's position. 
  In addition, and this is an overall problem of the budget, 
the allocated funds were partially used for purposes other than 
the intended ones. The state allocated funds to pay for the 
purchased grain, while Roskhleboprodukt was financing its own 
current expenditures through budget loans. It is obvious that 
the existing state grain-purchasing system needs substantial 
changes and some of them were implemented at the end of 1993. 
  Thus, as of November, the state abandoned the indexing of 
prices for purchased grain, which is now being acquired at lower 
free prices and a decision was made about the repeated use of 
issued budget loans to complete the payments for the grain from 
1993's harvest and for payments for grain purchased for the 
federal reserves in 1994. 
  In 1994, RF entities will independently provide for their 
own 
needs for grain and the products from its processing, forming 
regional reserves proceeding on the basis of the needs and the 
possibilities for funding grain purchases using the funds of the 
corresponding budgets. 
  Over the course of the year, R3.181 trillion in centralized 
credit resources, including R1.650 trillion in preferential 
credits, were allocated for conducting spring planting and 
harvesting operations, for purchasing and warehousing potatoes 
and vegetables for winter storage, for acquiring fodder, and for 
purchasing sugar beet, wool, flax and hemp to the agricultural 
commodity producers and enterprises and organizations of 
Roskompishcheprom [RF Committee on the Food and Processing 
Industry] and the fishing industry. 
  In the second half of 1993, after the refinancing rate for 
Central Bank credits had increased substantially, it became 
clear that granting preferential credits is not only extremely 
inefficient, but also a highly expensive system for rendering 
financial support. As is well known, preferential credits to 
enterprises were granted at an annual interest rate of 28 
percent, while the budget financed the difference between the 
Central Bank's rate and this level. As soon as, during the 
summer, the Central Bank's refinancing rate exceeded 128 
percent, the budget expenditures to cover the difference in the 
percentage rates became larger than the amount of credit. Giving 
direct financial aid from the budget is turning out to be 
cheaper and this was one of the main reasons for the 
government's refusal to grant preferential credits (25 September 
1993). 
  The financial support of the Agro-Industrial Complex in 
Russia, apparently, will still be maintained still for a quite 
long time to come, but, in order for it to have a real effect, 
the government should abandon the policy of allocating the 
largest possible amount of financial resources and should focus 
attention, rather, on determining those specific programs, the 
funding of which actually helps the agricultural producers and 
produces a return in the interests of society. 
<H5>  3.5.3. Investments </H5>
  In 1993, the state continued to be the largest investor in 
the economy, while the investments were aimed at both the 
production and the nonproduction spheres. 
  The funding of state centralized capital investments, as an 
unprotected item of the federal budget, was carried out in 1993 
based on the extent of revenues received, as a result of which, 
with annual allocations in the amount of R3,890.3 billion, 
R2,235.9 billion were actually funded, or 57 percent of the 
plan. In comparison with 1992, when, with planned allocations of 
R346.6 billion, the actual funding came to R303.3 billion, or 
87.5 percent -- the situation has deteriorated. 
  Under the conditions of the extreme limitedness of budget 
funds, state preferential credit for investment needs, allocated 
in the amount of R400 billion and transferred completely to the 
borrowers, became one of the basic methods for state support of 
federal programs and projects of statewide importance in 1993. 
In 1992, the amount of state preferential credits extended came 
to R105 billion. 
  At the same time, it must be noted that the funds for 
investment credits and direct budget investments in the 
production sphere were scattered among a large number of 
projects and were often aimed at the realization of projects 
with long construction time frames. As a result, according to 
the State Committee for Statistics' data, of the 149 projects, 
the construction of which was begun in 1993 using budget 
allocations, only 10 have been placed into service, while, of 
the 504 projects, toward the construction of which investment 
credit funds have been directed, only 18 have been placed into 
service. 
  In 1993, within the framework of the government-approved 
State Program for Conversion of the Defense Industry for the 
Years 1993- 1995, funding of programs for the reconfiguration of 
defense orders toward the production of civilian products 
continued. Monetary assets on a repayment basis in the amount 
of R300 billion have been allocated for this purpose from the 
republic budget. In connection with the limitedness of the 
indicated credit resources, funding has been implemented for 
only 734 conversion programs, including 459 totally completed in 
1993. 
  Production capacities for the production of new civil 
aviation equipment, equipment for the oil and gas production 
industry and the processing industries of the Agro-Industrial 
Complex, many types of complicated household equipment, medical 
equipment, and environmental protection products, have been 
brought on line through the conversion credits to the defense 
complex enterprises. According to the enterprises' calculations, 
the expected increase in capacities as a whole for all the 
convertible enterprises will come to R1.560 trillion worth of 
civilian products per year. 
  An important task in 1993 was providing the conditions for 
the development of the "Housing" Program. As a result of the 
realization of the first stages of the "Housing" Program, the 
slump in housing construction, which had been going on for 4 
years, was successfully stopped. According to the preliminary 
data, residential houses with an overall space of 42 million 
square meters have been started, which amounts to 101 percent as 
against 1992's starts. 
  Over the course of the past year, the structure of housing 
construction with respect to financing sources was successfully 
changed substantially, sharply increasing the share of 
non-budget financing of housing construction. In accordance with 
the program, federal budget funds were directed toward the 
construction of housing for military personnel. At the same 
time, there was a significant decrease in housing starts using 
the assets of state enterprises and organizations, while the 
construction of housing by individuals building for themselves 
on their own increased by 10 percent, by joint-stock companies 
by more than 15 percent and by economic partnerships by nearly 
35 percent. 
<H5>  3.5.4. Financing the "Northern" Shipment </H5>
  On orders of the Governmental Commission on Credit Policy, 
preferential credits in the amount of around R2 trillion were 
allocated for the financing of early shipments in 1993 and 
compensatory payments were made in the amount of around R200 
billion. The favorable terms for issuing these credits and the 
poor return make this type of credits almost a form of gratis 
budget financing. 
  The necessity of these expenditures is motivated by the 
remoteness of the Far North's regions, the harsh climatic 
conditions, the limited navigation periods and the industrial 
specialization. However, this justification does not stand up to 
criticism. The relatively high level of expenditures for the 
establishment of reserves means that the prices for the shipped 
goods should be higher than in the country's central oblasts. In 
point of fact, the consumer prices in these regions are 
appreciably higher, despite the preferential nature of the 
credits extended for the shipments. 
  This fact and the numerous abuses involving the preferential 
special-purpose credits are proof that this mechanism for 
financing the shipments is extremely inefficient and it needs to 
be changed. In connection with this, it is advisable in the 
first stage to budget delivery assistance and, in the second 
stage, to transfer the financial resources to the local 
administrations on a non-repayment basis. Under conditions when 
the interest rates for deposits in commercial banks are 
favorable, there is a possibility for maintaining the actual 
value of working capital initially transferred from the republic 
budget. 
<H5>  3.5.5. Reinforcing the Social Orientation of the Expenditures </H5>
  In 1993, a real increase occurred in the social significance 
of the budget expenditures. Spending for social and cultural 
measures increased in real terms from 7.1 percent of the GDP in 
1992 to 7.5 percent. The level of the actual expenditures for 
social and cultural measures increased by 6 percent in 
comparison with 1992, while the actual expenditures for the 
needs of education and health care increased by a factor of 1.3. 
The actual funding of science increased by a fourth. 
  Over the course of 1993, the indexing of pensions was 
carried 
out three times, the amounts of social allowances and 
compensatory payments for children were increased repeatedly, 
compensation for feeding children and for purchasing clothes for 
children was started, the decision was made to introduce in 1994 
a single allowance for each child, regardless of the family's 
average per capita income, payments of an allowance for bread 
have been made to low-income categories of citizens, and state 
financial support was given to public organizations for the 
handicapped. A decison was made about additional material 
support for citizens for special services to Russia. Support was 
implemented for young students receiving scholarships and free 
rooms in dormitories, nutritional subsidies are being made, 
travel benefits are being granted and health-improvement 
measures are being carried out. 
  State financial aid is being given to television and radio 
broadcasting, the periodical press and cultural institutions. At 
the same time, 26 especially valuable sites of the cultural 
heritage of the peoples of Russia are being funded from the RF 
federal budget. Among them are the GABT [State Academic Bolshoy 
Theater] of Russia, the State Kremlin Palace, the MGU [Moscow 
State University], the State Scientific Library, the State 
Russian Museum, the State Hermitage, and the State Tretyakov 
Gallery. 
  In 1993, the Russian Government adopted a series of measures 
for the support of science, state scientific grants have been 
established for Russia's prominent scientists and for talented 
young scientists, provisions have been made for monthly 
supplementary payments for the academic degrees of doctor of 
science and candidate of science, as well as for members of the 
RAN [Russian Academy of Sciences] for the academic titles of 
academician and corresponding member. 
  Under the conditions of the harsh inflation and the shortage 
of funds, the resources for the normal functioning of social, 
cultural and scientific institutions must be found also through 
more efficient use within the sectors themselves. 
  Over the course of the last few years, measures have not 
been 
carried out for the structural reorganization of these sectors, 
as a result of which the available network is being used 
inefficiently and the proof of this is in the low workload of 
the children's preschool and medical institutions and the 
decrease in the fullness of the classes in general education 
schools and in the groups of kindergartens and nurseries and the 
like. 
  It is impossible to consider as rational the use of budget 
allocations over the course of recent years by higher 
educational institutions in which, given the decrease in the 
student body, an increase is taking place in the size of the 
professorial and teaching staff. At the same time, the 
calculated number of students assigned to a single teacher 
amounts to an insignificant figure. 
  It is impossible to consider as rational a system for the 
social protection of the population, which is oriented toward 
the widest possible circle of recipients, when the recipients of 
budget subsidies are both the truly needy and also people with 
ultrahigh incomes. 
  In view of the insufficiency of financial assets, the state 
can no longer maintain the number of scientific organizations 
which were inherited from past years. In order to ward off the 
currently occurring spontaneous decrease in the scientific 
research sphere, it is advisible that, in 1994, budget 
allocations be aimed basically at the development of the 
priority directions of basic and exploratory research. The 
funding of developments of an applied nature should be carried 
out using budget funds for the funding of NIOKR [research and 
development], bank credits, and advance funding on the part of 
enterprises which are consumers of scientific products and other 
non-budget sources. 
<H5>  3.6. Budget Federalism </H5>
  The federal budget's mutual relations with the budgets of 
the 
regions (budget federalism) were one of the must acute problems 
of 1993. Everyone remembers the crisis of August and September, 
when more than 30 regions made the decision not to transfer tax 
receipts to the federal budget. This behavior had been partly 
provoked by the lack of funds in the republic's Ministry of 
Finance for fulfilling the obligations for financial support of 
the regions, which were contained in 1993's planned budget. 
  In 1993, the old system of the mutual relations of budgets, 
based on the coordination of all the figures for the revenues 
and expenditures of the regional budgets in Moscow, was 
retained. Undoubtedly, in these coordinations, some of the 
regions gained relatively more, some relatively less, but 
everyone won, and the only loser was the federal budget, for 
which the burden of the financial support of the regions 
increased. The losing regions, in trying to recoup their losses, 
"perforated" for themselves the government's decrees or the 
president's edicts with obligatory financial injections 
(frequently, the entire text of a document consisted of the 
items "The Ministry of Finance shall provide..."). As a result 
the losers gained, while the winners lost and everything was 
repeated again. Based on 1993's results, there were almost no 
regions, for the support of which a separate document had not 
been adopted. 
  If all the methods of financial support from the federal 
budget are considered (subsidies, subventions, clearing accounts 
and the individual standards for deductions from the VAT into 
the regional budgets), then, in the 1993 budget, 72 regions 
should have received financial aid from the Center, but, in 
point of fact, however, there was not a single region which 
would not receive this aid in one form or another. 
  Over the course of 1993, never settled were the budget 
mutual 
relations with Tatarstan, Bashkortostan, Yakutia and Chechnya. 
In the second half of the year, temporary agreements were 
reached with the first three listed republics as part of the RF 
about their participation in partially covering the federal 
budget's expenditures. However, their validity expired as of the 
end of 1993 and the problem of the interbudget mutual relations 
with the indicated federation entities is again becoming one of 
the "hottest." 
  The situation in the area of budget federalism, to a large 
extent, is unique. The existence of 89 federation entities 
determines the complexity of a structure which is supposed to 
satisfy everyone, but if all the differences of a historical, 
geographical, climatic and ethnic nature and so on are added to 
this, then the task is exceptionally complicated. 
  In 1994, Russia is entering the period of implementing the 
most serious reform of the budget mutual relations between the 
federal and regional levels of power on the basis of the 
division of responsibility for solving the economic and social 
problems of the development of the country and the regions by 
means of the corresponding distribution of state expenditures 
and revenues. 
  Presidential Edict No 2268 of 22 December 1993 on the 
Formation of the Russian Federation's Republic Budget and the 
Mutual Relations with the Budgets of the Russian Federation's 
Entities laid the foundation for a new system and provides for 
its construction on the following principles: 
  -- the consistent differentiation of the responsibility of 
the republic, regional and local authorities in conformity with 
the federative organization of the state and the differentiation 
on this basis of the expenditures of the different levels' 
budgets so that the regional and local organs of power would 
have sufficiently broad independence in the economic policy. The 
division of the expenditures should be implemented in such a 
manner as to bring them as close as possible to the 
administrative unit, in the interests of which these 
expenditures are being carried out and to avoid thereby their 
unnecessary centralization; 
  -- the centralization of revenues at the republic level 
should be implemented exclusively for the purpose of the 
realization of statewide economic and social programs, to ensure 
the stability of state finances and the monetary system, as well 
as the redistribution of financial resources for the purpose of 
equalizing the development of the regions. The preservation and 
strengthening of a unified state is possible only on the basis 
of the independence of the federal and territorial budgets and 
the equal participation of all the territories in the funding of 
the federal government's expenditures through the application of 
common principles for raising the republic budget's revenues. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-USR-004L-35A>      Figure 12. The Share of Local Budgets in the Revenues and Expenditures of the Consolidated </FIG>


  Various schemes will be used during the division of the 
revenue receipts between the levels of the budgets: the transfer 
to the regional budgets of a portion of the federal tax receipts 
(with respect to the VAT), the addition of rates (the profits 
tax) and the division of the sources of revenue receipts. The 
regional and local organs of power have been granted the right 
to impose on their own additional regional and local taxes for 
replenishing the revenue portion of their own budgets. 
  Special attention during the formation of the budget for 
1994 
is being paid to solving the problem of the asymmetry of the 
territories' financial supply -- for various reasons, the 
majority of the territories lack revenue sources of their own 
for the funding of expenditures even at a level which ensures 
the satisfaction of the minimum social needs. In all countries, 
this problem is being solved by means of the redistribution of a 
portion of the financial resources through a central budget 
which favors territories which are experiencing a shortage of 
funds. In Russia, it was and is being solved in a similar 
fashion, but, without a common approach in the mutual relations 
between the center and the regions in matters of the 
redistribution of budget funds, some regions are receiving 
investments, tax breaks and enhanced standards for the formation 
of the budget's revenue base: others are not receiving any of 
these things and, what is more, they have been forced to bear 
the additional burden of collecting the financial resources. 
  Understanding the necessity of establishing a clear system 
for the redistribution of resources within the budget system, it 
is being proposed that the following mechanism be used. A 
special budget fund is established for the regions' financial 
support (in order to increase the subsidized regions' revenue 
base), into which will be entered 22 percent of the VAT receipts 
(from the portion subject to entry into the republic budget). 
Distribution of this fund's assets will be carried out 
automatically to the extent of the funds received by it in 
proportions approved by the government simultaneously with the 
approval of the republic budget. During the determination of the 
proportions for the distribution of this fund's assets among the 
regions, it is assumed that a number of factors will be 
considered (the actual transfers in 1993, the regions' tax 
potential and the correlation of the regional budget's 
expenditures, allocated on a per capita basis, with the average 
for this economic region). 
  In addition, the Russian Government will continue solving 
the 
problem of the equalization of the various regions' economic 
development levels, which will be solved through the realization 
of the federal special-purpose programs. 
  At the same time, the government intends to abandon making 
decisions about granting various credits (first and foremost, 
for remitting customs duties) to the regions. 
  These steps will make it possible to systematize 
organizationally and quantitatively the rendering of financial 
support to the regions, but, at the same time, they will require 
the strengthening of control over the budget planning and 
verification of the validity of the budget expenditures of the 
territories appealing for assistance. 
<H5>  3.7. Funding the Deficit of Government Expenditures </H5>
  The evaluation of this indicator in conformity with 
international practice is of essential importance, inasmuch as 
it makes it possible to establish the real extent of the 
government's financial deficit. According to the IMF's 
methodology, the overall amount of the expanded government 
deficit is determined as the sum: 
  (1) of the net credit to the government from the banking 
system, which includes the Central Bank and the commercial 
banks, as well as the Ministry of Finance's use of its own net 
international reserves for the funding of government 
expenditures; 


Table 6. The Deficit of Russia's Republic Budget in 1992 (with Consideration 
of the State's Non-Budget Expenditures Included in the Budget in 1993) 

                               Billions of Rubles     Percentage of the GDP 

1. Domestic Funding            3,424                  18.9 

1.1. The Republic Budget's     1,009                  5.6 
Deficit 

1.2. Central Bank Credits to   864                    4.8 
the Ministry of Finance 
Apart from the Budget 

1.3. Credits to CIS            1.091                  6.0 
Countries 

1.4. Credits to                460                    2.5 
Roskhleboprodukt 

2. Foreign Funding             3,186                  17.6 

2.1. Financial Credits         536                    3.0 

2.2. Associated Credits        2,650                  14.6 

Total                          6,610                  36.5 


  (2) of the net funding of the government (federal and local 
budgets) from the non-banking sector; 
  (3) and of the ruble equivalent of the magnitude of the 
increase in foreign loans apart from the IMF credits (which are 
reflected in the change in the Ministry of Finance's net 
international reserves), plus the ruble equivalent of the unpaid 
foreign debt obligations (with due consideration of 
restructuring). 


Table 7. Funding of the Expanded Government Deficit in 1993 

                             In Billions of Rubles   As a Percentage of the 
                                                     GDP 

The Expanded Government      14,816                  9.2 
Deficit 

Including: 

Domestic Funding             8,865                   5.5 

Including: 

-- Net Central Bank of       7,900                   4.7 
Russia Credit 

= Credit to the Federal      9,860 
Budget 

= Assets in Accounts of      -1,300 
Local Budgets (*) 

= Assets in Accounts of      -700 
Non-Budget Funds (*) 

-- Use of the Government's   1,494                   0.9 
Net International Reserves 


-- Net Credit of the Rest    -700                    -0.4 
of the Banking System 

-- Treasury Bonds and        185                     0.1 
Other Securities Belonging 
to the Banking System 

Foreign Funding              5,951                   3.7 

-- Loans from Foreign        4,348                   2.7 
States 

-- Unpaid Foreign Debt       1,566                   1.0 
Obligations 


  At the time of the report's preparation, comprehensive 
information on 1993's results was lacking and this is why 
estimates have been used for a number of items. First and 
foremost, this pertains to the amount of unpaid foreign debt 
obligations and the net credit from the rest of the banking 
system. The preliminary estimates indicate that the expanded 
government deficit in 1993 amounted to 9.2 percent of the GDP, 
including 5.5 percent due to domestic funding and 3.7 percent to 
foreign funding. The same indicator for 1992, calculated 
according to the IMF's methodology, amounted to 36.5 percent of 
the GDP, i.e., in 1993, the deficit had been reduced almost by a 
factor of 4. 
  But this result in and of itself, although it is undoubtedly 
important, cannot serve as the sole indicator to which attention 
must be paid during the analysis of the results of the budget's 
execution in 1993. The funding sources for the government's 
expanded deficit in 1993 are shown in Table 7. 
  It is impossible not to note the qualitative shift which 
occurred in 1993 in the methods for funding it. Of course, the 
basic methods for funding the deficit, as before, were the 
Central Bank's credits and foreign credits, the share of which 
came to 75 percent of the overall amount of the budget deficit. 
<H5>  3.8. Servicing the Domestic Debt </H5>
  In 1993, for the first time in the post-revolutionary 
period, 
the entire state domestic debt of the former USSR, accepted by 
Russia, was legalized. Simultaneously with the budget for 1993, 
calculations of the amount of the state debt and a projection of 
its upper limit were submitted to the Supreme Soviet. On the 
whole, based on 1993's results, the total domestic state debt 
amounted to R35.3 trillion, which is equivalent to approximately 
22 percent of the GDP (see Table 8). 


Table 8. The Russian Federation's State Domestic Debt on 1 January 1994 (in 
Billions of Rubles) 

                              Amount                  Terms 

State Loan, 1992              15                      45 percent annual 
                                                      interest, advantageous 

USSR Treasury Bonds           --                      In accordance with a 
                                                      presidential edict, with 
                                                      indexing by a factor of 
                                                      3 of the interest rates 
                                                      for 1992 

USSR Special-Purpose Loan     2,500                   Estimate proceeding on 
for 1990                                              the basis of the 
                                                      observance of the 
                                                      borrowing terms, 50- 
                                                      percent compensation for 
                                                      motor vehicles 

Indebtedness to State         25.3                    8 percent annual 
Committee for Insurance                               interest 

Special-Purpose Deposits      704                     Proceeding on the basis 
and Checks for Motor                                  of full compensation for 
Vehicles and Indebtedness                             1991's indebtedness and 
to Agro-Industrial Complex                            a 60-fold indexing of 
Workers                                               the indebtedness for 
                                                      subsequent years 

State Domestic Loan, 1991     80                      30 years at 5 percent 
                                                      annual interest 

State Russian Domestic Loan   0.35                    16 years at 5 percent 
                                                      annual interest 

Indebtedness to Bank of       12,267.5                Credit agreement at 
Russia for Credits to the                             prevailing interest 
Government, Issued Before 1 
January 1993 

Difference in Prices for      61                      Indebtedness to Central 
Agricultural Raw Materials,                           Bank being formalized at 
Uncompensated in 1991                                 prevailing interest 

Guarantees Issued by the      1,899.8                 Indebtedness to Central 
Government                                            Bank being formalized at 
                                                      prevailing interest 

Deficit of Republic Budget,   63                      Indebtedness to Central 
Formed in 1991                                        Bank being formalized at 
                                                      prevailing interest 

Indebtedness to Russian       128.8                   Being paid off 
Federation Central Bank for 
credit resources of former 
Savings Bank 

Gold Certificates             49.1                    6.375 percent 

State Short-Term Bonds        185                     Discounted 

Federal Budget Deficit        17,040.7                Issuing of state bonds 
(1993)                                                in the amount of R320 
                                                      billion and Central Bank 
                                                      credits 

Domestic Debt of Russian      330 
Federation Central Bank, 
Accepted from Former USSR 

Total                         35,349.55 

GDP                           162,000 

State Domestic Debt as a      21.8 
Percentage of the GDP 


  In 1993, the structure of the state debt was changed. The 
share of the indebtedness to the Central Bank for credits to 
enterprises under a government guarantee decreased from 47.9 
percent to 12.9 percent. The share of Central Bank credits to 
the government to cover the budget deficit increased from 
one-third to 83.6 percent. The share of the indebtedness to the 
Savings Bank decreased from 8.1 percent to 0.9 percent (in 
connection with the repayment of part of the indebtedness and 
the increase in the total state debt). 
  The paramount strategic goal -- the transition to 
non-inflationary funding of the budget deficit -- was not 
attained in 1993. In all, 2-3 percent of the total federal 
budget deficit (R330 billion) was covered through the sale of 
state securities. However, the most important result is the 
establishment, jointly with the Central Bank within a very short 
time frame, of a stable infrastructure for the state securities 
market, providing them with high liquidity and the gradual 
restoration of confidence in the state as a borrower. 
  The most complicated problem in the debt servicing plan in 
1993 was the problems of the former USSR's debts to the public. 
The conversion of the USSR 1982 loan into RSFSR 1992 loans and 
the redemption of USSR treasury bonds in the hands of the people 
made it possible to reduce and to legalize the indebtedness to 
the public for securities. Currently, the people are holding 
bonds for the 1982 loan in the amount of R15 billion, since the 
yield for them has been raised twice and amounted at the 
beginning of 1994 to 45 percent. 
  In the amount of the entire state debt, the share of the 
commodity debts to the public continued to increase because of 
the increase in prices for consumer goods. The indebtedness to 
the holders of special-purpose checks which gave them the right 
to acquire motor vehicles in 1991 has been paid off and 120,000 
holders of these documents received full compensation. The 
indebtedness for Urozhay-90 [Harvest-90] checks has been 
partially paid off by the lessors of 1991's agricultural 
products. Something on the order of R160 billion was spent for 
these purposes in 1993. At the same time, drafts of the 
appropriate documents which provide for the complete repayment 
in 1994 of the state's remaining indebtedness for commodity 
obligations have been submitted to the government. 
<H8>  The Basic Tasks for 1994 </H8>
  1. Budget reform has become the most important necessity for 
the state. Budget reform should be all-encompassing and include 
inherently a new budget classification, a new system of budget 
federalism, a change in the principles of budget planning and a 
change in the structure of the Ministry of Finance and the 
financial system. It is understandable that the execution of a 
budget cannot stop for even a single day and this is why the 
reforms must be implemented "on the run," and thus they will be 
difficult and painful. But, unless the system for budget 
planning and the budget's execution are brought into line with 
the new realities, the budget will remain the "Achilles heel" of 
the economic policy in Russia. 
  2. The greatest attention should be paid to strengthening 
the 
budget's revenue base. This can be achieved by improving the tax 
legislation, strengthening the tax service and abandoning the 
policy of granting individual breaks to enterprises, no matter 
how large and important they are. 
  3. A key task is the banning of a budget deficit increase 
funded through emission sources above 1993's level. On the one 
hand, a drop in production leads to a drop in the actual level 
of tax receipts just as the budget-funding requirements are 
being regularly indexed based on the inflation rate. On the 
other hand, undoubtedly, the sources of non-tax receipts (of 
which the state made good use in 1993's second half) will 
gradually dry up (the gold reserves will dwindle and the Central 
Bank's profit will decrease as the refinancing rate decreases) 
and, given a lack of real changes in the budget policy, the 
state will not be able to resist the pressure for an increase in 
budget expenditures and the deficit's level. 
  4. During the planning of budget revenues and expenditures, 
it is necessary to proceed on the basis of realistic rather than 
"politicized" estimates of the dynamics of the GDP and the main 
budget-forming indicators. It is better to underestimate the 
amount of possible revenue receipts going into the budget, than 
to overestimate them and to run into an acute shortage of 
financial resources. 
  5. In 1994, it is necessary to complete the process of 
including in the budget the quasi-fiscal operations which had 
previously been funded through Central Bank centralized credits 
-- agriculture's seasonal needs, the shipping of consumer goods 
and fuel to the regions of the Far North and territories 
comparable to them and the like. At the same time, the tolerable 
amount of a deficit within the limits of 6-7 percent of the GDP 
should be a legislative limitation for any plans for increasing 
the budget's spending section. 
  6. It is advisable that the federal budget be strengthened 
with the inclusion in its spending section of obligatory 
reserves for the basic spending directions. These directions can 
be used by order of the government only in the event that the 
inflation indicators in the first and second quarters will 
exceed the forecasts which have served as the basis for the 
spending plan. In this way, the constant revising of all the 
budget's indicators, which disorganizes its execution, should be 
stopped. 
  7. It is necessary to repudiate a whole series of statutes 
of 
previously adopted legislative acts and government decrees, 
which are absolutely unfounded from a financial viewpoint. 
Examples of these kinds of decisions are the law on social 
guarantees for inhabitants of the North, the Law on Grain, the 
Law on Social Guarantees for Military Personnel, the 
government's decree on compensation for transport costs during 
"shipping to the North" and many others. The execution of these 
decisions fully would result in the country's financial collapse 
within the shortest of time frames. 
  8. It is necessary to develop sequentially the state 
securities market, switching to lengthier time frames for their 
repayment so that the funds accumulated in this manner would 
cover a substantial share of the federal budget's deficit. 
<H5>  4. Monetary Policy </H5>
  In appraising Russia's monetary policy in 1993 as moderately 
harsh, it must be emphasized that its realization was carried 
out while there was constant opposition to the course pursued by 
the government. It is important that, even under the conditions 
of the primitive forms and methods of this policy and the lack 
of the necessary instruments, the Ministry of Finance managed to 
force the Central Bank to change its activities to a great 
extent. 
  The conflicts which arose during this time and which, in a 
number of instances, grew into open confrontation between the 
two departments, undoubtedly complicated the financial 
stabilization process. Meanwhile, it is obvious that, without 
pressure on the Central Bank, it would not have been possible to 
achieve the appreciable positive results in this area. 
  The basic instruments of the anti-inflationary monetary 
policy were: 
  1. Limiting the absolute amounts of centralized credits 
granted by the Central Bank to the government to cover the 
budget deficit and to the economy. 
  2. Standardizing and gradually raising the Central Bank's 
official interest rate for centralized credits to the economy. 
  3. Stabilizing the ruble's exchange rate by means of Central 
Bank interventions in the buying and selling of currency in the 
currency market. 
  Of the named instruments, it is likely that the most 
effective one was the limiting of the quarterly absolute 
increases in centralized credit indebtedness, the volume of 
which, as before, is the chief factor in the increase of the 
total money supply. The doubling of the interest rate for the 
Central Bank's centralized credit to the economy exerted 
noticeable influence on the formation of the credit market. At 
the same time, of disproportionately great importance was the 
Central Bank's buying and selling of currency in the currency 
market, as a result of which there was an additional "infusion" 
into the economy of approximately R2.5 trillion worth of credit 
emissions (see the section on the currency policy [5.1.]). 
<H5>  4.1. Centralized Credits </H5>
  In 1993, there was a consecutive limiting of the amounts 
of the centralized extenditure of credit -- of Central Bank 
credits to the government and the economy. Given the relative 
decrease in the share of these credits with respect to the GDP 
from 35 percent in 1992 to 12.8 percent in 1993, the proportion 
of centralized credits in the total amount of credit extended 
decreased insignificantly: from 88.2 percent to 85 percent, 
which testifies to the weakness of the banking system and the 
inadequate development of the loan market. The extremely high 
proportion of centralized credits is one of the main 
shortcomings of the credit policy. 
  The limiting of the absolute amounts of the increase in 
centralized credit indebtedness is the result of the work of the 
Governmental Commission on Credit Policy, which, guided by the 
joint declaration of the government and the Central Bank of 22 
May 1993, began, as of the second quarter, to establish 
quarterly limits for centralized credit extension with a 
breakdown by sectors and individual enterprises. 
  The largest targets of the centralized credits, just as in 
previous years, were: the Agro-Industrial Complex and the Fuel 
and Energy Complex, as well as the shipments to the Far North. 
The key thing which differed from the established practice was 
the fact that, in 1993, the imposed harsh limiters on the 
increase in centralized credit indebtedness were maintained 
consistently (with the exception of the third quarter), which, 
with all the costs, provided the minimally necessary control 
over the increase in the amounts of credit extended and the 
inflation rate. 
  The most important event in the realization of the goals of 
the monetary policy in 1993 was the adoption by the government 
on 25 September 1993 of the decision on the abolition of 
subsidized credits, by which it was established that, 
henceforth, all centralized credits to sectors of the national 
economy and individual enterprises should be granted at a common 
interest rate by the Central Bank. Along with the gradual 
raising of the overall level of the rates (to a favorable level 
by year's end), this decision made it possible to reduce the 
unfounded demand for centralized credits. 
  At the same time, an unresolved problem is ensuring the 
repayment of centralized credits to the economy, which were 
granted for a term of up to 1 year, which is undoubtedly 
inadequate for sectors and enterprises with a lengthy production 
cycle or production of a seasonal nature. The constant 
extensions, in point of fact, are converting these credits into 
subsidized financing and hidden subsidies. The Central Bank is 
carrying out the issuing of centralized credits to the end 
recipients through commercial banks, which by far are not always 
interested in and capable of ensuring their timely repayment. 


Table 9. Information on Credits Issued by the Bank of Russia (the Status on 28 December 1993, in Billions of Rubles) 

Consumers      First Quarter                                   Second Quarter                                                  Third Quarter                                                                 Fourth Quarter 

               Decision    Actually    Actually    Actual      Limit on        Decision    Actually    Actually    Actual      Limit on        Limit         Decision    Actually    Actually    Actual      Limit on        Decision    Actually    Actually    Actual 
               on          Issued      Paid Off    Increase    Increase in     on          Issued      Paid Off    Increase    Increase in     Refinement    on          Issued      Paid Off    Increase    Increase in     on          Issued      Paid Off    Increase 
               Issuing                                         Commercial      Issuing                                         Commercial                    Issuing                                         Commercial      Issuing 
                                                               Credit                                                          Credit                                                                        Credit 
                                                               Indebtedness                                                    Indebtedness                                                                  Indebtedness 
                                                               on 9 April                                                      on 18 April                                                                   on 11 October 


Total          3,074       3,336       465         2,908       2,800           3,661.5     3,399       1,402       1,997       4,000           5,675         6,163.3     6,672       903         5,769       6,000           6,128.8     7,372       2,115       5,257 

Credits to     2,422       2,072       352         1,720       1,300           2,200       1,496       885         611         2,100           2,825         3,325       3,808       520         3,2 88      4,000           4,660       4,755       308         4,447 
RF Ministry 
of Finance 

Including 

-- To Cover    1,300       1,300                   1,300       1,300           1,500       1 ,300      435         865         2,100           2,700         3,200       3,200       435         2,765       4,000           4 ,660      4,660       290         4,370 
the Budget 
Deficit 

--             150                                                             300                                                                                       222                     222                                     77                      77 
Conversion 

--                                                                             400                                                                                       282                     282                                     18                      18 
Investments 

-- Budget      750         750         330         420                                                 390         - 390                                                             30          -30 
Expenditure 
Advances 

-- Fuel and    200                                                                         196                     196                         125           125         4                       4 
Energy 
Complex 

-- Funding     22          22          11          11                                                  11          - 11 
of 
Geological 
Operations 
Performed in 
1992 

-- Working                             11          -11                                                 49          - 49                                                              55          -55                                                 18          -18 
Capital 

-- Other                                                                                                                                       25                                    .94         -. 94 

2. Credits     625         1,264       113         1,188       150             1,461.5     1,903       517         1,386       1,900           2,850         2,838.3     2,864       383         2,4 81      2,000           1,468.8     2,617       1,807       810 
to 
Commercial 
Banks 


  In addition, granting credit to financially unstable sectors 
of the economy places them in an even more difficult position, 
inasmuch as they are known to be unable to pay even the lower 
but still quite high interest for the received resources, not to 
mention the repayment of the debt's basic amount. The increase 
in such credits is also leading to a deterioration of the 
quality of the banking system, in which the share of potentially 
irrecoverable credits is increasing. The adoption by the 
government on 18 November 1993 of the decision on deferring the 
repayment of credits from agriculture, for all practical 
purposes, signifies the first step on the path to the future 
write-off of the indebtedness, as happened repeatedly during the 
time of the old system. 
  In the second quarter, the established limits for 
centralized 
credit extension were realized. The breakdown occurred in the 
third quarter, when, to by-pass the Commission on Credit Policy, 
the Central Bank issued credits to the Agro-Industrial Complex 
and for the shipments to the Far North's regions above the 
established limits, alluding to separate decisions of the 
government and the former RF Supreme Soviet. Then the same 
commission made errors in the estimation of the seasonal demand 
for credits for shipping goods to the Far North's regions, which 
immediately had a telling effect on the rate of inflation, which 
reached a record level by the end of the third quarter. 
  The extraordinary measures undertaken by the Ministry of 
Finance in the fourth quarter made it possible to maintain the 
established limits for centralized credit extension, although it 
must be acknowledged that the repeated early transfers of the 
current year's Central Bank profits for the republic budget's 
needs, as well as the sale of banking assets from the 
government's reserve to the Central Bank, played their own role 
here. 
<H8>  The Basic Task for 1994 </H8>
  The consecutive abandonment of the system of centrally 
distributed credits between sectors of the economy and the 
transition to the generally accepted methods of refinancing of 
the commercial banks. 
<H5>  4.2. The Interest Policy </H5>
  The year's most important achievement is increasing the 
interest rates for Central Bank centralized credits to the 
economy and raising them to a level comparable with the level of 
inflation, as a result of which, in December of 1993, the 
commercial banks' loan rates and even the rate for time deposits 
almost became favorable. The dynamics of the Central Bank's 
official rate for centralized credits to the national economy 
developed as follows: 
  as of 29 December 1991 -- 20 percent 
  as of 10 April 1992 -- 50 percent 
  as of 1 July 1992 -- 80 percent 
  as of 30 March 1993 -- 100 percent 
  as of 2 June 1993 -- 110 percent 
  as of 22 June 1993 -- 120 percent 
  as of 29 June 1993 -- 140 percent 
  as of 15 July 1993 -- 170 percent 
  as of 23 September 1993 -- 180 percent 
  as of 15 October 1993 -- 210 percent. 
  While the Central Bank's rate remained unchanged from May of 
1992 through April of 1993, the commercial banks' average credit 
rates increased continuously and the disparity between them 
increased. The successive raising of the Central Bank's rate 
gradually brought it closer to the market rates, especially 
after the joint declaration of the government and the Central 
Bank of 22 May 1993, which established that the interest rate 
for Central Bank credit to the national economy can not be lower 
than the market rate by more than 7 percent. Beginning as of the 
summer, the raising of the Central Bank's rate began to have a 
noticeable impact on the market rates and was conducive to their 
consecutive increase. The market rates for bank credits for a 
term of 1-3 months increased over the year as a whole from 
85-100 percent to 210-250 percent. 
  At the same time, the lack of a normal bank refinancing 
mechanism, the Central Bank's granting of credits to the 
economy's sectors in significant amounts without repayment 
guarantees and real security and the availability of a 
preferential rate for credits to cover the budget deficit are 
still preventing the Central Bank's rate from being converted 
into a really effective instrument of monetary policy, although 
its raising is also one of the most important reasons for the 
slowing down of inflation and the strengthening of the ruble's 
exchange rate. 
  The interest rates for credits and deposits in Russia differ 
substantially by regions and, as a rule, they are higher in 
regions distant from the main banking centers. Therefore, the 
most important task in the area of the interest policy should be 
the formation of a unified and efficient credit market. In 1993, 
the formation was begun of a market for "short-term money," a 
GKO [State Short-Term Bonds] market, and a fairly large number 
of "sites" for trading interbank credits emerged but this is 
still extremely inadequate. The Central Bank's plans for 
organizingon credit auctions in 1993 remained unrealized. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-USR-004L-42A>      The Central Bank Refinancing Rate and Inflation in 1993 </FIG>


  In characterizing the results of the monetary policy, 
attention must be paid to the fact that even the loan rates over 
the course of almost all of 1993 (excluding December) remained 
substantially below the inflation level and this is why the 
general dissatisfaction with the "too high interest rates" has 
no economic basis whatsoever. The most indicative thing in our 
country is comparison on a monthly basis, but even if the 
international methodology (with capitalization of interest) is 
applied to the Central Bank's rate, then 210 percent is 
equivalent to just 600 percent, while prices over the year 
increased by nearly 900 percent. 
  A shortcoming is the fact that the floating interest rate 
technique, a different type of indexing in order to maintain a 
real equivalent of the basic amount of credit over time, is 
still being used poorly. What is positive, however, is the fact 
that the interstate credits to the CIS countries are being 
recorded as of 1993 in a dollar equivalent with calculation of 
the interest according to the LIBOR [London Interbank Offered 
Rate] rate (see the section on relations with the CIS [4.6.]). 
<H8>  The Basic Tasks for 1994 </H8>
  1. Providing a favorable level of interest rates for bank 
deposits, which will make it possible to restore the interest 
and confidence of the public and legal persons in organized 
methods for saving in Russian rubles and will create conditions 
for investing in the economy. 
  2. Developing an efficient Russia-wide interbank market for 
credits and short-term securities, which will make it possible 
to determine interest rates more efficiently, to equalize their 
level for the regions and to carry out special-purpose 
transactions within the framework of monetary regulation of the 
economy. 
  3. Graduallyy lowering the Central Bank's official rate for 
centralized credits to the national economy, if the tendency 
toward a decrease in the rate of inflation acquires a stable 
nature. 
<H5>  4.3. New Monetary Policy Instruments </H5>
  For the first time in recent decades, the normal issuing 
of state securities in the market was successfully begun in 
Russia. In the market 3- and 6-month state short-term bonds 
(GKO-3 and GKO-6, respectively) and "gold certificates" emerged. 
It is hard to talk about the GKO-6, inasmuch as only one 
floating in all of these types of securities has occurred in the 
market, but the course of events in the market involving the 
other two types of state securities makes it possible to draw 
certain conclusions. 
  First, the market trusted the state which, for the first 
time 
in many years, had decided to borrow funds on a universal basis, 
without coercion or deception. Moreover, apparently, the 
confidence which emerged in the GKO-3s (which had already been 
issued eight times and paid off five times) had also spread to 
the other securities issued by the state. 
  Second, a stable trend toward an increase in demand for the 
state securities is taking shape. Of course, even despite the 
impressive rate of increase in the monthly GKO-3 issues (from R1 
billion in May to R130 billion in December), the transaction 
volumes in this market are remaining substantially below the 
transaction volumes in the currency market, but maintaining the 
established rate of increase in demand for GKOs over the course 
of another 6-8 months will make it possible, provided a firm 
financial policy is persistently pursued, to drive the market's 
total capacity for GKO-3s up to R1 trillion by the middle of 
1994 and up to R2 trillion by the end of 1994 and, at the same 
time, the monthly GKO-3 issue volumes will exceed R1 trillion. 
However, the very short repayment term of these securities 
against a background of decreasing inflation will lead to a 
decrease in their "attractiveness" for the state: an ever larger 
portion of the attracted funds will have to go for paying off 
previous issues. The GKO-3s' total "net" contribution to the 
funding of the budget deficit in 1994 will hardly exceed R1 
trillion. Consequently, in the event of the realization of the 
intended goals for suppressing inflation in 1994, beginning as 
of the fourth quarter, the state will have to "reorient" itself 
toward the longer-term GKO-6s, while a specific steady demand 
for GKO-3s will be maintained by financial speculators. If the 
floating of GKO-6s follows approximately along the same 
trajectory as the GKO-3s, then, by 1994's fourth quarter, the 
limit of a R500 billion monthly issue of these securities may be 
"surpassed," while their contribution to the funding of the 
budget deficit will turn out to be more substantial than that of 
the GKO-3s -- approximately R1.5 trillion. In the final tally, 
by the end of 1994, state securities worth around R5 trillion 
will be circulated in the market at the same time. 
  In September, the government adopted the Decree on the 
Issuing of Gold Certificates by the Ministry of Finance in 1993. 
Each gold certificate is a forward contract for the purchase of 
10 kg of gold at the world price. By doing this, several 
problems are solved at once at the same time: the issuing of 
securities fully backed by a precious metal, the protection of 
investors from inflation and assistance to the development of 
the market for gold and securities. The gold certificates have 
been accepted by the market and the demand for them is 
increasing gradually, although the issue rate is lagging 
somewhat behind the calculations, which has been caused by the 
high cost of the securities, a certain complexity in registering 
transactions and the absence of a secondary market for the gold 
certificates, as well as the inadequate legislative base for 
regulating precious metals trading. 
  Obviously, the lower earning potential of the "gold" 
certificates, even with an optimistic improved forecast of an 
increase in gold prices in the world market, in comparison with 
the earning potential of investments in GKOs or interbank 
financial transactions, did not satisfy the "appetite" of 
potential investors. Most likely, the potential state securities 
purchasers' considerations of yield are prevailing over the 
considerations of maintaining liquidity and stability. In this 
situation, the collapse of several large non-state issuers of 
securities may, to a certain extent, increase interest in state 
securities. There is no talk that the state should provoke these 
events, they are occurring anyway, but public opinion needs to 
be widely informed about them and, moreover, under no 
circumstances, should the state take upon itself responsibility 
to the public during the bankruptcy of financial structures (as 
was done in instances involving voucher fraud in Moscow and St. 
Petersburg). 
  Thus, 1993 became the year of the formation of the state 
securities market and laid the groundwork for the relatively 
cheerful prospects for its further development in the coming 
year. 
<H8>  The Basic Tasks for 1994 </H8>
  1. Forming a unified system for a Russia-wide state 
securities market which operates on a real-time basis and 
inherently includes regional financial centers. 
  2. Issuing new, highly liquid, time financial instruments 
intended for the support of civilized methods of refinancing of 
commercial banks. 
  3. Floating newly issued medium-term (1-3 years) bonds with 
a 
flexible interest rate primarily among the public. 
<H5>  4.4. The Problem of Non-Payments </H5>
  The enterprises' mutual non-payments remained one of the 
most painful problems which complicated the conducting of an 
active monetary policy in 1993, and was constantly used by the 
opponents of the reforms as an argument about the unsoundness of 
the financial stabilization policy. 
  Significant amounts of the enterprises' mutual indebtedness 
are not the result of a too harsh financial policy. They have 
been caused, first of all, by the features inherited from the 
planned economy of an economic practice built on the guaranteed 
sale of products based on state orders, the lack of alternative 
solvent customers and the failure to apply harsh economic 
penalties for payment delays. 
  Along with this, among the basic reasons for the 
non-payments 
are: 
  1. Inflation, which gives rise to a shortage of working 
capital (especially among enterprises with a sufficiently 
lengthy production cycle). 
  2. The shift, caused by inflation and the lack of commodity 
credit, of enterprises to prepayment for goods and services, 
additionally stimulating the slump in production. 
  3. The extreme inefficiency of production, the decrease in 
labor productivity and the inability of managers to adjust to 
working under the new conditions (the unwillingness to 
economize, to cut employment, to reduce reserves, to sell off 
unneeded assets, to reduce material and energy consumption, to 
seek new markets, and to change products list). 
  4. The imperfection of the legislation, which makes it 
possible to fail to pay debts with relative impunity (for 
example, the failure to process payment documents by the 
deadlines and the excessive length of the examination of 
lawsuits in the courts of arbitration). 
  Given the lack of a reliable centralized accounting of the 
enterprises' mutual non-payments, their volume is being 
exaggerated everywhere, although it is obvious that the 
acuteness of the discussions on this theme has abated. This is 
no accident, inasmuch as any analytical indicators -- the volume 
of the non-payments in real terms, with respect to the GDP, to 
the volume of industrial production, to the volume of the total 
financial streams and so on -- testify to the fact that a 
decrease in the relative magnitude of the non-payments is 
occurring. A certain increase in the mutual indebtedness in 
absolute terms at the end of 1993 is associated with the fact 
that, prior to 1 October 1993, the accounting of the 
non-payments was done based on the production cost, but 
beginning as of the fourth quarter, it was done in selling 
prices. 


Table 10. Net Indebtedness of Industrial Enterprises (the Indebtedness to Suppliers 
and for Credits Minus the Indebtedness of Customers) 

                1992    1993 

                Dec     Jan     Feb     Mar     Apr     May     Jun     Jul     Aug 

                Net Creditors in Percentages 

Total           100     100     100     100     100     100     100     100     100 

Electric        --      --      --      --      --      --      --      --      -- 
Power 
Engineering 

Fuel Industry   60.9    81.4    53.1    54.3    76.4    66.5    55.3    74      77.9 


Ferrous         26.2    14.1    27.8    19.5    --      23.9    26.9    18.9    18.7 
Metallurgy 

Nonferrous      --      --      --      --      --      --      --      --      -- 
Metallurgy 

Chemical        10.4    4.5     17.9    7.8     12.2    9.6     11.9    2.9     2.1 
Industry 

Machine         --      --      1.2     --      --      --      4       3.1     -- 
Building 

LDTsB           2.5     --      --      --      --      --      --      --      -- 

PSM             --      --      --      --      --      --      1.9     1.1     1.3 

Light           --      --      --      --      --      --      --      --      -- 
Industry 

Food Industry   --      --      --      --      --      --      --      --      -- 


Other Sectors   --      --      --      18.4    11.4    --      --      --      -- 


                Net Debtors in Percentages 

Total           100     100     100     100     100     100     100     100     100 

Electric        6.9     3.9     10.6    14.3    4.7     5.4     11.1    9.1     1.7 
Power 
Engineeringz 

Fuel Industry   --      --      --      --      --      --      --      --      -- 


Ferrous         --      --      --      --      29      --      --      --      -- 
Metallurgy 

Nonferrous      8.2     16.1    5.4     21.7    2.5     5.3     21 .4   16.9    24.1 
Metallurgy 

Chemical        --      --      --      --      --      --      --      --      -- 
Industry 

Machine         22.5    22.7    --      2.2     10.6    2.2     --      --      11.4 
Building 

LDTsB           --      8       7.6     9.1     10.4    3.7     6.2     13.1    7.3 

PSM             2.2     4.3     3.2     3.3     1       1.7     --      --      -- 

Light           15.8    17.7    21.9    15.6    17.1    13.9    19.8    9.4     16.1 
Industry 

Food Industry   40.4    23.4    36.9    33.6    24.7    21.6    31.7    19.7    27.8 


Other Sectors   1.3     3.9     14.5    --      --      46.3    9.8     31.8    11.6 


Source: EKONOMICHESKIY MONITORING ROSSII [Economic monitoring of Russia], Bulletin No 
2, Russian Academy of Sciences' Institute for National Economic Problems,1993 


  In 1992, the "sectorites" and the Central Bank managed 
successfully to insist on the necessity of carrying out the 
crediting of the enterprises' mutual indebtedness. This measure 
produced a transitory effect at the beginning of the spring of 
1992 and led to an abrupt intensification of the inflation rate 
and a drop in the ruble's exchange rate by year's end. 
Nevertheless, the idea of carrying out a new intersectorial 
crediting is again being placed on the Central Bank's agenda 
with enviable persistence, despite the fact that the 
indebtedness for the credits issued for the completion of 1992's 
crediting has remained unpaid up to the present. Simultaneously 
with the crediting in 1992, significant funds were given out for 
replenishing the enterprises' working capital in order to reduce 
the non-payments and to give financial support to industry. 
Checks have shown that the basic amount of this money was used 
not as intended, rather, it was basically used for the payment 
of wages, which had a strong inflationary effect. 
  In 1993, mutual crediting and indexing of working capital 
was 
successfully avoided and, at the same time, searches for 
noninflationary solutions to the problem were carried out. One 
solution was Presidential Edict No 1662 of 19 October 1993 on 
Improving Settlements in the Economy and Increasing the 
Responsibility for Their Timely Implementation, which provided 
for the compulsory re-registration of the enterprises' overdue 
indebtedness as time debentures -- simple financial notes, upon 
the expiration of the unified deadlines of which, the amount of 
the debt is subject to unconditional recovery from the debtor's 
account or to application to his property, including real 
estate. Despite the large amount of preparatory work for the 
implementation of the edict, its practical realization has been 
unjustifiably delayed because of the frank opposition of a 
number of departments and the unresolved nature of many legal 
problems. 
<H5>  4.5. The Banknote Exchange in July and August of 1993 </H5>
  The sudden exchange at the end of July and the beginning 
of August of 1993 USSR State Bank and Bank of Russia banknotes, 
series 1961-1992, for 1993-series Bank of Russia banknotes was 
implemented by the Central Bank without the knowledge of and 
without coordination with the RF Ministry of Finance, despite a 
preliminary declaration about the gradual withdrawal of 
old-series banknotes up to the end of the year. 
  In objectively assessing this measure, it must be emphasized 
that it turned out to be the only "shock" measure of 1993. 
Besides the obvious lack of technical preparation for this 
action (for example, the lack of small change, the shortage of 
exchange centers and the inadequate degree of safeguards for the 
new banknotes), the exchange of banknotes in Russia and the 
influx which followed it of the cash ruble supply from the near 
abroad (around R1 trillion --17 percent of the cash money supply 
in circulation at the end of July of 1993) provoked a strong 
surge in inflation, a temporary destabilization of the ruble's 
exchange rate and numerous violations of exchange conditions. 
  The public's legitimate dissatisfaction with the money 
exchange's humiliating procedure and time frames sharply 
aggravated the political tension in society, which required 
special measures to adjust the conditions of the exchange even 
as it was going on. 
  In addition to the cited negative consequences, the money 
exchange led to the fact that: 
  -- there was a violation of the law, according to which the 
banknotes are unconditional obligations of the Central Bank and 
the imposition of any kinds of restrictions on their exchange is 
not permitted; 
  -- the unilateral procedure with no warning violated 
obligations to the CIS countries given the lack of a new 
mechanism for monetary relations; 
  -- and the faith of the public and entrepreneurs in the 
government and in the executive power as a whole was undermined 
for the latest time. 
  In deciding on such an unpopular step, the Central Bank's 
management, according to its official explanation, set as the 
main goal a one-time cut-off of the excess ruble supply which 
had been circulating in the republics of the near abroad and 
which had threatened to pour into the Russian market in 
connection with the expected introduction of national currencies 
in these countries. To what extent the Central Bank's intentions 
corresponded to reality is revealed, in particular, by the fact 
that there was an unsanctioned shipment of R50 billion in 
1993-series Russian cash rubles to the Republic of Uzbekistan, 
carried out by the Central Bank immediately after the money 
exchange. 
  Clearly, the Central Bank's position on the negotiations for 
the creation of a "new type of ruble zone," which began almost 
simultaneously with the money exchange and where the Central 
Bank unfailingly discovered a willingness to reunite the 
monetary systems with the CIS republics on terms very favorable 
for them, did not correspond to the set goal -- the final 
separation of the monetary systems of Russia and the near abroad. 
  As a matter of fact, the question of conducting an exchange 
of cash money in the countries participating in the negotiations 
remained open right up to October and November of 1993, when 
Armenia, Kazakhstan and Uzbekistan deemed as unacceptable the 
conditions put forward by the Russian side for uniting the 
monetary systems and adopted a decision about introducing 
national currencies. The talks about a "new type of ruble zone" 
were stopped (see the section "Mutual Relations with the CIS 
Countries" [4.6.]), 
  The final period in the cash money exchange operation was 
written by the Central Bank's withdrawal from circulation of 
small old-series banknotes (1-25 ruble notes), which was 
completed on 31 December 1993. 
  Thus, a positive result from the money exchange, which 
consisted of stopping the uncontrolled subsidization of the 
republics of the former USSR through free deliveries of cash 
money and separating the monetary systems, was achieved despite 
the Central Bank's attempt to restore the former model of 
relations with the republics' central banks patterned on the 
USSR State Bank. 
<H5>  4.6. Mutual Relations with the CIS Countries </H5>
  The monetary relations with the countries of the so-called 
"ruble zone" in 1993 developed in an extremely complicated 
fashion, which was caused by the contradictions of the absurd 
system which arose after the USSR's disintegration, under which: 
  -- a noncash money turnover, divided as of 1 July 1992 
between Russia and the other republics which used the ruble as a 
means of payment, coexisted with a formally unified cash-money 
turnover; 
  -- the Central Bank continued free deliveries of banknotes 
to 
the central (national) banks of the ruble-zone republics, 
despite their complete autonomy in monetary emission; 
  -- noncash settlements between contracting parties in Russia 
and other ruble-zone states could be carried out only using a 
centralized procedure within the limits of the residual funds in 
the correspondent accounts of the corresponding central 
(national) banks in the RF Central Bank; 
  -- the shortage of funds in correspondent accounts was 
compensated for by the Central Bank by granting the ruble-zone 
republics so-called technical credits without interest being 
levied and by indexing the amount of the debt and the repayment 
guarantees; 
  -- the complete independence of and lack of coordination 
between the ruble-zone states in financial, monetary, currency 
and foreign economic policies caused uncoordinated economic 
reform rates, as a rule, slower than in Russia, higher inflation 
rates and weaker financial discipline. 
  The first quarter of 1993 was spent in continuous attempts 
to 
demolish this system, which generated up to a fourth of the 
inflation processes in Russia. Various methods were used for 
this purpose (to the point of direct bans against the Central 
Bank issuing credits above one-twelfth of the annual limits per 
month and so on), however, their effectiveness remained low, 
inasmuch as the Central Bank, for incomprehensible reasons, 
showed no interest in stopping the basically uncontrolled 
dispensing of funds to the countries of the near abroad. 



  ----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table 11. The Granting of Credits to CIS Countries in 1992-1993 (in Billio-| 
|ns of Rubles)                                                              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Country           |Indebtedness, 1992|Agreement for 1993|Granted in 1993   | 
|                  |-June 1993        |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Azerbaijan        |36.7[.sup](1)[/]|--                |--                | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Armenia           |22.0              |40.0              |13.6              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Belarus           |177.3             |70.0              |65.7              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Georgia           |39.5              |10.0              |1.5               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Kazakhstan        |547.6             |150.0             |13.6              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Kyrgyzstan        |55.8              |30.0              |12.0              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Moldova           |40.0              |50.0              |19.5              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Tajikistan        |65.0              |170.0             |81.7              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Turkmenistan      |135.9             |--                |--                | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Uzbekistan        |237.7             |125.0             |55.9              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Ukraine           |1,050.0           |250.0             |247.5             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Total             |2,407.5           |895.0             |511.0             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1. The agreement is in the preparation stage.                              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  The turning point arrived only after the former Supreme 
Soviet's establishment of a ban on granting technical credits 
and the shift to interstate credits through the RF republic 
budget, issued within the bounds of the overall budget limits 
and with a fixed dollar equivalent, specific repayment periods, 
interest rates and security deposits. From 1 January through 20 
April 1993, the distribution of technical credits amounted to 
approximately R850 billion, while a limit for interstate credits 
for the remainder of the year had been established in the amount 
of R895 billion. However, the actual use of interstate credits 
from the budget during the second half of the year barely 
exceeded R500 billion, i.e., the amount of these kinds of 
subsidies to the states of the near abroad decreased in real 
terms by a factor of at least 10. 
  The stopping of technical credits led to a sharp increase in 
applications from the ruble-zone republics for the delivery of 
cash money, which the Central Bank, despite the Ministry of 
Finance's protests, satisfied on an ever increasing scale. The 
RF Central Bank's sudden exchange of cash money in Russia in 
July and August of 1993 caused a panic reaction in many CIS 
member countries, which were not ready for the introduction of 
their own currencies and the complete separation of the monetary 
systems from the RF monetary system. 
  The way in which the introduction of the Russian currency 
took place forced Russia and the ruble-zone countries to 
confront the need for a quick solution to the problem of 
organizing monetary and settlement relations on a new basis. The 
starting point in this matter was the joint declaration of the 
presidents of Russia, Kazakhstan and Uzbekistan about the 
creation of a "new type of ruble zone" (RZNT), adopted 
immediately during the period of the money exchange in Russia. 
The lengthy negotiations, the participants in which in addition 
to Russia, were Armenia, Belarus, Kazakhstan, Uzbekistan and 
Tajikistan, were completed with the signing of the framework 
multilateral Agreement on Practical Measures for the Creation of 
a New Type of Ruble Zone and Russia's bilateral agreements with 
each of the countries which participated in the negotiations on 
uniting the monetary systems. 
  Of key importance in these agreements was the statement 
about 
the necessity of a transition period, by which means the 
immediate reuniting of the monetary systems of Russia and the 
ruble-zone countries was removed from the agenda. Over the 
course of the transition period, the countries participating in 
the agreements were obliged to carry out the standardization of 
economic legislation and the coordination of monetary, 
financial, credit, currency, customs and price policies, as well 
as to support the stability of the exchange rate for the 
national currencies with respect to the ruble and to shift 
gradually to mutual convertibility of the national currencies. 
In addition to this, subject to coordination with the Russian 
side were the key macroeconomic indicators: an increase in the 
amount of the money supply, the budget deficit, the inflation 
rate and others. 
  It turned out to be impossible to realize the conditions 
stipulated by the agreements for the standardization of 
legislation and the establishment of effective regulatory 
mechanisms over the course of a few months. Serious differences 
had also been uncovered in the approaches to the implementation 
of the agreements between Russia and the other countries which 
participated in the negotiations, which were interested, first 
of all, in ensuring the exchange of cash money for the 
new-series Russian rubles on the same terms as within Russia. 
The remaining elements of the mechanism for the uniting of the 
monetary systems (the consolidation of the budgets, the 
organization of a currency market and the standardization of the 
settlement mechanism) were viewed at this time as secondary. 
  Under these conditions, despite the RF Central Bank's 
willingness to have every possible relaxation of the criteria 
for uniting the monetary systems on the basis of the Russian 
ruble, Russia's economic interests required the complete 
fulfillment of the agreements by the parties which signed them. 
The increase in political tension in the participating countries 
of the new-type ruble zone in connection with the unsettled 
nature of the matter of the exchange of old banknotes and the 
mutual apprehensions because of the possibility of the 
uncoordinated introduction of the national currencies 
predetermined the suspension of the negotiations with Armenia, 
Uzbekistan and Kazakhstan. In November of 1993, these countries 
introduced national currencies; in Belarus, temporary banknotes 
had already been in circulation since 1992 and the matter of the 
exchanging of old banknotes in this republic did not come up. Of 
all the participants in the agreements on the new-type ruble 
zone, the one which turned out to be in the most difficult 
situation was Tajikistan, to which the Russian Government 
granted a special interstate credit for a term of 6 months in 
cash Russian rubles in order to stabilize the nearly destroyed 
economy and monetary turnover. 
  The new-type ruble zone did not go through. Despite the 
failure of the agreements, integration with the republics of the 
former [Soviet] Union in the area of finances and credit is one 
of the indisputable priorities of Russia's economic policy and 
the suspension of the talks on the new-type ruble zone does not 
mean the abandonment of the set goal. However, the process of 
financial and credit integration, as the experience of other 
countries shows, takes a long time and requires the convergence 
of the levels of economic development, the harmonization of 
economic legislation and the fulfillment of a whole series of 
other conditions. On the other hand, there is no possibility for 
viability on the part of pseudo-integration structures, in which 
the groundwork has been laid from the outset for conflict 
between the economic and political interests of the parties, for 
example, in no place and at no time has there ever been nor can 
there ever be a single currency and two emission banks. 
  Unfortunately, these are precisely the kinds of items which 
have turned out to be embedded in the interbank agreement 
between the RF Central Bank and the NB [National Bank] of 
Belarus, which was signed at the beginning of January of 1994. 
At the same time, the drafts of the documents on uniting the 
monetary systems of Russia and Belarus contained no proposals 
for uniting budgets, customs and currency control -- as a matter 
of fact, a question was raised about the gratis transfer by 
Russia to Belarus of cash and noncash money, moreover, at an 
exchange rate of 1:1, even though the market exchange rate for 
Belarussian rubles currently amounts to 4-5 for 1 [Russian] 
ruble. 
  Such a position, taken exclusively out of business and 
political considerations and based on elementary economic 
ignorance, in the event of its realization, may have the 
following consequences: 
  -- the large-scale subsidization of Belarus at the expense 
of 
Russia; 
  -- an increase in the price-increase index by 3-5 percent; 
  -- complications with former partners in the new-type ruble 
zone, which had not obtained similar preferential conditions for 
the uniting of the monetary systems. 
  In considering the political and economic realities of the 
present day, it must be acknowledged that reaching an agreement 
on uniting the monetary systems is possible only when there is: 
  -- the unconditional retention of a single emission bank, 
which means the conversion of the Central Bank of Belarus into a 
branch of the Bank of Russia without the right of emission. At 
the same time, the mutual relations of Belarus' budget with 
Russia's budget should be organized in a manner similar to the 
procedure which operates in the relationship of Russia's 
republic budget with the budgets of RF entities; 
  -- an exchange of money in the event of the merging of the 
monetary systems at the market exchange rate; 
  -- and approval of the decision about uniting the monetary 
systems in the State Duma -- this key question cannot be solved 
on the basis of agreements between the central banks or 
spontaneous decisions of the executive power. 
  What has been said pertains not just to Belarus, but also to 
all the CIS countries which are striving for closer financial 
and credit integration with Russia. This process will take a 
long time and any hasty attempts to obtain short-term political 
dividends will inflict damage on both Russia's interests and the 
economic integration goals. Despite serious opposition, in 1993, 
the Ministry of Finance managed to uphold this key position and 
to prevent the adoption of economically unsound and technically 
unprepared decisions. 
  The immutability of this position even in the future remains 
the main task of the monetary and financial policies 
for 1994. At the same time, at this stage the fastest possible 
establishment of practical mechanisms which ensure the mutual 
convertibility of the Russian ruble and the CIS countries' 
currencies is extremely important and will make it possible to 
solve the most painful problems in the organization of 
commercial and noncommercial payments within the framework of 
the Commonwealth and to shape gradually the prerequisites for a 
Payment Union. 
<H5>  4.7. The Development of the Stock Market </H5>
  In 1993, the volume of shares issued by non-state issuers 
increased continuously. In all, offered for public investment 
were shares worth R3.9 trillion in comparison with R315 billion 
in 1992 (an increase faster than the rate of inflation). The 
issuing of bonds in 1993 amounted in all to R1.1 billion (R1 
billion for AVTOVAZ and the rest for municipal loans). Federal 
budget receipts from the registration of issued securities came 
to R4 billion, while the total amount of the securities 
transaction tax came to R29 billion. 
  The majority of issuers declared as the goal of the share 
emissions the attracting of resources for long-term investments. 
The basic issuers are private enterprises, ones undergoing 
privatization, banks and investment and finance companies. It 
may be stated that securities have been turned into the most 
important instrument for the accumulation of monetary assets not 
only for institutional investors, but also for the public. A 
number of companies carried out secondary securities emissions. 
  Noticeable changes have occurred in the stock market's 
infrastructure, which have been manifested, first of all, in the 
decrease in the number of stock exchanges and the concentration 
of securities trading. Thus, whereas 98 Ministry of Finance 
licenses were in effect at the end of 1992, by the end of 1993, 
their number had decreased to 72. 
  Going on at the same time is the active establishment of 
investment structures which service the non-exchange market. 
Listed in the Ministry of Finance's register are 1,035 
institutes, the overwhelming majority of which operate as 
brokers (700), consultants and investment companies. The end of 
1993 was marked by the emergence of specialized institutes 
associated with the organization of the secondary securities 
market (associations of investment firms, depositaries, 
registrars and clearing houses). The necessary amendments and 
changes to the normative and legal base of the stock market were 
introduced at the same time. 
The Basic Tasks for 1994 
  1. Comprehensive stimulation of the development of the 
capital market as a source of investment resources. 
  2. Ensuring the protection of investors from dishonest 
issuers. 
<H5>  5. External Aspects of the Financial Policy </H5>
<H5>  5.1. The Currency Policy </H5>
  Russia's currency policy in 1993 was characterized by 
relative consistency. A currency market was developed, the 
ruble's exchange rate was strengthened substantially and its 
role in the economy increased, import subsidies were abolished 
and decisions against dollarization adopted, the gold and 
currency reserves increased and the formation of a 
currency-control system was begun. In the area of currency 
policy, the cooperation between the Ministry of Finance and the 
Central Bank was at a sufficiently high level. 
<H5>  5.1.1. Russia's Currency Policy </H5>
  A number of decisions were made in 1993 on the regulation 
of the currency market, which assisted its development and the 
strengthening of the ruble: 
  -- on 27 May, the Central Bank introduced a new procedure 
for 
the management by authorized banks of an open currency position; 
  -- as of 1 July, exporters began to sell 30 percent of 
currency earnings not to the Central Bank, but rather, through 
the currency market (i.e., in all, 50 percent went through the 
market); Russia's Ministry of Finance had been insisting on this 
measure since February; 
  -- and, on 15 July, non-residents were permitted to sell 
currency in the domestic Russian market (also due to pressure 
from the Ministry of Finance). 
  1993 was marked by the continuation of the rapid development 
of the Russian currency market in three basic directions; 
  -- an increase in the transaction volumes; 
  -- expansion of the number of quoted currencies; 
  -- and expansion of the currency market's geographical 
distribution. 
  The volume of currency transactions recorded in Russia's 
exchanges in 1993 amounted to $14.71 billion as against $2.86 
billion in 1992 and only $280 million in 1991. Taking into 
account the sales outside the organized market, the total 
turnover of the currency transactions in 1993 can be estimated 
at $20 billion, i.e., the market remained primarily an exchange 
market. Interbank conversion transactions have not yet been 
widely developed, but their scale is increasing steadily. 
  The Moscow Interbank Currency Exchange (MMVB), in which 85 
percent of Russia's entire dollar exchange turnover in 1993 
occurred, remains the basic exchange. At the end of the year, 
150 banks were exchange members. Other exchanges are operating 
in St. Petersburg, Yekaterinburg, Novosibirsk, Vladivostok and 
Rostov-on-Don. 
  The overwhelming majority of currency transactions are being 
carried out on "spot" terms, but an organized futures market (a 
standard currency contract market with future delivery) has 
already been developed, as well as separate interbank forward 
transactions. 
  The U.S. dollar remains the leading currency in Russia's 
market -- not less than 60-70 percent, and the second most 
important currency is the German mark. Attempts to carry out 
trades in Austrian schillings, French francs, pounds sterling 
and Italian lira, and in the regional exchanges -- in Finnish 
marks and Japanese yen -- were noted in 1993. 


Table 12. Volumes of Transactions in Russia's Currency Markets in 1993 
(Moscow, St. Petersburg, Yekaterinburg, Novosibirsk, Rostov-on-Don, in 
Millions of U.S. Dollars) 

Month         Average       Turnover     Including Sales by       Purchased 
              Exchange                                            by 
              Rate 

RF Central    Commercial    RF Central 
Bank          Banks         Bank 

January       489.2         526.59       182.76      343.92       -1.7 

February      569.5         563.02       211.25      341.77       - 31.78 

March         663.8         541.39       130.83      410.56       -11.91 

April         776.0         592.99       244.59      348.4        -33.96 

May           911.7         483.57       201.85      281.62       -25.35 

June          1,077.7       796.14       10.58       655.56       -302.38 

July          1,019.9       1,556.37     4.88        1,551.49     - 1,062.92 


August        986.1         1,474.78     503.74      971.04       - 76.39 

September     1,074.3       2,471.72     1,286.84    1,184.88     -276.57 

October       1,187.2       1,588.41     218.8       1,369.62     - 326.02 

November      1,195.8       1,916.93     603.48      1,313.45     -205.44 

December      1,240.7       2,199.37     292.43      1,906.94     -460.64 

Total                       14,711.28    4,022.03    10,689.24    - 2,815.06 


For 
Reference: 

1992                        2,862.40 

1993                        280.02 

Source: the Central Bank of Russia 


  As of March of 1993, in the Moscow Interbank Currency 
Exchange, they began practicing transactions with the Ukrainian 
karbovanets. The preparations have been completed for trades in 
the Kazakh tenge and the Belarussian ruble. It is worth noting 
that, when the National Bank of Ukraine introduced a fixed 
exchange rate for the karbovanets to the ruble and SKV [freely 
convertible currency], the Moscow Interbank Currency Exchange 
remained the only free market in which a karbovanets exchange 
rate was formed. However, the introduction of quotations for the 
currencies of the countries of the former USSR in 1993 has been 
unjustifiably dragged out and it should be accelerated. 
  In 1993, a significant disparity was observed in the 
quotations in various markets, but, based on the extent of the 
development of the transaction technique and currency arbitrage, 
this disparity had a tendency to decrease. The number of 
currency transaction participants has expanded substantially. 
The buying and selling of currency has become a daily routine 
for many industrial enterprises. The number of banks with 
currency licenses has reached nearly 600. 
  The cash currency market developed rapidly. The number of 
exchange centers of the bureaus has increased many times over 
and even the Central Bank does not know their total number. 
Mobile exchange centers have appeared. The disparity between 
cash and noncash exchange rates has decreased somewhat. Service 
efficiency has increased, although the poor control over the 
exchange centers' activities is leading to numerous violations 
(a lack of licenses, a refusal to accept dilapidated banknotes 
and certain types of banknotes, a periodic shortage of rubles 
and a lack of registration of transactions). 
  Over the course of 1993, the Central Bank acted both as a 
seller and a purchaser of currency, basically carrying out a 
policy of leveling the ruble's exchange rate. On the whole, over 
the year, the Central Bank turned out to be the largest net 
purchaser of currency (taking into account the direct sales of 
currency to it by the Ministry of Finance), since it tried to 
prevent an artificial strengthening of the ruble's exchange 
rate. On the whole, over the year, the Central Bank purchased 
$2.8 billion in the market and $3.7 billion from the Ministry of 
Finance, i.e., the sum of R6.5 billion, and sold only $4.0 
billion, which debunks the myth about artificial support of the 
ruble's exchange rate. In fact, the Central Bank was supporting 
the dollar's exchange rate in Russia. It can be asserted 
unambiguously that the ruble's exchange rate reflects the 
existing economic realities. 
  The Central Bank's large-scale interventions in the currency 
market were basically the sole instrument of the monetary policy 
and led to a substantial increase in the Central Bank's currency 
reserves. The Central Bank's attempt to purchase more currency 
than it sold, which means the pumping of an additional emission 
into the economy, prompted the Ministry of Finance at the end of 
the year to establish its own system for selling currency 
through the commercial banks, but, in reality, it was almost 
never used. 
<H8>  The Basic Tasks for 1994 </H8>
  1. The development of an interbank market and forward 
transactions. 
  2. The removal of the remaining restrictions on the buying, 
selling, importing and exporting of foreign currency and Russian 
rubles in order to achieve genuine convertibility. 
  3. The development of trading in the currencies of the near 
abroad and other reserve currencies. 
  4. A more considered use of currency interventions as an 
instrument of monetary policy. 
<H5>  5.1.2 The Ruble's Exchange Rate </H5>
  In 1993, the ruble's exchange rate against the U.S. dollar 
fell from R417 (5 January) to R1,247 (30 December) to the 
dollar, i.e., by a factor of 3. At the same time, the tendency 
of its movement can be divided into two stages: from the 
beginning of the year to the middle of June, when the exchange 
rate was at the R1,116 mark, and the following 6 months, when 
the exchange rate first strengthened and then fell by 12 percent. 
  Taking inflation into account, the ruble's actual exchange 
rate and, consequently, it purchasing power in 1993 increased by 
a factor of 3 (9:3). I.e., 1992's trend, when the actual 
exchange rate increase by a factor of almost 9 (26:2.8), 
continued. At the same time, in the first half of the year, the 
drop in the ruble's nominal exchange rate almost kept pace with 
inflation and was one of its sources and, in the second half of 
the year, the ruble's exchange rate remained very stable, while 
prices increased by a factor of almost 3. As a result, a 
significan convergence of the levels of domestic and foreign 
prices occurred. 
  The basic reasons for the strengthening of the Russian ruble 
lie in the tightening up of the budget and monetary policies and 
the change in the mechanism of the currency market. Of specific 
psychological significance was the receipt at the beginning of 
July of 1993 of the first part of the IMF system credit, but it 
was not this which was decisive for the correlation of supply 
and demand. The measures adopted and announced by the government 
at the beginning of the summer radically changed the inflation 
expectations in Russia. In the second half of the year, even the 
currency speculators believed in the impossibility of a 
"collapse" of the exchange rate and in its close connection with 
the pursued economic policy. 
  In 1993, the ruble became more attractive as an object of 
short-term investments and a means of payment. The conversion of 
foreign currency into rubles and their depositing in Russian 
banks in the second half of the year gave investors colossal 
profits. The development of market relations, the high interest 
rates and the stable exchange rate caused an influx of funds 
from the near abroad. For example, many enterprises, citizens 
and even government bodies of the near abroad are now keeping 
money in Russia for protection from inflation, "shuttles" from 
Belarus and Ukraine have congested Russian cities in the race 
for rubles and a tendency toward trips into Russia to make money 
has emerged. 
  The strengthening of the Russian ruble had the following 
consequences: 
  -- a lowering of inflation expectations; the role of the 
movement of the currency exchange rate in inflation under our 
conditions is extremely complicated to assess, but it is evident 
that the exchange rate could not, for the time being, play the 
role of a nominal anchor in the suppression of inflation; 
  -- some lowering of the increase in prices through the 
channel of the prices for imported goods, first and foremost, 
consumer goods; 
  -- the facilitation of importing; the ruble's understated 
exchange rate made imported goods unjustifiably costly and 
domestic ones too cheap; this led to demands for the 
subsidization of importing (import factors) and budget losses 
and, on the other hand, to the exporting from Russia for next to 
nothing of raw material riches and other goods, for which the 
government was constantly being criticized by the opposition; 
the relatively stable ruble led to a sharp increase in importing 
via private channels, which fundamentally changed the picture in 
retail trade; 
  -- a decrease in the competitiveness of exporting; the 
ruble's stabilization showed that a significant portion of the 
exporting was highly inefficient because of the low labor 
productivity and technological backwardness; the convergence of 
the domestic and foreign prices initiated the structural 
reorganization of industry and agriculture, when survival and 
exporting opportunities depend on production efficiency. 
  Under these conditions, it is necessary to eliminate all the 
artificial restrictions on exporting, which were imposed at one 
time in an attempt to "saturate" the domestic market. The 
government has already lowered the export duties and cut back on 
the practice of setting quotas, but this is insufficient and, in 
1994, they should be completely abolished. The attempts to 
"protect" inefficient production using the import duties run the 
risk of preserving stagnation and closing foreign markets to us, 
since retaliatory measures will inevitably be taken. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-USR-004L-52A>      Figure 14. The Dynamics of the Exchange Rate and the Parity of the Ruble's Purchasing Power in </FIG>



<FIG ID=JPRS-USR-004L-53A>      Figure 15. Currency Sales Volumes in Russia's Currency Exchanges </FIG>



<FIG ID=JPRS-USR-004L-54A>      Figure 16. Currency Purchase Volumes in Russia's Currency Exchanges </FIG>


<H8>  The Basic Tasks for 1994 </H8>
  1. The continuation of the policy of smoothing out market 
fluctuation in the currency exchange rate, i.e., the abandonment 
of official interventions in order to maintain the exchange rate 
at a fixed level. 
  2. The pursuit of sufficiently harsh financial and monetary 
policies aimed at strengthening the national currency. 
  3. An increase in the ruble's actual exchange rate by a 
factor of approximately 2. This means that, when prices increase 
by a factor of 3-4, the nominal exchange rate will not fall 
below R2,500 to the dollar. Given an increase in prices by a 
factor of 20, the exchange rate will amount to a minimum of 
R12,000. Based on the extent of the convergence of domestic and 
foreign prices, it will draw closer to the parity of the 
purchasing power. The separation will be preserved, but it will 
decrease based on the extent of the development of the 
commodity, currency and credit markets and the removal of 
protectionist barriers. 
  However, all this will depend on the financial and monetary 
policies pursued. The events of January of 1994, when the ruble 
lost more than a fourth of its value because of the political 
uncertainty, confirm the market's sensitivity to the 
government's policies. 
<H5>  5.1.3. Russia's Gold and Currency Reserves </H5>
  Russia's official gold and currency reserves are being 
formed from the reserves of the Central Bank and the government 
(the latter are under the control of the Ministry of Finance). 
In both instances, the reserves include gold and foreign 
convertible currency, although the Central Bank and the 
government also have at their disposal substantial reserves of 
other precious metals (palladium, silver, platinum and others) 
and stones (basically diamonds). 
  The Central Bank is storing its own currency reserves 
basically in foreign central and commercial banks, while the 
Ministry of Finance's currency reserves are in the Vneshtorgbank 
[Foreign Trade Bank] and a number of Russia's largest commercial 
banks. 
  In November of 1993, the Central Bank consented to a 
transaction, unique in world practice, for purchasing uncut 
diamonds from the government for $500 million, which were later 
sold for rubles to replenish the budget. 
  The increase in Russia's international reserves occurred in 
1993 basically due to foreign currency, while the gold reserves 
did not change substantially. Russia's net international 
reserves increased in 1993 from $2.8 billion to $6.1 billion by 
the end of November. During this period, the foreign liabilities 
increased by approximately R1 billion, i.e., the gross reserves 
increased even more substantially. The liabilities increased 
basically due to the Ministry of Finance's debt to the IMF. At 
the same time, the VEB [Foreign Economic Activity Bank] reduced 
its own foreign liabilities, paying off almost $500 million on 
the former USSR's debt. 
<H8>  Basic Tasks for 1994 </H8>
  1. A further increase in the Central Bank's reserves as a 
means for supporting monetary emission. 
  2. A gradual concentrating of all reserves in the Central 
Bank's hands. 
  3. An increase in efficiency in the management of the 
currency reserves. 


Table 13. The Russian Federation's International Reserves in 1993 

                  1 January   1 April     1 July      1 October   1 January 
                  1993        1993        1993        1993        1994 
                                                                  (Estimate) 

Foreign 
Currencies 

Central Bank      787.9       1,273.9     2,358.3     4,647.3     4,556. 1 
Assets 
(millions of 
dollars) 

Central Bank      92.2        92.2        83.0        83.0        128.0 
Gold (tonnes) 

Foreign 
Currency Assets 


RF Ministry of    1,166       1,523.6     2,037.9     1,540.0     197.0 
Finance 
(millions of 
dollars) 

Ministry of       151.3       184.2       188.0       189.8       177.8 
Finance Gold 
(tonnes) 

Ministry of       988.6       1,005.0     1,004.4     2,519.0     2,500.0 
Finance 
Indebtedness 
(millions of 
dollars) 

Foreign           528         154         83.9        58.0        64.7 
Economic 
Activity Bank 
Indebtedness 
(millions of 
dollars) 

Russian 
Federation Net 
International 
Reserves 

-- in millions    2,786.5     4,305.7     5,923.1     6,242.9     4,876 .6 
of dollars 

-- in billions    1,156.4     2,945.1     6,278.5     7,297.9     6,050.4 
of rubles 

Sources: the Central Bank and the RF Ministry of Finance. 


<H5>  5.1.4. Dollarization </H5>
  Dollarization objectively expanded in the first half of 
1993, although, based on the extent of the stabilization of the 
ruble's exchange rate, this process went into reverse. The basic 
reasons for dollarization are inflation, unfavorable interest 
rates and the poor state of settlements. The scale of cash 
dollarization is estimated to be several billion dollars and it 
is likely that domestic settlements in currency are of a similar 
size. At the same time, the flight to dollars and other foreign 
currencies is not being affected (see The Flight of Capital 
[5.2.2.]). 
  A significant portion of the well-off circles of the 
population, including those which exert influence on the 
adoption of decisions in the state, has essentially begun to 
live in a parallel dollar economy. At the same time, the 
necessity of suppressing inflation was not as imperative for 
them, since it frequently produced an opportunity to get rich by 
speculating. 
  Over the course of the entire year, the Ministry of Finance, 
acting alone, tried to obtain the adoption of decisions against 
dollarization, but it found no support. Only after 21 September 
did the Central Bank finally issue a document about stopping, as 
of 1 January 1994, payments in cash currency -- precisely in 
conformity with the Ministry of Finance's demands. At the same 
time, cash currency deposited by non-banking institutions will 
be accepted, but it will not earn interest. 
  The decision caused inconvenience for the holders of cash 
currency and required a few more rubles, but it was implemented 
calmly on the whole and, at the same time, powerful stimulation 
was given to the distribution of debit and credit cards and the 
ruble expanded its own monetary functions, creating the 
prerequisites for more effective monetary regulation. 
  At the same time, final victory over dollarization is 
possible only if there are suppression of inflation, the 
attainment of favorable rates for rubles and substantial 
improvement in the system for settlements in rubles. 
Nevertheless, the adopted decisions are creating powerful 
compelling motives and a basis for intensifying the struggle 
against inflation. 
<H5>  5.2. Currency Control </H5>
<H5>  5.2.1. The Organization of Currency Control </H5>
  By law, the basic functions of currency control have been 
entrusted to the Central Bank, as well as to the Russian Federal 
Service for Currency and Export Control. 
  The federal service, in point of fact, had only begun to 
take 
shape in 1993 and only as of the middle of October did it begin 
its practical activities: checking the Ministry of Foreign 
Economic Relations for observance of the law during the 
exporting of strategically important raw material goods, 
checking the foreign trade associations with regard to the 
timeliness of the repatriation of currency earnings and 
selective checking of the currency exchange centers. The 
preliminary amount of the penalties for the conducted checks 
comes to around $100 million. 
  The Central Bank also did not achieve substantial results in 
the area of currency control: 
  1. There was no regulation of the exchange centers' 
activities and the Central Bank does not even know the number of 
them in the country. Only at the beginning of 1994 were the 
appropriate instructions prepared by the Central Bank. 
  2. The Central Bank does not have data about the importing 
and exporting of currency and attempts are just being undertaken 
to prepare the corresponding statistics. The GTK [State Customs 
Committee] estimates the exporting of cash currency in 1993 at 
$3.7 billion. 
  3. In the procedure for penalties for violation of currency 
control, almost no currency licenses were withdrawn from banks, 
measures were not taken against enterprises which refused to 
accept rubles and there were no closings of exchange centers 
which defraud customers (for example, collecting a premium for 
exchanging dilapidated notes). Certain companies of the "GMM" 
type, given such connivance, unleashed a flurry of currency 
activities without any legal bases for this. 
  4. On the whole, the banking system remains the weakest spot 
in the currency control system. It has not yet been possible to 
really set up cooperation with the control organs of other 
states. 
  In fulfillment of the RF Law on Currency Regulation and 
Currency Control, the Ministry of Finance, the Central Bank and 
the State Customs Committee worked out and adopted the Statute 
on the Procedure for the Exporting and Remitting from the 
Russian Federation and Remitting to the Russian Federation of 
Russian Federation Currency. This statute makes the control 
system clearer and stricter. 
  The decree On the Procedure for the Movement by Natural 
Persons Across the RF Customs Border of Goods not Intended for 
Porductio or Other Comerial Activities was worked out jointly 
with the State Customs Committee and other departments and 
adopted by the government on 23 December 1993. This decision 
reduced the value of goods which could be shipped across the 
border duty-free from $5,000 to $2,000 and eliminated other 
benefits and discrepancies in order to curtail foreign trading 
under the guise of private crossings and to increase budget 
revenues. 
  In the second half of 1993, proposals were prepared on the 
organization of control over the timely and complete 
repatriation to Russia of export earnings and other sums and the 
importing and exporting from the RF by residents and 
non-residents of currency assets, as well as for the improvement 
of the standards base, which provides for the strengthening of 
accountability for violations of the rules for currency turnover 
in Russia. 
  Significant amounts of freely convertible currency were used 
in 1993 in order to carry out private "shuttle" importing into 
Russia. For example, according to the State Customs Committee's 
data, just in the first half of the year, around 130,000 
foreign-made motor vehicles were imported privately into Russia. 
Firm importing has been partially concealed behind this figure, 
a substantial one for Russia, in order to avoid the payment of 
import tariffs. There are no reliable estimates of the "shuttle" 
importing of consumer goods, just as there are no estimates of 
the currency exported for this purpose. According to the State 
Committee for Statistics' data, the volume of unregistered 
importing amounted in 1993 to $10 billion. Currency control in 
this instance proved to be extremely ineffective. 
<H5>  5.2.2. The Flight of Capital </H5>
  In 1993, the problems of the flight of capital were widely 
debated. While doing this, the opposition used increasingly 
unlikely capital-outflow figures -- $10 billion, $17 billion, 
$30 billion and $80 billion. It was asserted that, because of 
this, the budget has a deficit and that decisive measures need 
only be taken and the state of the economy and the standard of 
living will immediately be improved dramatically. It is clear 
that two factors have become interwoven here -- economic 
ignorance and the traditional longing for a "magic wand," with 
the aid of which all problems can be solved easily and quickly. 
  In fact, the problem of the flight of capital arises from 
the 
following elements: 
  1. The attempt not to repatriate export earnings and other 
currency receipts in order to avoid the obligatory sale and 
taxation. It is quite natural that the political and economic 
instability is driving many firms to these actions. 
  It is extremely doubtful that there are more than $5-10 
billion in such funds abroad. Even if they had been repatriated 
to Russia, a large portion of them would not have gone into the 
state budget, since the bulk of them are private funds. 
  2. The enterprises' attempt to keep earned funds in foreign 
currency, the "flight from the ruble," can also be regarded as 
an outflow of capital and, simultaneously, as a manifestation of 
the dollarization of the economy. The fact that almost $20 
billion are officially in the accounts of Russian legal persons 
is a manifestation of the lack of confidence in the ruble and 
leads to the understatement of its exchange rate. 
  3. The attempt to export from Russia accumulated capital in 
currency form is a violation of the law. 
  It is obvious that the outflow of capital is disadvantageous 
for the Russian economy and, at times, a desire is expressed to 
impose administrative restrictions on the movement of currency 
assets, although the main direction of reform should be the 
almost complete abolition of restrictions on the movement of 
capital and comprehensive liberalization of currency conditions. 
However, it is necessary to have a reliable control system 
before abolishing the existing restrictions. Consequently, the 
two most important conditions for stopping the flight of capital 
consist of the following: 
  setting up effective currency control; lowering inflation; 
stabilizing the economic and political situation in the country. 
<H5>  5.3. Relations with International Organizations and the G7 </H5>
  In 1993, Russia's consultations with international 
financial organizations intensified significantly. On the whole, 
over the year which passed after Russia's entry into the 
International Monetary Fund (IMF) and the World Bank's group (as 
of November of 1992), Russia received around $3.5 billion from 
international financial organizations. More modest were the sums 
in the mutual relations with the European Bank for 
Reconstruction and Development (YeBRR [EBRD]). 
<H5>  5.3.1. The International Monetary Fund </H5>
  In 1992, Russia received from the IMF the first part of 
the reserve (Standby) credit in the amount of 719 million SDRs 
[Special Drawing Right] ($1 billion), which was placed in 
deposit accounts in the Central Bank. In September of 1993, $500 
million of this money was spent to pay the foreign debt. 
  In 1993, after the adoption of the declaration of the 
government and the Central Bank on economic policy and the 
implementation of a number of important measures, the first part 
of the special credit for the support of the reforms (STF) of 
1.1 billion SDRs ($1.5 billion) was received, the funds of which 
were used in July and August to fund the state's budget deficit. 
  The agreements with the IMF provide for granting credits in 
two parts. The first part is distributed upon the conclusion of 
an agreement, while the second part is distributed upon the 
attainment of agreed-upon macroeconomic indicators. Due to the 
fact that Russia could not achieve substantial progress in 
achieving financial stabilization, the grant of the second part 
of the credits was delayed and now talks are being held on the 
resumption of the extension of credit at the beginning of 1994. 
<H5>  5.3.2. The International Bank for Reconstruction and </H5>
Development 
  The World Bank's program provides for granting to Russia 
funds in the amount of around $2.5-4.0 billion annually. In 
1992, the MBRR [International Bank for Reconstruction and 
Development -- IBRD] granted Russia the first part of a 
rehabilitation loan in the amount of $600 million. In 1993, $390 
million of these funds were used. 
  In 1993, two agreements were signed with the IBRD: a 
rehabilitation loan for the oil industry ($610 million) and a 
loan for the implementation of the privatization program ($120 
million). The signing of a second rehabilitation loan, planned 
for the end of 1993, is being delayed in connection with the 
fact that it has been linked with the IMF's granting of the 
second part of the STF credit. 
  Agreements have been reached and are intended to be signed 
in 
1994 for loans for housing construction, for the rehabilitation 
and maintenance of highways, for municipal transport, for the 
development of exporting, for the structural reorganization of 
enterprises, for improvement of the financial and banking 
sphere, for the development of employment and social protection 
services, for ecological needs, and for training personnel. 
  Russia's payments to the IBRD have been formalized by means 
of a tender for 44,795 shares for the sum of U.S. $300 million, 
which amounts to 2.99 percent of the total amount of the bank's 
charter capital. As stipulated by the IBRD's rules, $33.4 
million have been paid directly, while notes in rubles have been 
drawn up for the remaining amount. 
<H5>  5.3.3. The European Bank for Reconstruction and Development </H5>
  The European Bank is financing projects in the private and 
state sectors of the countries of Eastern Europe and the 
republics of the former USSR. At the same time, in accordance 
with the bank's charter, up to 60 percent of its investments are 
supposed to go for investments in the non-state sphere. 
  Prior to 1993, EBRD loans for the state were not granted to 
Russia. In 1993, agreements were signed and went into effect on 
loans for the rehabilitation of Western Siberia's oil and gas 
wells ($174.3 million) and for privatization technical 
assistance ($43.8 million). At the end of 1993, a framework 
agreement was signed between the Russian Government and the EBRD 
on credits for the oil-producing associations, which define the 
general conditions for the EBRD's extension of credit to 
individual Russian oil-producing associations without state 
guarantees on the part of Russia. 
  Based on the status at the end of 1993, the bank's Board of 
Directors approved 16 projects for realization in Russia, the 
overall value of which is estimated to be 1.3 billion ECUs 
[European Currency Unit] ($1.7 billion). The EBRD's proposed 
participation in these projects comes to around 500 million 
ECUs. Another 19 projects are in the preparation stage. 
Basically, these projects pertain to the energy and transport 
sectors, as well as to the financial sphere. 
  Work is continuing on the EBRD's project for the development 
of small and medium-sized business in Russia, which provides for 
the establishment jointly with the leading "Seven" countries of 
a fund for small and medium-sized business in the amount of $300 
million. The program provides for the extension of credit to 
small and medium-sized enterprises, as well as for the fund's 
participation in their charter capital. 
  At the same time, the effectiveness of the cooperation with 
the EBRD remains clearly below its potential. To date, within 
the framework of the realization of the projects for the state, 
only $7.6 million of the bank's loan funds have been used. At 
the same time, Russia has already paid $56 million into the 
EBRD's charter capital and another $84 million are supposed to 
be paid in the next few years. 
<H5>  5.3.4. The Multilateral Investment Guaranty Agency (MAGI) </H5>
  In February of 1993, the Russian Government approved the 
issuing of MAGI [MIGA] guarantees for an investment project in 
the RF, which the Belgian firm, Multiserv International N.V., 
intends to carry out. The total amount of the investments for 
this project will come to $11 million and the size of the 
guarantee is $9.9 million. 
<H5>  5.3.5. The International Finance Corporation (MFK) </H5>
  When granting credit, the MFK [IFC] does not require state 
guarantees, but rather, it concludes agreements directly with 
enterprises and organizations. According to the Ministry of 
Finance's information, at the present time, IFC funds are 
beginning to be received within the framework of four projects. 
The IFC is contemplating investing in all $61.5 million in the 
oil-producing industry. In addition, up to $23 million will be 
granted to the Russian private sector and to joint ventures 
through the International Moscow Bank and the Framlington 
Investment Fund. 
  In 1993, $52.8 million were paid to the IFC as membership 
dues and, up to 1996, another $28.5 million will have to be 
paid. Dividends are paid annually on the funds deposited by the 
RF in the charter capital of the IMF, the IBRD, the EBRD, the 
MIGA, the MAR [International Development Association -- IDA], 
and the IFC. 
<H5>  5.3.6. The "Big Seven" </H5>
  In 1993, for the first time, talks with the countries of 
the "Big Seven" were placed on a permanent basis. A simple list 
of the meetings which have taken place testifies to the 
intensity of the contacts: 
  March -- a meeting with the sherpas [technical experts] in 
Hong Kong; 
  April -- a meeting of the ministers of finance and foreign 
affairs in Tokyo; 
  July -- a summit meeting in Tokyo based on the formula 7+1; 
  September -- a meeting with the ministers of finance and the 
chairmen of the central banks in Washington during the annual 
meeting of the IMF/IBRD; 
  and December -- a meeting with the sherpas in Paris. 
  It is necessary to emphasize not only the regularity, but 
also the highly representative nature of the talks held, in 
which Russia participated on an equal basis and, in a number of 
instances, acted as the direct initiator of the discussion of 
one question or another. A fact which reflects the recognition 
of Russia's status as an equal partner is its advance invitation 
to the next summit of the "Seven" in Naples in 1994. 
  The central event of the year in the relations with the "Big 
Seven" countries was unquestionably the July summit meeting in 
Tokyo. The understandings reached in the Japanese capital during 
the April consultations of the ministers of finance and foreign 
affairs were confirmed and developed further there. The results 
of the Tokyo round were of important significance for stirring 
up the West's efforts to give assistance to the economic reforms 
in Russia, giving the international assistance a more specific 
and purposeful nature. 
  The following items can be regarded as among the most 
substantial understandings about supporting Russia, announced 
based on the results of the meeting: 
  -- the granting of IMF credit for the purposes of system 
transformations ($3 billion); 
  -- the granting of an IBRD rehabilitation loan ($600 
million); 
  -- the rendering of financial support to the process of the 
privatization and restructuring of industrial enterprises ($2 
billion, including free assistance); 
  -- the establishment under the management of the EBRD of a 
fund for supporting the development of small and medium-sized 
business ($300 million); 
  -- the obtaining from the "Seven" countries of new export 
credits (up to $10 billion); 
  -- and the restructuring and deferment of payments on the 
foreign debt. 
  The rendering of assistance was conditioned on the adherence 
of the Russian leadership's course to the continuation of 
reforms and on progress in the attainment of the financial 
stabilization goals. The government's retreat in the fall of 
last year from the accepted obligations led to a delay in the 
implementation of many assistance programs. Problems also arose 
among the Western partners, which were associated, in 
particular, with the comprehension of the necessity of 
abandoning standard approaches and schemes of cooperation and 
with the difficulties with the mobilization of the promised 
financial assets. 
  In 1993, Russia received from the IMF only half of the 
credit 
for the purpose of system transformations. The granting of the 
remaining funds was postponed because of the deterioration of 
the financial situation in the country. The same fate befell 
almost completely the rehabilitation loan prepared and agreed 
upon with the IBRD. 
  The preparation of two loans by the IBRD and the EBRD for a 
total amount of $800 million within the framework of the program 
for financial support of privatization and restructuring has 
almost been completed. A free aid package for investments in 
fixed capital is also being put together. The program's 
uniqueness consists of the fact that the funds will be sent 
directly to enterprises through Russian commercial banks. 
  The formation of the fund for support of small and 
medium-sized business is being delayed. The "Seven" countries 
have not deposited into the fund the portion of the assets which 
is their share. The EBRD has independently started on the 
preparations for several "pilot" programs which are not 
comparable, however, to the amounts and goals agreed upon in 
Tokyo: the first five lines of credit for Russian regional 
commercial banks in the amount of $2.5 billion are ready for 
opening. At the same time, energetic efforts to assist the 
program have been undertaken by the Russian side. Thus, within a 
short time frame, the Bank for Entrepreneurship Development was 
established, the start of operations of which has been planned 
for January of 1994. In addition to the extension of credit to 
small and medium-sized entrepreneurs, the bank will also render 
financial support to the privatization process. 
  In the area of export credits, framework agreements have 
been 
signed with the U.S. Export-Import Bank on the financing of the 
oil and gas sector ($2 billion) and the extension of credit to 
other sectors' enterprises ($2 billion). For the first time, 
credits will be granted by the American side without state 
guarantees. It must also be noted that, under pressure from the 
"Seven" countries for the realization of similar projects, the 
World Bank has granted Russia an exemption from the so-called 
"negative tax," which, in particular, opened up for the gas 
industry the possibility of obtaining direct Italian credit. 
<H8>  The Basic Tasks for 1994 </H8>
  1. Obtaining the second part [tranche] of the system credit. 
  2. Concluding a "stand-by" agreement with the IMF. 
  3. Beginning the practical fulfillment of the programs for 
privatization and the support of small business. 


Table 14. The Use of Credits from International Financial Organizations (in Millions 
of Dollars) 

                  Signing    Total        1992       1993       1994,       Total for 
                  Date       Agreement                          Forecast    1992-1994 
                             Amount 

Total Financial              4,842.7      1,006.6    1,759.6    2,052.9     4,819.1 
Credits 

IMF 

-- Stand-by I     5 Aug 92   1,006.6      1,006.6    0          0           1,006.6 


-- System         30 Jun     1,509.6      0          1,509.6    0           1,509.6 
Transformation    93 
Facility I 

-- System         --         1,509.6      0          0          1,509.6     1,509.6 
Transformation 
Facility II 

IBRD 

-- First          16 Nov     250.0        0          250.0      0           250.0 
Rehabilitation    92 
Loan 
(Decentralized 
Importing) 

--                15 May     45.0         0          0          29.0        29.0 
Privatization     93 
Loan (Financial 
Part)[.sup]1[/] 

-- Second         --         500.0        0          0          500.0       500.0 
Rehabilitation 
Loan 
(Decentralized 
Importing) 

EBRD 

--                15 May     21.9         0          0          14.3        14.3 
Privatization     93 
Loan (Financial 
Part)[.sup]1[/] 

Total Commodity              2,152.2      0          140.7      904.1       1,044.8 
Credits 

IBRD 

-- First          16 Nov     350.0        0          140.0      210.0       350.0 
Rehabilitation    92 
Loan 
(Centralized 
Importing) 

--                15 May     45.0         0          0          29.0        29.0 
Privatization     93 
Loan (Commodity 
Part)[.sup]1[/] 

-- Loan for       12 Aug     610.0        0          0          378.8       378.8 
Rehabilitation    93 
of Oil Industry 


-- Employment     --         70.0         0          0.7        55.0        55.7 
and Social 
Protection 
Service 

-- Highway Loan   --         300.0        0          0          50.0        50.0 


-- Loan for       --         100.0        0          0          30.0        30.0 
Rehabilitation 
of Exporting 

-- Second         --         100.0        0          0          20.0        20.0 
Rehabilitation 
Loan 
(Centralized 
Importing) 

-- Loan for       --         381.3        0          0          12.0        12.0 
Agricultural 
Reform (ARIS) 

EBRD 

-- Loan for       5 Aug 93   174.0        0          0          105.0       105.0 
Rehabilitation 
of Oil Industry 


--                15 Mar     21.9         0          0          14.3        14.3 
Privatization     93 
Loan (Commodity 
Part)[.sup]1[/] 

Total Financial              6,994.9      1,006.6    1,900.3    2,957.0     5,863.9 
and Commodity 
Credits 

1. The privatization loan has commodity and financial parts. The arbitrary accepted 
ratio between them is 1:1. 

The IBRD's        15 May     90.0 
share of the      93 
privatization 
loan on the 
whole 

The EBRD's        15 Mar     43.8 
share of the      93 
privatization 
loan on the 
whole 


<H5>  5.4. Currency Debts and Credits) </H5>
<H5>  5.4.1. Debt Negotiations </H5>
  In accordance with the government's Decree No 364 of 23 
April 1993 On the Procedure for Continuation of the Work on the 
Restructuring of the Foreign Indebtedness of the Former USSR and 
Decree No 732 of 30 July 1993 On the Authority of the Russian 
Federation Delegation in Negotiations with the London Club of 
Creditor Banks on the Restructuring of the Foreign Debt of the 
Former USSR, negotiations are being conducted with the official 
creditor members of the Paris club and the negotiations with the 
commercial creditor banks of the former USSR (the London club) 
have also been resumed. 
  At the same time, negotiations are being held on the terms 
of 
an agreement which correspond to the basic agreement of 2 April 
1993 for the "Paris Club" signed between the Russian Government 
and the official creditor nations, which provide for a 5-year 
grace period and a repayment period for the deferred payments 
over the course of 5 years. The uniqueness of the agreement with 
the Paris club lies in the fact that it is not just the payments 
to pay off the basic debt which have been restructured, but also 
the payments for part of the interest payments. 
  At the present time, negotiations have been conducted with 
all 18 of the club's member countries. Complete agreement has 
been reached on 14 agreements (of these, 8 have been signed, 
Ireland has received the payment due in 1993 and the rest are 
ready for signing). There are disagreements on key questions 
with two countries -- Finland and Italy. With respect to the 
remaining two countries (Canada and Holland), agreement has been 
reached on drafts of bilateral agreements in their basic 
features and all that remains is to reach a final agreement in 
due time. 
  Such a lengthy time for concluding the negotiations is 
necessary, inasmuch as the discussion and signing of a bilateral 
agreement should be preceded by work carried out by the Foreign 
Economic Activity Bank and the corresponding partner overseas 
and the signing of a corresponding protocol. In addition, the 
necessity of observing the principle of an equal attitude toward 
all creditors makes it impossible to agree with the demands put 
forward by Italy and Finland, inasmuch as this contradicts 
Russia's interests and it will also complicate the negotiation 
coming up in 1994 with the Paris club about granting a deferment 
for the payments due during this year. 
  All this made it possible to reduce substantially the burden 
on Russia's budget in the past year, inasmuch as the total 
amount of the payments to pay off the foreign debt came to 
around $2.5 billion, instead of $18 billion, as it would have 
been in the absence of an agreement on restructuring. This 
amount inherently includes the payments to all creditors of the 
former USSR and Russia. At the same time, the agreement with the 
Paris club obliges Russia to be guided firmly by similar 
conditions for debt repayment in the negotiations not only with 
its participants, but also with all the remaining creditors. 
  Similar work will be carried out in 1994 as well, inasmuch 
as 
the payments due in this year for repayment of the former USSR's 
debt exceed not only our capabilities, but also the similar data 
for the current year. 
  Negotiations have been held with the Bank Advisory Commitee 
of the London club of commercial banks (600). In the summer, an 
agreement was concluded on the payment of part of the interest 
for 1992 and 1993 in the amount of $500 million, as well as on 
the necessity of concluding a basic agreement on the 
restructuring of the former USSR's debt through long-term bank 
credits. Almost all of its conditions have been agreed upon 
except for the relinquishing of sovereign immunity and Central 
Bank guarantees for the payments. Russia cannot accept this 
condition legally or politically. 
<H5>  5.4.2. Attracting New Credits </H5>
  In January of 1993, the government's Monetary and Economic 
Commission approved the Ministry of Economics' proposals about 
strategic importing for 1993 in the amount of $8.8 billion, 
including $6.4 billion for credits and $2.4 billion in cash 
($0.6 billion for debt repayment). During this period (1992), 
Russia's policy for foreign borrowing was formed on the basis of 
the needs of enterprises and sectors for importing without real 
consideration of the country's payment capabilities. As a 
result, the problems of the budget stabilization and the foreign 
debt burden worsened. In order to reduce the borrowing amounts, 
at the request of the Ministry of Finance, with consideration of 
the actual capabilities, in August of 1993 the amount of foreign 
credits for the purpose of strategic importing in the second 
half of the year was reduced significantly. 
  The actual use of foreign credits in 1993 amounted to $4.2 
billion, including $2 billion for financing the importing of 
medicines, grain, foodstuffs and raw materials; and $2.2 billion 
for financing purchases of investment commodities. Thus, the 
amount of the increase in Russia's foreign debt was successfully 
reduced by $2.2 billion. Russia's creditors in 1993 were: 
  USA -- $370 million; 
  Germany -- $2,465 million; 
  Japan -- $150 million; 
  France -- $680 million; 
  Italy -- $230 million; 
  Canada -- $60 million; 
  Turkey -- $45 million; 
  ECC -- $200 million. 
  The problem of the state's mutual relations with Russian 
enterprises as a consequence of their significant indebtedness 
to the federal budget for the foreign credits used is currently 
acute. The negative consequences of the decisions made in 1992 
and at the beginning of 1993, when purchases of equipment for a 
number of enterprises were included in the government-guaranteed 
credit lines without analysis of the enterprises' financial 
capabilities on the basis of promises to pay for the credit 
independently, are becoming apparent. As a result, after the 
government's obligations became effective, the enterprises 
announced their inability to pay off the credits, demanded state 
subsidies or requested a full write-off of the indebtedness to 
the budget. 
  In order to regulate the work associated with attracting and 
using foreign credits, on 16 October 1993 the Russian Government 
adopted Decree No 1060, in accordance with which the entire set 
of questions on the preparation of drafts of government 
decisions on foreign borrowing has been entrusted to the 
Ministry of Finance. In this connection, the basic principles of 
the country's credit policy will be: 
  1. The establishment of annual maximum amounts for foreign 
borrowing as a firm limitation for attracting and using foreign 
credits and issuing guarantees. After the approval by the 
Federal Assembly of the maximum amounts of state foreign 
borrowing, the Ministry of Finance will draft and submit for the 
government's approval a detailed borrowing program. 
  2. The regulation of the practice of attracting credits by 
administrative organs of various levels, as well as by 
enterprises which are state property. 
  3. Orientation toward unrestricted financial credits, mainly 
credits from international financial organizations, for the 
purpose of maintaining the country's balance of payments, the 
establishment of currency reserves and the funding of the 
federal budget's deficit. 
  4. A strict approach to the formation of a list of 
enterprises included in credit lines, based on an analysis of 
their financial conditions, efficiency in the use of loan funds 
and independent implementation of payments for credit, as well 
as the granting of security notes (for example, the pledging of 
assets in favor of the state). Subsequently, it will be 
necessary to shift to the practice of project financing, which 
makes no provision for state payment pledges. 
  5. The abandonment of the practice of subsidizing imported 
goods and short-term credits. 
  6. Restricting the issuing of government guarantees to 
individual Russian borrowers who accept foreign credits outside 
of intergovernmental agreements. Guarantees will be granted only 
if the borrower has reliable sources for repaying the credit. 
  Solving these matters will make it possible to ensure 
optimum 
and efficient use of credit resources with consideration of the 
economy's development priorities and will promote the balancing 
of foreign relations and the normalization of the country's 
currency situation. 
<H5>  5.4.3. Servicing the Foreign Debt in 1994 </H5>
  At the end of 1993, Russia's foreign debt, including the 
former USSR's debt, amounted to more than $80 billion (without 
taking into account the indebtedness for settlements with the 
former CEMA countries). In connection with the lack of 
capability to carry out fully the payments for paying off the 
debt in 1992-1993, these amounts are subject to restructuring by 
the creditors in accordance with the achieved or outlined 
understandings. At the present time, the negotiations with the 
Paris club on restructuring the debt for 1994 have not yet been 
completed and Russia has received a 3-month deferment for the 
first quarter on the 1993 terms. 
  In 1994, the payments for paying off the foreign debt should 
amount to $28 billion. In order to reduce these payments, it is 
necessary to reach an agreement with the creditors on a new 
restructuring, which will lead to an increase in the amount of 
the payments for servicing the debt in 1995. In order to avoid a 
geometrical increase in the payments for servicing the debt in 
1994's budget, it is necessary to provide for expenditures for 
servicing the overdue debt in amounts appreciably larger than in 
1993, as well as funds for the full servicing of the new Russian 
debt of 1992-1993. 
  In the draft of 1994's budget, provision is being made for 
payments for servicing the foreign debt in the amount of $6.4 
billion, including: 
  1) $3.8 billion for the former USSR's debts (taking into 
account the restructuring for the payments for 1992, 1993 and 
1994); 
  2) and for Russia's debts (1992-1993) in the amount of $2.6 
billion. 
  This sum is 2.5 times greater than the sum payed in 1993 and 
this fact presupposes a strict limitation on the volumes and 
conditions for new borrowing. 
  Part of industry, as well as the social sphere, as before, 
need to import medicines and certain types of raw materials not 
produced in Russia and the CIS countries. In principle, the 
financing of these transactions should be carried out without 
state participation. However, during the transition period, 
Russian enterprises are unable to attract foreign credits 
without government guarantees. The government is being compelled 
to do this in minimal amounts, but to preserve the practice of 
special-purpose foreign loans. In order to do this, it is 
necessary to reach an agreement with creditors about conditions 
for obtaining credit, which do not exert noticeable influence on 
the level of servicing of the foreign debt for the next 2 years. 
  In order to fund the budget deficit, as well as to finance 
import purchases of equipment, medicines and certain types of 
raw materials, provision is being made in the budget draft for 
attracting financial resources through foreign sources in the 
amount of $6.3 billion, including $2.5 billion in unrestricted 
financial credits from international financial organizations; 
and $3.8 billion in restricted export credits (of those, $1 
billion are restricted credits from international financial 
organizations). 
  No provision is being made in the 1994 budget draft for 
financing import purchases of grain and foodstuffs using foreign 
credits. 
<H5>  5.4.4. Granting Credits </H5>
  For many years, the USSR was the largest creditor of many 
developing and former socialist countries. Credits were granted 
basically in the form of deliveries of equipment, construction 
services and otherwise in rubles. On 1 December 1993, credits 
worth R147.8 billion or $254.8 billion were granted. The actual 
indebtedness of these countries amounts to R93.2 billion ($160.7 
billion), including overdue indebtedness of R30.2 billion ($52 
billion). In accordance with agreements, the repayment of the 
indebtedness is supposed to be carried out in the amount of $6-7 
billion per year. 
  However, the repayment amounts are decreasing from year to 
year, delays have increased, problems have arisen with respect 
to the ruble's exchange rate and Russia's lawful succession and 
the payment structure is deteriorating. In a number of 
instances, it is necessary to agree to repayment of the debts at 
a discount from their nominal amount. 
  In 1993, the account for repayment of foreign states' debt 
received $138.2 million in cash and $200 million in commodity 
shipments, the ruble equivalent of which amounted to R47.4 
billion. The sale of the commodities was conducted by Russian 
importers using the different import factors established by the 
Ministry of Finance in relation to the competitiveness and 
quality of the goods. Part of the shipments went for 1994 in 
connection with the development of a new system for calculating 
the ruble equivalent of these shipments. 
  The payment of funds into the budget as repayment of 
indebtedness by debtor nations will remain, as before, 
insignificant and is estimated for 1994 to be in the amount of 
$1.55 billion, including $0.11 billion in cash and $1.44 billion 
in goods and services. 
  In accordance with intergovernmental agreements, Russia is 
continuing to grant state credits to a number of developing 
countries, basically, India, Cuba, Algeria and Guinea. Provision 
has been made for these expenditures in the 1994 budget in the 
amount of R1.0 trillion. 
  In April of 1993, the granting of "technical" credits to CIS 
member states, the total amount of which came to R2.407 
trillion, was stopped. As of May of 1993, the granting of 
credits to the CIS states is being done through the budget on 
the basis of intergovernmental agreements. In all, based on the 
agreements reached, the amount of these credits was supposed to 
come to R895 billion, while R503 billion were actually granted. 
<H5>  5.4.5. The Domestic Currency Debt </H5>
  The use of currency funds paid into the USSR Foreign 
Economic Activity Bank up to 31 December 1991 was halted by 
Decision No 2172-1 of 13 January 1992 of the Presidium of the 
Supreme Soviet of Russia On the USSR Foreign Economic Activity 
Bank. These funds were used for payments on the foreign debt and 
the payment of centralized importing of raw materials, 
materials, foodstuffs, medicines and consumer goods for all the 
former USSR's republics. 
  At the same time, Russia acknowledged lawful succession for 
the USSR's obligations to Russia's natural and legal persons for 
the accounts in the Foreign Economic Activity Bank. Adopted in 
order to fulfill the obligations was Presidential Edict No 1565 
of 7 December 1992 on Measures for the Regulation of the Former 
USSR's Domestic Currency Debt, which stipulated: 
  -- the re-registration of the USSR's obligations to Russian 
enterprises, organizations, institutions and banks for their 
accounts in the Foreign Economic Activity Bank as bonds in 
foreign currency; 
  -- the repayment of the Foreign Economic Activity Bank's 
indebtedness to natural persons as of 1 July 1993 on their first 
demand (in 1993, the Ministry of Finance allocated $240.2 
million to the Foreign Economic Activity Bank for this purpose); 
  -- the priority (over the course of the first year) 
repayment 
of bonds issued by the charitable fund for the full amount of 
the frozen assets in accounts in the Foreign Economic Activity 
Bank; 
  -- and the repayment of the domestic currency debt to other 
Russian legal persons which have accounts in the Foreign 
Economic Activity Bank during a period of 1-15 years, proceeding 
on the basis of the priorities specified by the edict. 
  The procedure and terms for issuing a domestic state 
currency 
bond loan and the time frames for issuing bonds to legal persons 
which have accounts in the Foreign Economic Activity Bank have 
been approved by the government's Decree No 222 of 15 March 1993 
On the Approval of the Terms for Issuing a Domestic State 
Currency Bond Loan. In conformity with it, the Ministry of 
Finance has issued bonds with face values of U.S. $1,000, 
$10,000 and $100,000 for a total amount of $7.885 billion. 
Provision has been made for the payment of an annual interest of 
3 percent on the bonds. The repayment time frames are 1, 3, 6, 
10 and 15 years in accordance with the bond terms specified by 
the presidential edict. The bonds can be sold publicly at market 
value for freely convertible currency or rubles. 
  In order to ensure repayment of the bonds, the Ministry of 
Finance will make provision annually in the federal budget for 
the appropriate amounts subject to payment to bond holders. In 
order to repay the first part on 14 May 1994, in 1993, the 
Ministry of Finance set aside $330 million in deposit accounts 
(the total amount of the payments, including interest, comes to 
around $500 million). 
<H5>  5.4.6. Foreign Investments in Russia </H5>
  The year 1993 did not produce a noticeable enlivening of 
foreign investors' activities in Russia. Caution and a 
wait-and-see attitude remained typical features. Investments 
were basically directed toward projects not requiring large 
expenditures and with a fast payback. The investment amounts 
also remained modest -- their total amount at the end of 1993 
was estimated to be $2 billion. 
  Russia continued to attract foreign investors mainly by 
natural advantages: a capacious domestic market, abundant 
reserves of natural resources, a relatively skilled and cheap 
labor force, a developed scientific and technical potential and 
opportunities for entry into the CIS countries' markets, which 
creates the objective prerequisites for the profitable 
investment of capital. 
  Joint ventures remained the basic form of foreign 
investments. In 1993, 5,400 joint companies were registered (as 
against 4,500 in 1992) and their overall number exceeded 11,700. 
At the same time, the number of enterprises wholly owned by a 
foreign investor increased. The share of the latter in the total 
number of enterprises with foreign participation reached nearly 
40 percent (as against 19 percent in 1992). The declared charter 
capital of the companies formed in 1993 amounted to R1,327.6 
billion and the scope of foreign participation was R725.1 
billion ($670 million). It must be taken into account that the 
discussion is only about the partners' intentions. In practice, 
during the initial period of activity, 10-15 percent of the 
announced amount is usually invested. 
  The main stream of investments into Russia continued to come 
from the countries of the West (more than 90 percent of all 
investments). The USA remained the largest investor. The share 
of partners from the former CEMA came to around 5 percent and, 
for developing states, it was less than 4 percent of the total 
amount of invested capital. A distinctive feature of the past 
year was the increase in investments made by China's commercial 
trade companies in the development of the sphere of services and 
light industry of the Far East. Based on the number of newly 
established enterprises with 100-percent foreign participation, 
China occupied the leading position in 1993. 
  For the majority of enterprises with foreign participation, 
the diversification of operations was typical, which testifies 
to the investors' uncertainty about the prospects of the 
situation in Russia. Despite the opinion that foreign capital is 
rushing mainly into the sphere of services, nearly half of the 
companies tried to set up production activities. Investments 
were directed primarily into the production of consumer goods 
(clothing, footwear, food, durable goods and building materials) 
and the raw materials sectors (especially oil and gas 
production). 
  In the sphere of services, foreign capital accumulated in 
those sectors whose development determines the condition of the 
market infrastructure: information science, communications and 
telecommunications, personnel training, consultation and 
auditing services and advertising. Western investors have 
displayed a growing interest in the operation of the banking 
business, the insurance business and real estate marketing. 
  The foreign investments are still playing a minor role in 
Russia's economy. In 1993, the share of enterprises with foreign 
capital in the overall total of industrial production did not 
exceed 2.5 percent, in the total number of employed people -- 
0.2 percent, in exporting -- 4 percent and in importing -- 6 
percent. 
  A perceptible effect from the influx of foreign capital may 
be noticeable only with the arrival of large strategic 
investors. Currently, however, there are no legal conditions and 
no mechanism for attracting foreign investments adequate for the 
needs of the economy's reorganization period. Western capital is 
not ready for large-scale investing in Russia. Its activities 
are limited to the realization of small projects not associated 
with the introduction of the latest technologies and not 
requiring significant expenditures, but which make it possible 
to maintain a presence in Russia. 
<H8>  The Basic Tasks for 1994 </H8>
  1. The conclusion of a long-term agreement with the Paris 
and London clubs on debt restructuring. 
  2. Payments on debts in 1994 at a level which will make it 
possible to shift to regulation of the indebtedness for the 
basic amounts of the overdue credits. 
  3. The complete fulfillment of the domestic currency debt 
obligations. 
<H5>  6. Russia's Financial System </H5>
  Russia's financial system includes the set of state and 
non-state specialized institutions which carry out various types 
of financial, credit, monetary, insurance and currency 
transactions, offer auditing services, provide consultations on 
the entire range of financial and economic matters and regulate 
the financial sphere. 
  State regulation of the financial and credit spheres is 
represented, first of all, by the RF Ministry of Finance and the 
RF Central Bank (not examined here). 
  Other state organs which are part of the financial system 
include the State Tax Service, the Tax Investigation Department, 
the Federal Service for Currency and Export Control, the Federal 
Service for Oversight of Insurance Activities, the State Customs 
Committee, and the Committee on Precious Metals and Precious 
Stones. 
  Prior to the reorganization at the end of 1993, the 
Committee 
on Price Policy and the State Inspectorate for the State 
Monopoly on Alcoholic Products also existed. 
  In order to coordinate the activities of the various organs 
of state management in the area of finances and credit, a number 
of commissions were established, including the Governmental 
Commission on Credit Policy Matters and the presidential 
commissions on securities and auditing activities. 
  Among the commercial organizations which are part of the 
financial system, the following stand out: 
  -- commercial banks (not examined here); 
  -- insurance companies; 
  -- auditing companies. 
<H5>  6.1. The Russian Ministry of Finance </H5>
  The Russian Ministry of Finance has been operating since 
1802 and has undergone reorganization repeatedly, including a 
merger in 1992 with the Ministry of Economics. 
  In 1993, the Ministry of Finance was the government's main 
organ in the area of the financial, tax, credit and currency 
policies, having gotten back for itself a number of functions 
previously in the Ministry of Economics, the Ministry of Foreign 
Economic Relations and other departments. In 1993, the Ministry 
of Finance, for all practical purposes, ceased to be the guiding 
organ for the ministries of finance (19 in all), 
administrations, committees and departments of finance of the 
federation entities. On 1 January 1994, the actual number of 
central staff associates of the Ministry of Finance came to 
1,181 people as against 1.061 at the beginning of 1993. 
Attracting skilled personnel remained the most important problem. 
  The Ministry of Finance's system includes: 
  -- the central staff, the Treasury, the Control and Auditing 
Administration and Goznak [State Bank Notes, Coins and Medals 
Main Administration]. 
  The Treasury was established in 1993 in order to 
carry out the function of the execution of the budget, 
settlement, deposit and other transactions, which the Central 
Bank previously performed. The Treasury, headed up by the 
Federal Treasury Main Administration, which is part of the 
Ministry of Finance's central staff, has been subordinated 
directly to the minister of finance. In essence, the Treasury is 
the Ministry of Finance's domestic bank, with local branches and 
its own settlement system. On 1 January 1994, 59 territorial 
organs with a total force of 8,000 people (it will be 20,000 in 
the future) were established. 
  The Ministry of Finance's Control and Auditing 
Administration has been active since 1923 and has around 
8,000 staff members. This system has also been subordinated 
directly to the minister of finance. There are KRU [Control and 
Auditing Administration] organs in all federation entities, 
cities and rayons. They are funded from the federal budget. The 
Control and Auditing Administration is the sole state financial 
control system, which carries out document inspections at state 
enterprises, organizations and institutions and conducts checks 
on the instructions of the MVD [Ministry of Internal Affairs] 
within the framework of the struggle against organized crime. In 
1993, the Control and Auditing Administration conducted more 
than 50,000 document checks and inspections, the economic impact 
of which amounted to around R400 billion. The main problem is 
the lack of a legislative basis for state financial control. 
  In 1993, the following basic changes occurred in the 
structure of the Ministry of Finance's central staff, which 
reflect the change in its functions; 
  -- the establishment of the Macroeconomic Policy Department; 
  -- the conversion of the Budget Execution Administration 
into 
the Federal Treasury Main Administration (actually the central 
staff of the Treasury); 
  -- the conversion of the Balance of Payments and Foreign 
Credits Administration into the Foreign Credits and Foreign Debt 
Department; 
  -- and the establishment of the International Financial 
Organizations Department. 
  In addition, the Ministry of Finance has the following basic 
functional subdivisions: the Budget Department, the Currency 
Department, the Tax Reforms Department, the Securities and 
Financial Market Department, the Credit and Monetary Circulation 
Department, the Bookkeeping Records and Reports [Financial 
Balance Sheet] Methodology Department, sectorial financing 
departments, the Control and Auditing Administration, and the 
Legal Department. 
  There is still quite a large number of sectorial 
subdivisions 
for financing the defense complex, construction and the 
construction industry, transport systems and communications, 
agriculture, light industry and the services sphere, the social 
sphere and science, industry and the state machinery. One of the 
tasks of the improvement of the Ministry of Finance's structure 
lies in the reduction of sectorial subdivisions in favor of 
functional ones, with a gradual transfer of their functions to 
the Budget Department. The Budget Department, in turn, is 
supposed to be integrated in the future with the Treasury. 
  In January through March of 1993, the Russian Minister of 
Finance was V.V. Barchuk and, as of April and up to the end of 
the year, he was B.G. Fedorov, who simultaneously held the post 
of Deputy Chairman of the Council of Ministers -- the Russian 
Government. 
  In 1993, 12 deputy ministers joined the leadership of the 
Ministry of Finance. The first deputy ministers are A.P. Vavilov 
and S.K. Dubinin (appointed 15 March 1993), The deputy ministers 
are S.V. Aleksashenko (macroeconomics, taxes, bookkeeping 
records; appointed 30 May 1993), A.A. Astakhov (defense 
complex), A.I. Golovatyy (currency problems), A.I. Kazmin 
(credit and monetary circulation and financial markets; 
appointed 1 July 1993), S.A. Korolev (administration), A.A. 
Krasnopivtsev (agro-industrial complex), I.P. Molchanov (the 
social sphere), V.A. Petrov (budget; appointed 7 July 1993), and 
I.A. Selivanov (foreign credits, foreign debt and international 
organizations; appointed 1 July 1993). 
  Over the course of the year, deputy ministers S.B. Gorbachev 
(taxes and credit; 7 July 1993) and P.V. Chernomord (industry; 
30 December 1993) left the Ministry of Finance. 
  From 24 September 1993 through 5 January 1994, A.P. 
Pochinok, 
who was occupied with the takeover of the affairs of the former 
Supreme Soviet, was a deputy minister. Thus, in 1993, six deputy 
ministers were appointed and three were let go. 
<H5>  6.2. Other Financial Organs </H5>
  The year 1993 was marked by the further development of the 
system of state financial organs and, first and foremost, by the 
rapid increase in the forces of the tax service and the tax 
investigation department. 
  It is typical that the actual number of staff members of the 
above-listed departments amounts to around 170,000 as against 
almost 300,000 according to the manning table. This testifies to 
two trends: 
  -- the financial system is just being put together and new 
organs are emerging; in due course, the share of financial 
workers among state personnel will increase substantially; 
  -- and the low wages and the political instability are 
leading to the rapid exodus of personnel into commercial 
structures. 


Table 15. The Number of Workers of Financial Departments 

Organization                     On 1 January       On 1 January 1994 
                                 1993 

Ministry of Finance[.sup](1)[/]   41,258             43,985[.sup](2)[/] 


-- Central Staff                 1.061              1,181 

Including: 

-- Federal Treasury Main         70                 99 
Administration 

State Tax Service                96,570             126,426 

-- Central Staff                 415                473 

Tax Investigation                2,184              9,203 
Department[.sup](3)[/] 

-- Central Staff                 163                338 

Customs Committee                12,856             29,428 

-- Central Staff                 315                428 

RF Committee on Precious         2,752              2,195 
Metals and Precious Stones 

-- Central Staff                 198                224 

Federal Service for Currency     --                 80 
and Export Control 

-- Central Staff                 --                 80 

Federal Inspectorate for         60                 152 
Oversight of Insurance 
Activities 

-- Central Staff                 60                 117 

1. Including the financial organs of federation entities 

2. For 9 months 

3. The Tax Investigations Administration prior to the adoption of the law on 
the Tax Investigation Department 


  An important unresolved problem of the financial system is 
the artificial splitting of state organs, which leads to a lack 
of coordination, of a unified financial policy and of unified 
state financial control. The separation of the "revenuers" (the 
tax service, customs and the RF Committee on Precious Metals and 
Precious Stones) and the control organs (the tax investigation 
department, currency and export control and insurance oversight) 
cannot lead to anything good. Moreover, with the transfer of the 
Committee on Foreign Investments to RAMSiR [Russian Agency for 
International Cooperation and Development], one more important 
facet of the financial policy was lost. 
  Over the course of the year, attempts were made to push the 
Ministry of Finance away from the problems of the foreign debt, 
the credit policy and international organizations. In this 
connection, the Ministry of Finance repeatedly submitted 
corresponding proposals to the government and de facto expanded 
its authority. Nevertheless, without serious changes in the 
government's structure and in the functions of such key 
departments as the Ministry of Finance, it is impossible to 
count on a rapid increase in the effectiveness of the country's 
financial policy. 
<H5>  6.3. The Development of Auditing Activities </H5>
  Auditing activities developed relatively quickly in 1993. 
The first auditing firm, Inaudit, appeared back in 1987. At the 
present time, there are more than 2,000 firms which offer 
auditing and related consultation services in almost all of 
Russia's large and medium-sized cities. In the absence of a law 
on auditing, they have been established and registered as 
ordinary enterprises. In Moscow and St. Petersburg, branches 
have been opened by the largest international auditing firms, 
Arthur Andersen, Coopers and Lybrand, Deloitte and Touche, Ernst 
and Young, Price Waterhouse, and others. 
  On 22 December 1993, a presidential edict On Auditing 
Activities in the Russian Federation was issued, in accordance 
with which the Presidential Commission on Auditing Activities 
has been established. This commission will handle the procedure 
for certification and licensing for auditing activities and 
determine the range of economic entities for which an annual 
auditing check is obligatory (currently, this applies to joint 
ventures, banks, insurance companies and investment funds). 
<H5>  6.4. The Insurance Business </H5>
  In 1993, the rapid development of insurance was observed: 
insurance payments increased from R79.1 billion to approximately 
R1 trillion (as against R13.2 billion in 1991). At the end of 
1993, there were more than 2,000 insurance companies, in which 
around 200,000 people were working, while their number exceeded 
2,000 at the end of the year. At the same time, the pace of 
registration of new companies is not decreasing, but only 2 
percent of all the companies have internal assets of more than 
R100 million, while 70 percent have less than R6 million, which 
indicates the sector's weakness. Because of the restriction of 
the foreign partner's share to 49 percent of the capital, up to 
now, 25 companies with foreign participation have been 
registered and they are not playing a noticeable role. 
  A typical trend is the constant increase in the share of 
non-state companies in the total amount of payments, which came 
to 16 percent in 1991, 57 percent in 1992 and 67 percent for the 
first 9 months of 1993. Of the total amount of insurance 
payments, 35 percent is going for voluntary personal insurance, 
34 percent for voluntary property insurance, 24 percent for 
voluntary liability insurance and 7 percent for compulsory types 
of insurance. 
  The lack of a clear legislative basis and the insurance 
companies' weak financial condition are holding back the 
insurance sector's development, many types of insurance are 
completely lacking and there is no understanding of the benefits 
of insurance under the conditions of a market economy. The task 
for 1994 is a more active expansion of the insurance services 
market and the introduction of insurance into a larger number of 
spheres of life. 
<H5>  7. A Glance into the Future; the Prospects for 1994 </H5>
  As 1993 ended and 1994 began, the Ministry of Finance 
examined several alternative versions of financial and economic 
policies for 1994, which reflect the substantial gamut of 
opinion in this area. The socio-economic consequences of these 
alternative versions were also calculated. 
  The first of the examined versions assumes the abandonment 
of 
the widespread idea that the problems of structural 
reorganization can be solved through emissions, especially when 
conditions have not been created for efficient use of the 
financial resources in the real world. Therefore, in the first 
stage, it is necessary to solve precisely these problems. The 
attainment of efficiency in the use of financial resources in 
the economy, first of all, is associated with progress in two 
directions: the institutional transformations and the 
acquisition by money of real value through supporting favorable 
interest rates for credits to the economy, abandoning the 
widespread use of gratis emission and, as a consequence, 
bringing inflation to a low level. 
  According to the first version, it would be advisable to 
gradually reduce the Central Bank's credit emission in relation 
to the GDP further by a factor of approximately 3 in comparison 
with 1993, bringing it down to 5 percent of the GDP in the 
fourth quarter of this year. In this instance, an average 
monthly inflation of around 5-6 percent would be achieved as 
early as summer. The ruble's exchange rate relative to the 
dollar in the year's second half would amount to R2,000- 2,500 
to the dollar. The decrease in the GDP in real terms over the 
course of the first quarter would be quite considerable (in 
essence, this has already been "programmed' by the economy's 
sluggishness), however, in the subsequent period, it would be 
possible to count on the stabilization of its amounts in real 
terms. On the whole over the year, the GDP's volume would 
decrease by 8-10 percent (December to December). The people's 
actual incomes, after a slight drop in the first quarter, over 
the year as a whole, might increase by another 10 percent, i.e., 
approximately the same as for 1993. 
  The second version calculated by the Ministry of Finance 
assumed that the government would continue the emission support 
of production, but that it would use this mechanism moderately. 
The Central Bank's credit emission in this version would amount 
to 9-10 percent of the GDP in the year's first half and would 
decrease by a factor of 1.5 by year's end. This would make it 
possible to fix the average monthly inflation level achieved by 
year's end at 11-12 percent and to maintain a favorable 
refinancing interest rate. The drop in the GDP would also 
continue over the year as a whole and would amount to around 7-9 
percent. The people's actual incomes would remain at 1993's 
level. The ruble's exchange rate would increase more slowly than 
inflation and would amount to R4,500-5,000 to the dollar by 
year's end. Within the framework of this version, just as in the 
preceding one, the possibility of constructive cooperation with 
international financial organizations and of obtaining real 
financial aid and assistance in the restructuring of the foreign 
debt would be preserved. 
  The next version reflects the situation which actually 
emerged by the end of January of 1994: a recoil from the 
moderately harsh monetary policy which was pursued in 1993. 
There would be an increase in the emission covering of the 
government deficit, just as there would be for the Central 
Bank's credit emission as a whole, the institution of 
preferential credits would be introduced anew, along with the 
deferment of payments and the write-off of the Agro-Industrial 
Complex's debts. 
  During the quantitative assessment of this version's 
variables, the ministry proceeded on the basis of the fact that 
the presidential edict on the republic budget's maximum deficit 
which can be funded through Central Bank credit would set the 
limit for monetary expansion in the first quarter at R7.5 
trillion. Increasing this figure would require going to the Duma 
and a lengthy procedure for discussion of the 1994 budget. 
Therefore, it is most likely that expansion of the credit 
emission can proceed only through an increase in Central Bank 
credits to the economy (seasonal work in agriculture, shipments 
to the Far North and assistance to the Fuel and Energy Complex) 
and the drawing of its profits into the budget. In addition, 
decisions are being prepared at the present time on the payment 
of a number of the budget's "production" debts for 1993 
financing (basically, for the Ministry of Defense, agriculture 
and grain). This indebtedness arose as a result of the adoption 
of numerous government decisions which contradicted the 
presidential edict on a moratorium on increasing budget 
expenditures and the presidential edict on the RF budget for the 
fourth quarter of 1993 and which led to an unplanned increase in 
budget expenditures. The Ministry of Finance repeatedly went to 
the government with an initiative about revoking these 
decisions. However, not a single decision has been revoked. 
  The payment of the "production" debts within the limits of 
the anticipated tax revenues in the first quarter and the 
maximum deficit approved by the presidential edict is possible 
only through the abolition of the wage indexing in the 
budget-controlled sphere. Thus, the inflation mechanism will 
operate in the following manner. The intensification of the 
Central Bank's credit emission in favor of the production sector 
and the "production" reorientation of budget spending will 
result in a rapid deterioration of the situation in the 
budget-controlled sphere. This will require not talking about 
but actually carrying out the indexing in the second quarter of 
the budget-controlled workers' incomes. A sharp increase in 
inflation in the spring will require a sharp intensification of 
the financial assistance to agriculture, the Fuel and Energy 
Complex and so on. A sharp increase in grain prices will 
intensify the subsidy pressure on the budget. It is necessary to 
add to this the fact that, by the beginning of 1994, the 
domestic sources for increasing the currency supply in the 
currency market had been depleted. This means that, with a mild 
monetary policy, the danger of a synchronous or anticipatory 
increase in the dollar's exchange rate in comparison with 
inflation becomes real, as does the intensification of the 
flight from the ruble to foreign funds. In this situation, the 
"exchange-rate" pressure on the rate of inflation will increase 
sharply, the rate of turnover will shoot upward catastrophically 
and monetary control over inflation will be lost. In order to 
pursue the policy of support for production and to maintain 
balance on the brink of the survival of the budget-controlled 
sphere, the credit emission by at least the middle of the year 
should amount to 25-30 percent of the GDP. This is a moderately 
realistic assessment of the actions of the "Red Economic 
Managers." (In 1993, the Ukrainian Government carried out an 
emission in the amount of half of the GDP.) Thus, by 1994's 
third quarter, Russia might really find itself on the threshold 
of "Ukrainization" of the economy. The adverse processes in the 
financial sphere will be aggravated by an exodus of capital and 
a sharp drop in the ruble's exchange rate. An alternative to 
this process will be the reduction of emission at the end of the 
third quarter. While the current government will be able to 
carry this out, the sharp intensification of the production 
slump and the reduction in real wages will be a high price to 
pay for the inconsistency displayed at the beginning of the year. 
  An attempt to replace the monetary methods of control over 
inflation with non-monetary ones (price restrictions, the 
introduction of the 100-percent sale of currency earnings, a 
currency exchange rate for the ruble set by the Central Bank of 
Russia, obligatory deliveries and so on) will mean in the final 
tally a gradual turning aside not only from the economic 
reforms, but also from the political reforms and the course 
toward the democratization of society. Society is currently 
standing on the threshold of the most crucial decision since the 
start of the reforms in 1992. 
  Not examined in the Ministry of Finance's calculations was 
the version of non-monetary methods for limiting inflation, 
which must be understood as attempts to limit prices. The 
limiting of prices effectively is possible only in the raw 
materials and single-product industries. Attempts to do this 
will either cause the progressive ravaging of the fuel complex 
or will require enormous subsidies which will quickly destroy 
the state's financial system. Attempts to limit prices in the 
consumer sphere are currently simply impossible. 


Table 16. The Harsh Version of Monetary and Budget Policies: Lowering the 
Inflation Rate to a Low Level by the Middle of the Year 

Specific Items   1993         1994 


Fourth Quarter   First        Second       Third        Fourth 
                 Quarter      Quarter      Quarter      Quarter 

1. Expanded      9            4            4            5            3 
State Spending 
Deficit as a 
Percentage of 
the GDP 

Including        5            4            3            5            2 
Domestic 
Funding of the 
Deficit 

2. Total         10.4         6            5            7            5 
Amount of 
Central Bank 
Credits as a 
Percentage of 
the GDP 

3. Average       16           11           6            4            7 
Monthly Rate 
of Increase in 
Inflation in 
Percentages 

4. The Ruble's   1,241        1,600        1,750        2,000        2,500 
Exchange Rate 
(at the End of 
the Period on 
the Average 
over a Month) 

5. GDP (Change   -4.3         -8           1            3            0 
in Actual 
Volume over 
the Period) 

6. Real Wages    12.5         -9           8            2            7 
(Change in 
Percentages 
over the 
Period) 




Table 17. The Moderately Harsh Version of Monetary and Budget Policies: 
Stabilization of Inflation at the Level Reached by the End of 1993 

Specific Items   1993         1994 


Fourth Quarter   First        Second       Third        Fourth 
                 Quarter      Quarter      Quarter      Quarter 

1. Expanded      9            7            6            7            5 
State Spending 
Deficit as a 
Percentage of 
the GDP 

Including        5            7            6            7            5 
Domestic 
Funding of the 
Deficit 

2. Total         10.4         10           9            8            7 
Amount of 
Central Bank 
Credits as a 
Percentage of 
the GDP 

3. Average       16           12           11           11           12 
Monthly Rate 
of Increase in 
Inflation in 
Percentages 

4. The Ruble's   1,241        1,850        2,550        3,500        4,500 
Exchange Rate 
(at the End of 
the Period on 
the Average 
over a Month) 

5. GDP (Change   -4.3         -4           0            1            -3 
in Actual 
Volume over 
the Period) 

6. Real Wages    12.5         -9           3            2            5 
(Change in 
Percentages 
over the 
Period) 




Table 18. Easing the Moderately Harsh Version of Monetary and Budget Policies: 
Emission Support of Production and Full Indexing 

Specific        1993        1994 
Items 

Fourth          First       Second      Third Quarter     Fourth 
Quarter         Quarter     Quarter                       Quarter 

1. Expanded     9           9           13                15          12 
State 
Spending 
Deficit as a 
Percentage of 
the GDP 

Including       5           18          21                20          15 
Domestic 
Funding of 
the Deficit 

2. Total        10.4        28          25                27          25 
Amount of 
Central Bank 
Credits as a 
Percentage of 
the GDP 

3. Average      16          13          28[.sup](1)[/]     37          35 
Monthly Rate 
of Increase 
in Inflation 
in 
Percentages 

4. The          1,241       3,200       7,500             17,000      25,000 
Ruble's 
Exchange Rate 
(at the End 
of the Period 
on the 
Average over 
a Month) 

5. GDP          -4.3        14          0                 -4          -11 
(Change in 
Actual Volume 
over the 
Period) 

6. Real Wages   12.5        7.5         0.5               -9          -4 
(Change in 
Percentages 
over the 
Period) 

1. 35-36 percent in June. 


<H5>  8. Appendices </H5>
  Declaration on the Economic Policy of the Government and the 
Central Bank of Russia, 22 May 1993 
  Declaration of the Council of Ministers of the Russian 
Federation Government on the Economic Policy at the End of 1993 
and in 1994, 5 November 1993 
  Draft of the Edict of the Russian Federation President on 
Stabilization of the Russian Ruble's Exchange Rate and 
Intensification of Currency Control, 5 March 1993 
  Letter to Russian Federation President B.N. Yeltsin, Russian 
Federation Supreme Soviet Chairman R.I. Khasbulatov and Council 
of Ministers -- the Russian Federation Government Chairman V.S. 
Chernomyrdin on the Central Bank, 23 March 1993 
  Letter to Russian President B.N. Yelstin and Russian 
Government Chairman V.S. Chernomyrdin on the Financial Problems 
of 1993, 29 April 1993 
  Letter to Russian Federation President B.N. Yeltsin and 
Council of Ministers -- the Russian Federation Government 
Chairman V.S. Chernomyrdin on the Results of the Meeting of the 
Bilateral Russian-Kazakh Commission on the Fulfillment of the 
Agreement on the Establishment of a New-Type Ruble Zone, 
September 1993 
  Memorandum to the Members of the Council of Ministers -- the 
Russian Federation Government on the Critical Financial 
Situation and the Fate of the Reforms in Russia, August 1993 
  Report to Russian Federation Government Chairman V.S. 
Chernomyrdin on the Matter of the Struggle Against 
Dollarization, 6 July 1993 
  Theses of Finance Minister B.G. Fedorov's Speech at the 
Russian Federation Supreme Soviet Session on 27 August 1993 
  Russian Federation Supreme Soviet Decree No 56801 of 27 
August 1993 on Russian Federation Finance Minister B.G. Fedorov 
  On Russia's Financial and Economic Policies in 1993, 27 
January 1993 
  Russia's Financial Policy After the Referendum, 13 May 1993 
  Emission Is Opium for the National Economy (Notes on the 
Obvious), 15 September 1993 
  The Losers in the Struggle Against Inflation also Lose the 
Elections, 16 October 1993 
  A Financial Constitution for Russia, 9 November 1993 
  The Dollar Will Cost R10,000, if We Retreat from the Reforms 
(the New Year's Prediction of Finance Minister Boris Fedorov), 
31 December 1993 
  Russian Ministry of Finance Press Release on Russia's 
Current 
Financial Situation (Forecast for the Third Quarter), 24 June 
1993 
  Russian Ministry of Finance Press Release on the Status of 
Russia's Budget, 29 June 1993 
  Declaration of the Russian Ministry of Finance on the 
Central 
Bank of Russia's Decision on Exchanging Treasury Notes and USSR 
State Bank Notes Issued from 1961 through 1991 and Bank of 
Russia Series 1992 Notes, 26 July 1993 
  Russian Ministry of Finance Press Release in Connection with 
the Central Bank's Actions with Respect to the Money Exchange, 
10 August 1993 
  Russian Ministry of Finance Press Release on the Current 
Currency Situation, 10 August 1993 
  Russian Ministry of Finance Press Release on the Supreme 
Soviet's Adoption of the Draft Law on Refinement of the 
Indicators of the Russian Federation's 1993 Republic Budget, 12 
August 1993 
  Russian Ministry of Finance Press Release in Connection with 
the RF Ministry of Finance's Incomplete Use of RF Central Bank 
Credits, 26 August 1993 
  Russian Ministry of Finance Press Release on Russia's 
Financial and Economic Situation, 31 August 1993 
  Russian Ministry of Finance Press Release on Russia's 
Current 
Financial and Economic Situation, 23 September 1993 
  Russian Ministry of Finance Press Release on the Ruble Zone, 
21 October 1993 
  Russian Ministry of Finance Press Release on Matters of the 
Financial Constitution, 5 November 1993 
  Russian Ministry of Finance Press Release on the Work with 
Foreign Credits, 9 November 1993 
<H5>  Declaration on the Economic Policy of the Government and the </H5>
Central Bank of Russia 
  Tasks: 
  The goal of the tax and monetary policies of the government 
and the Central Bank is the reduction of the monthly rate of 
inflation to a level below 10 percent by the end of 1993 and the 
attainment in 1994 of a further stabilization of prices. The 
policy's goals in other areas, including foreign trade, the 
currency exchange rate system and privatization are increasing 
the efficiency of Russia's economy, acclerating its integration 
into the world economy and strengthening the market's role with 
consideration of the state's federal structure. The quantitative 
description of the economic policy measures contained in this 
declaration is given in the Technical Supplement. 
  1. Monetary and Credit Policy 
  a. Beginning as of 1993's second quarter, the overall 
increase in Central Bank of Russia (TsBR) credits shall be 
confined to the quarterly limits, which shall be determined 
proceeding on the basis of the tasks for reducing inflation. 
  b. Granting special-purpose subsidized credits by both the 
government and the Central Bank of Russia shall conform to the 
aforementioned credit guidelines. All applications for 
special-purpose bank credits shall be reviewed by the Commission 
on Credit Policy. 
  c. The Russian Government and the Central Bank of Russia 
shall gradually abandon the granting of all types of 
special-purpose credits through the Central Bank and shall shift 
to granting subsidies only through the budget, being guided by 
market mechanisms during the conducting of the monetary policy. 
In order to attain this goal, the Central Bank of Russia shall 
substantially increase the share of credits which it grants to 
commercial banks either through credit auctions or on market 
terms. The Central Bank of Russia shall refrain from 
distributing special-purpose credits on a sectorial or regional 
basis and also from granting credits directly to specific 
enterprises. By 15 July 1993, the Central Bank of Russia's prime 
rate shall be set at a level no more than 7 percentage points 
below the interbank basic market interest rate as indicated in 
the Technical Supplement and it shall then be maintained at this 
level. Henceforth, the interest rates shall be subsidized only 
through the budget in accordance with the established limits. 
  d. The government and the Central Bank of Russia shall not 
subsequently carry out the extension of credit for the mutual 
crediting of enterprises' non-payments. Measures shall be taken 
for the introduction of progressive settlements in the economy. 
  2. The Budget Policy 
  a. The overall budget deficit (i.e., the deficit of the 
consolidated budget plus the non-budget import subsidies) shall 
be limited by the quarterly guidelines which conform to the 
above-listed program in the area of credit. The government's 
borrowing of the banking system's funds, including the Central 
Bank of Russia's funds, shall be restricted with due 
consideration of foreign financing and the emission of state 
securities to be sold in the market. 
  b. The government shall implement the necessary measures on 
spending and revenue items in order to comply with the indicated 
restrictions on the overall budget deficit and the limit on 
obtaining bank credits. These measures shall be aimed at 
reducing tax breaks and subsidies, in particular, import 
subsidies and subsidized special-purpose credits, as well as at 
proportionally reducing the expenditures for budget items. 
Obtaining additional revenues from the tax on energy resources 
shall be planned. 
  3. Policy in the Area of Currency Exchange Rates and 
International Reserves 
  a. The government considers the establishment of a system 
for 
a unified market exchange rate for the ruble to be a key element 
of the transition to a market economy. Although the strategic 
task is the transition to a stable exchange rate, the ruble's 
exchange rate shall continue to float with respect to other 
currencies until the financial policy has been strengthened and 
inflation has been lowered substantially. Until then, the 
Central Bank of Russia shall not conduct interventions in the 
currency market for the purpose of artificially supporting the 
ruble's exchange rate. The government shall exert efforts for 
replenishing Russia's currency reserves. 
  b. The access of non-residents to the currency markets in 
Russia shall be expanded. As of 15 July 1993, non-residents 
shall be able to sell foreign currency and, as of 1 September, 
shall be able to buy foreign currency. 
  c. The Central Bank of Russia intends to encourage the 
currency market's further development, including by supporting 
regional currency exchanges and the transition to daily quoting 
of the currency exchange rate. 
  4. Foreign Trade Policy 
  The government shall undertake further steps aimed at the 
liberalization of foreign trade. Export quotas for various 
products shall be gradually eliminated in accordance with a 
specific schedule. The plan for centralized exporting shall not 
be expanded in 1993, while, in 1994, the volumes of centralized 
exporting shall be reduced to one-third of 1993's level. The 
government shall not introduce the practice of multiple currency 
exchange rates nor conclude bilateral payment agreements which 
would contradict Article 8 of the Articles of the IMF Agreement 
nor impose import restrictions for the purpose of supporting the 
balance of payments. 
  5. Basic Structural Changes 
  The government intends to implement consistently the 
privatization program and to improve the legal basis for market 
relations, to further the development of the financial markets 
and to promote actively structural changes in the economy. The 
government shall submit to the Supreme Soviet drafts of laws on 
joint-stock companies and securities, as well as a new Civil and 
Commercial Code, which include reinforcement of the legal 
protection of contracts; it shall strive for the removal of 
restrictions with respect to land ownership; and it shall ensure 
the implementation of the law on bankruptcies. 
  6. Economic Cooperation with Countries of the Former USSR 
  a. The government and the Central Bank of Russia acknowledge 
the longing of the states which were part of the former Soviet 
Union to introduce their own monetary units and are ready to 
cooperate fully with them. The government shall also seek to 
conclude appropriate agreements with those states which express 
a desire to use Russia's monetary unit. 
  b. We shall strive to reach agreements with the countries of 
the former Soviet Union on terms of financing for credits 
granted by Russia in 1992 and the beginning of 1993. We are 
ready to discuss with interested states amounts and methods for 
granting new intergovernmental loans. The credits to the former 
USSR republics shall go through the budget system and be 
formalized as official state credits. 
  c. We intend to work jointly with interested states on 
increasing the efficiency of the mechanism for payments between 
countries of the former Soviet Union, including through the 
establishment of interstate clearing mechanisms. 
  7. Policy Conduct and Monitoring 
  The Russian Government shall make available to the 
International Monetary Fund information necessary for monitoring 
the fulfillment of the program agreed upon with the IMF. In this 
connection and in cooperation with the IMF, the government and 
the Central Bank are developing a set of short-term financial 
and foreign economic indicators. Steps are being undertaken for 
the expansion of the government's capabilities for the 
implementing economic policy, including, in particular, 
strengthening the Commission on Credit Policy's role, adjusting 
the Treasury's operation and the development of interaction with 
non-budget-controlled funds. By 1 September 1993, the government 
shall form a mechanism for the effective monitoring of foreign 
receipts and a system for deriving the ruble equivalent of 
foreign financing and shall establish to this end a group which 
includes IMF representatives. 
  8. The Agreement on Standby Credit 
  The Russian Federation Government intends in the very near 
future to enter into negotiations with the IMF on the conclusion 
of a standby credit agreement. 
  [Signed] V. Chernomyrdin, Chairman of the Council of 
Ministers of the Russian Federation Government; V. Gerashchenko, 
Chairman of the Russian Federation Central Bank (the Bank of 
Russia); 22 May 1993. 
<H5>  Declaration of the Council of Ministers of the Russian </H5>
Federation Government on the Economic Policy at the End of 1993 
and in 1994 
  The government declares its firm intention to strive for 
the improvement and advancement of the Russian economy. The most 
urgent measures shall be aimed at lowering inflation, 
stabilizing production, increasing investments and accelerating 
structural transformations. The main task shall be lowering 
inflation to 15 percent in January and to 3-5 percent in 
December of 1994 as a necessary condition for stimulating 
investments and production. To this end, the government shall 
actively interact with the regions, the Central Bank of Russia 
and the future parliament. 
  1. The Budget Policy 
  a. The federal budget deficit in the fourth quarter of 1993 
shall not exceed R5.5 trillion, including R0.9 trillion due to 
the issuing of state securities in the financial market. 
  b. The Central Bank of Russia's net credits to the budget in 
the fourth quarter shall not exceed R4 trillion. 
  c. In order to reduce the deficit, the government intends to 
revoke a number of previously adopted spending decisions and to 
adopt measures, including tax ones, to increase revenues, which 
will produce R1.7 trillion in the fourth quarter of 1993. 
  d. In 1994, all subsidies, including support for agriculture 
and the Far North, shall be consolidated in the federal budget. 
  e. in 1994, the federal budget deficit shall be within the 
limits of 5 percent of the GDP, while not less than 30 percent 
should be covered through the issuing of securities floated on a 
voluntary basis. 
  2. The Monetary Policy 
  In the area of the monetary policy, the government has 
outlined the following guidelines: 
  a. The total increase in the Central Bank of Russia's net 
credit emission in the form of credits to the government and 
banks in the fourth quarter of 1993 shall not exceed R6 trillion. 
  b. The government shall not cover the difference in credit 
interest rate through the budget. 
  c. The policy's goal shall be the attainment of a favorable 
interest rate for Central Bank of Russia credits at first and 
then for deposits in banks. 
  d. The Central Bank of Russia's rate shall not be lower than 
the interbank credit market's rates by more than 7 percent. To 
banks which have a debit balance in a correspondent account in 
the Central Bank of Russia, a doubled Central Bank of Russia 
interest rate shall be applied. 
  e. In November of 1993, the Central Bank of Russia shall 
begin to hold credit auctions and to grant lombard credits to 
banks, secured by securities. 
  f. In 1994, not less than 30 percent of the Central Bank of 
Russia's credits shall be distributed through auctions and 
lombard credits. In 1994, the Central Bank of Russia shall 
abandon the distribution of special-purpose credits through its 
own territorial organs. Any support of regions and sectors shall 
go through the budget. 
  g. The Central Bank of Russia's total extension of credit 
shall be restricted by the quarterly limits established by the 
Commission on Credit Policy and conforming to the 
special-purpose guidelines for the struggle against inflation. 
  h. Mechanisms shall be developed, which guarantee the timely 
repayment of special-purpose credits granted through the Central 
Bank of Russia's resources. 
  i. The mutual crediting of enterprises' overdue indebtedness 
using Central Bank of Russia credits shall not be permitted. 
  j. The Central Bank of Russia's system of reserve 
requirements shall be reformed taking into account the necessity 
of stimulating bank investments in state securities. 
  k. In 1994, the Central Bank of Russia and the Russian 
Ministry of Finance shall, each quarter, conclude an agreement 
on the basic variables of the monetary policy. 
  3. Currency Policy 
  a. The Central Bank of Russia shall not conduct currency 
interventions for the purpose of supporting the ruble's exchange 
rate and shall strive to operate in the currency market 
basically for the purpose of smoothing out fluctuations in the 
ruble's exchange rate. 
  b. The economic policy as a whole shall be aimed at the 
consistent increase of the ruble's purchasing power. 
  c. Russia's net gold and currency reserves by the end of 
1993 
shall be no lower than U.S. $5 billion. 
  4. Structural Policy 
  a. The export quotas for non-energy commodities shall 
basically be abolished by December of 1993 and those for energy 
resources in 1994. 
  b. The export duties shall be reduced on average by 50 
percent prior to the end of 1993 and completely for the majority 
of goods in 1994. 
  c. In 1994, the system of centralized exporting shall be 
curtailed by a factor of at least 3 in comparison with 1993. 
  d. All import subsidies shall be abolished as of 1 January 
1994. 
  e. The government shall avoid increasing import duties. 
  f. Prior to the end of 1993, the restrictions on land 
ownership and the sale of land shall be eliminated. 
  g. In the first quarter of 1994, the restrictions on 
production profitability shall be abolished and the registration 
procedure for entrepreneurial activities in a number of sectors 
(construction and transport) shall be made easier. 
  h. The government shall immediately begin applying the law 
on 
bankruptcy. 
  5. The Ruble Zone 
  a. The government shall strive to establish an Economic 
Union 
with all interested countries of the former USSR. 
  b. The new type of ruble zone shall be established after the 
creation of conditions for pursuing unified and efficient 
monetary, financial, currency and customs policies. 
  c. It is necessary to develop commodity and currency markets 
which provide for the exchange of the non-cash rubles of other 
countries for Russian rubles at exchange rates which arise under 
the influence of supply and demand. 
  d. During the country's transition period, the signers of 
the 
Agreement on the Establishment of an Economic Union who use 
series 1961-1992 banknotes, series 1993 banknotes and other 
means of payment, which circulate only on their territory, may 
introduce their own currencies. 
  [Signed] V.S. Chernomyrdin, Chairman of the Council of 
Ministers of the Russian Federation Government; 5 November 1993. 
<H5>  Draft of the Edict of the President of the Russian Federation </H5>
  In order to stabilize the Russian ruble's exchange rate, 
to strengthen currency control and to prevent the exodus of 
capital from Russia, I decree that: 
  1. The Russian Federation Government shall: 
  -- prior to 1 April 1993, adopt a decision on a reduction by 
50 percent in the amount of import duties for centralized 
importing, with the intention of eliminating them completely by 
1 September 1993; 
  -- prior to 1 May 1993, re-register all benefits previously 
granted in the foreign economic sphere, with the intention of 
abolishing them completely by 1 July 1993; 
  -- prior to 1 July 1993, conduct negotiations with the 
recipient countries of Russian credits on the official 
registration of previously issued credits as an interstate debt 
and on the terms of and procedure for its servicing; 
  -- prior to 1 April 1993, establish the procedure for the 
granting to all foreign states (including the ruble zone states) 
of credits (including technical credits and cash credits) on the 
basis of intergovernmental agreements; this procedure should 
stipulate the inclusion of interstate credits in the state 
budget and the approval of the Russian Federation Supreme Soviet 
of their amounts, directions of use and the conditions of and 
the procedure for servicing; 
  -- prior to 1 April 1993, adopt a decision on the compulsory 
sale of 50 percent of export earning to commercial banks at the 
market exchange rate; 
  -- prior to 1 July 1993, eliminate the system of centralized 
exporting; 
  -- prior to 1 July 1993, adopt measures to stop settlements 
on the territory of the Russian Federation in foreign currency. 
  2. Recommend to the Central Bank of Russia that it should: 
  -- tighten up the monetary policy in accordance with the 
guidelines embedded in the Russian Federation Government's 
program of actions for 1993 and, in particular , it should: 
  -- bring the commercial bank's refinancing rate 
approximately 
to the market level; 
  -- impose rigid quantitative restrictions (limits) on the 
increase in the Bank of Russia's total credit, as well as 
direction limits, including credits to the government, 
commercial banks, enterprises and ruble zone countries; 
  -- jointly with the government, develop a more effective 
mechanism for supporting the ruble's currency exchange rate; 
  -- shift to an official quotation of foreign currencies, 
including the currencies of ruble zone states; the currency 
exchange rates determined on a market basis shall be used for 
transactions with authorized banks; at the same time, regulation 
of the exchange rate should be carried out using the methods of 
the monetary policy. 
  [Signed] B.N. Yeltsin; 5 March 1993. 
<H5>  Letter to Russian Federation President B.N. Yeltsin, Russian </H5>
Federation Supreme Soviet Chairman R.I. Khasbulatov and Council 
of Ministers--Russian Federation Government Chairman V.S. 
Chernomyrdin on the Central Bank 
  The most acute problem of the present day messing up 
Russia's economy is inflation. In the situation which has 
arisen, saving, investing and developing production are 
impossible. 
  Over the course of the last 3 months, I have painstakingly 
attempted to convince the Central Bank of Russia and, first and 
foremost, its chairman, V.V. Gerashchenko, of the necessity of 
adopting in a strict manner decisive stabilization measures. 
  Despite dozens of appeals and demands: 
  -- as before, we are not receiving any information about the 
Central Bank's activities and we do not know what is actually 
going on in the credit sphere; 
  -- the Central Bank has still not made a single decision 
within the framework of the program outlined by the government; 
  -- the Central Bank is actively sabotaging the specific 
measures already prepared -- raising interest rates (2.5 months 
of mocking evasions) and issuing treasury bills (planned for the 
end of February); 
  -- the Central Bank is sabotaging all the negotiations with 
the International Monetary Fund and, it is likely, will be the 
main reason for the failure to obtain a program of international 
financial assistance this year. All the world's central banks 
are perplexed by our Central Bank's policy. 
  The inclusion of the Central Bank's chairman in the make-up 
of the government has essentially changed nothing. We cannot 
give the Central Bank instructions of any kind, yet the bank 
does not intend to undertake actions of any kind. The last 
credit commission (22 March 1993) showed clearly that there will 
be no progress. V.V. Gerashchenko vaguely nods his head in 
Staraya Ploshchad, but, upon his return to the bank, he 
unambiguously announces to his associates the fact that nothing 
will be done. 
  Under these conditions, there is no hope for the success of 
our financial and economic policies and international support 
for the reforms during this period, which is so complicated for 
the country, is virtually slipping away. 
  Inasmuch as the matter has crossed into the political plane, 
then, in Russia's national interests, it is necessary to raise 
the question of a change in the leadership of the Central Bank 
in the most decisive manner. Otherwise, we will be continuing to 
pretend that we are carrying out reform. 
  [Signed] B. Fedorov; 23 March 1993. 
<H5>  Letter to Russian President B.N. Yeltsin and Russian </H5>
Government Chairman V.S. Cheronmyrdin, with a Copy to V.V. 
Gerashchenko, on the Financial Problems of 1993 
  1. The Politicization of Financial Decisions 
  The pre-election campaign in 1993 is becoming continuous. 
The 
preparations for the referendum have shown that all the 
political forces are resorting in the pre-election struggle to 
populist measures which are leading to the uncontrolled 
squandering of the Central Bank of Russia's financial resources 
and credits. 
  The adjustment (recalculation) of 1993's budget and the 
drafting of the 1994 budget will be carried out under adverse 
political conditions. The pressure with the demands for an 
increase in spending, for a lowering of taxes and preferential 
credits on the Ministry of Finance and the Central Bank of 
Russia will increase. It will take on a critical nature in the 
fall, when the elections are announced. 
  It is necessary to try to achieve the leadership's public 
declaration: "The policy of financial stabilization cannot be a 
hostage of the pre-election struggle." 
  2. The Budget Deficit 
  In 1992, the official estimate of the republic budget's 
deficit was around 7 percent of Russia's GDP. The IMF estimates 
that indicator at 22 percent of the GDP. This is associated with 
the consideration of the non-budget-controlled funds and a 
number of preferential investment credits. 
  In 1993, according to the budget approved on 25 March of 
this 
year by the RF Supreme Soviet, the deficit will amount to around 
15 percent of the GDP. With the recalculation of the budget, 
taking inflation into account, it will increase even more. 
However, if the IMF's approach is used and the 
non-budget-controlled funds, as well as the subsidizing of a 
favorable exchange rate for freely convertible currency for 
importing, are taken into consideration, then the republic 
budget's deficit will take on catastrophic proportions in 1993. 
  In April through June, the funding of the budget 
expenditures 
(without taking new ones into account) does not exceed 60 
percent. Our goal, in both the first and second quarters, is to 
keep the deficit at the level of R1.3 trillion (in the first 
quarter, the deficit's cash total amounted to R1.7 trillion in 
connection with the delay in the transfer of revenues in the 
amount of around R400 billion), which will produce a powerful 
stabilizing effect. The main problem comes from the new spending 
decisions (see below). 
  Central Bank of Russia credits will inevitably remain the 
sole source for covering the deficit. The floating of securities 
will produce only insignificant funds. Central Bank of Russia 
credits should be issued only at low interest rates in order to 
reduce emission. 
  3. The Tax Burden 
  The complaints about the tax squeeze are justified. On the 
whole, taxes and obligatory collections amount in 1993 to around 
47 percent of the GDP. However, their actual collection is 
lower, since large-scale tax evasion is going on. However, 
reducing taxes in the face of a budget deficit at the level of 
15-25 percent of the GDP is impossible. 
  The government should not dispense tax breaks. It is also 
impossible to abandon the method of levying taxes in advance. 
  4. Budget Federalism 
  At the present time, a single-channel system has been 
introduced de facto for the collection and transfer of taxes by 
such republics which are part of the Russian Federation as 
Bashkortostan, Tatarstan, Chechnya and Yakutia-Sakha. Karelia is 
laying claim to a number of revenues allocated to the republic 
budget (for example, to the collection for the GRR [geological 
prospecting operations]). 
  Judicial allocation of them is intolerable without such a 
right within the framework of any kind of agreement or 
supplement to the Federation Treaty. In the treaty itself, 
financial policy has been relegated to the sphere of the joint 
jurisdiction of the federal center and the republics. 
  Any recognition of the legality of the single-channel system 
will lead to similar demands on the part of the oblasts. A 
number of them (Irkutsk and Perm) are already officially raising 
the question of at least a re-examination of the ratio for the 
distribution of the NDS [VAT] between the federal republic 
budget and the oblast budgets. Currently, this ratio amounts to 
80:20 and they are demanding 50:50. 
  To date, clear criteria for the distribution of revenues and 
expenditures among the various levels' budgets have not been 
worked out. There is also no clear policy of penalties for those 
who do not pay taxes. A firm political decision is necessary. 
  5. Indexing Pensions and Wages 
  The RF Supreme Soviet adopted a decision on increasing the 
minimum pension by a factor of 1.9 as of 1 May 1993. This is in 
keeping with the indexing principle previously adopted in the 
law. The pension minimum will exceed R8,000 per month. 
  Raising the minimum wage is inevitable. Currently, it is 
R4,275 per month. However, the republic budget is unable to fund 
the adopted decisions on increasing wages in the 
budget-controlled sphere as of 1 April 1993 by a factor of 1.9 
without a colossal increase in the deficit. An additional sum of 
around R1.4 trillion will be required just for the Ministry of 
Defense in 1993. Our spending, as a result of the recently 
adopted decisions, will increase as of April of 1993 by R800 
billion per month, which means a financial catastrophe. We will 
not be able to start on the fulfillment of these decisions 
earlier than June of this year. 
  In 1993's third quarter there will be a new increase in the 
pension minimum, apparently, also by a factor of 1.5-2. In 
August of 1993 it will amount to around R15,000. Also inevitable 
is a corresponding increase in wages. The mechanism for the 
long-term strengthening of the incomes -- expenditures -- prices 
inflationary spiral is being engaged at full power. This is 
where the notorious inflation of costs is. 
  In connection with what has been said, it will be necessary 
by May to declare a 6-month moratorium on reviewing the minimum 
pension and the minimum wage. 
  6. The Subsidy Nature of Budget Spending 
  Subsidies in the republic budget are the basic method for 
distributing funds. They are implemented in various forms: 
  -- as compensation for the difference in prices (subsidies 
in 
a pure form), they are aimed at the coal-mining industry and 
agriculture; 
  -- in the form of subsidies of a non-specific nature and 
special-purpose subventions, the funds are transferred to oblast 
budgets and the budgets of the republics which are part of the 
RF; 
  -- a number of sectors and individual enterprises are 
receiving subsidies in the form of preferential exchange rates 
for freely convertible currency during centralized importing; 
  -- subsidies are being granted in the form of compensation 
for part of the interest rate for preferential credit through 
the budget; 
  -- and tax rebates and tax credit (deferment of the payment 
of taxes for 5 years for the Nakhodka zone) are being dispensed 
widely by both decisions of the RF Supreme Soviet and of the 
Council of Ministers -- the RF Government. 
  The reduction of all forms of subsidies is absolutely 
necessary. Preferential credit must be granted only as a measure 
for smoothing out seasonal variations (the shipments to the 
North and the purchases of grain in the form of advance 
payments). It is necessary to summarize the information about 
all the granted credits and to conduct their revision from the 
standpoint of efficiency. The work is labor-intensive and 
affects a mass of interests, but it is necessary. It is 
necessary to attempt to carry it out during the preparing of the 
1994 budget. 
  7. The Mutual Relations with the CIS 
  Entering into an economic union with interested CIS 
countries 
has been officially proclaimed an RF policy. A version of such a 
union made up of Russia, Belarus and Kazakhstan is being 
considered. 
  The basic components of the union are: 
  -- an agreement on unified monetary and currency policies; 
  -- an agreement on a unified customs policy. 
  In the last government, skepticism prevailed with respect to 
the reality of these kinds of plans. It was believed that the 
euphoria of sovereignty would not allow any of the presidents of 
the former USSR republics to sign a firm agreement on a union 
with the RF. Consequently, it had been possible to talk a lot 
about a union as about the future and to pursue fully an 
independent RF policy. 
  Over the course of 1992, this tactic justified itself. 
Dividing the non-cash money turnover and the introduction (for 
now, just on paper) of a foreign trade procedure for mutual 
deliveries using customs duties were successfully managed. 
  However, at the beginning of 1993, when the RF started the 
final stage of the demarcation (the introduction of the customs 
duties in February of this year and the transition from Central 
Bank of Russia "technical credits" to interstate credits using 
budget funds), Kazakhstan and Belarus realized that living in 
the situation they had established of unclear and unorganized 
quasi-soviet relations would no longer work. 
  They again began actively to put forward the idea of an 
economic union. The RF fell into an unusual situation -- now the 
partners would accept any harsh demands, including the 
subordination of their own central banks to the Central Bank of 
Russia's decisions. Just 2 months ago, they had flatly rejected 
this. 
  The RF leaders also could not officially abandon the 
economic 
union for domestic political reasons. Apparently, there existed 
only one path: the harshest possible conditions for a union -- 
if they reject them, life will go on further in the direction of 
separation; if they accept them, it will be necessary to conduct 
a fierce struggle for the actual realization of these rules. 
  Ukraine and the Central Asian and Transcaucasian states, as 
well as the Baltic States, will remain outside this economic 
union. This situation eases the RF's tasks somewhat. 
  8. Fixing Petroleum Product Prices 
  The two edicts aimed at fixing the prices for gasoline and 
diesel fuel at the level of the price on 1 March of this year 
are part of a more general approach, according to which the 
increase in prices in Russia is associated basically with the 
increase in the cost of energy resources. 
  This is very widely believed. It is not been possible to 
change the sectorial leaders' minds. All that is left is to use 
the following arguments, which are aimed at proving the 
impossibility of fixing prices: 
  -- first, not less than R100 billion per month would be 
needed for the budget to compensate the petroleum sales 
organizations; 
  -- and second, a fixed price for gasoline and diesel fuel 
would lead to their disappearance from sale and to profiteering. 
Thus, at the height of the sowing season, a village simply will 
not receive them or will receive them, but, all the same, at an 
increased price. Later, the profiteers will submit a bill to the 
Ministry of Finance as well in accordance with the procedure for 
"compensation" for holding down prices. 
  There is no way we will be able to get away from further 
liberalization of prices, first and foremost, for coal and a 
number of other key products. Only in this way will it be 
possible to stop the constant shaking up of the economy by price 
explosions: we hold down prices for several months and then we 
increase them many times over. For a number of items, it is 
necessary to have a smooth increase in prices, without sharp 
jumps. 
  9. The Monetary Policy and the Central Bank of Russia 
  All of the government's efforts in the area of the monetary 
policy in the first 4 months were aimed at a gradual restriction 
of the amount of centralized credit extended: 
  -- for the first time, a summary of all credit flows was 
produced; 
  -- a credit emission limit for the second quarter in the 
amount of 30 percent of that of the first quarter (R3 trillion) 
was stipulated by the Central Bank of Russia; 
  -- and the question of a firm limitation on previously 
uncontrolled credits to CIS countries was raised. 
  At the same time, the Central Bank of Russia's official rate 
was raised to the level of 100 percent, along with the deposit 
rate in the Savings Bank. 
  The government's credit policy is being formulated by a 
special commission which includes Central Bank of Russia 
representatives. 
  The undertaken measures are clearly inadequate: 
  -- the Central Bank of Russia opposes the limiting of 
credit; 
  -- the Central Bank of Russia is continuing to oppose 
raising 
its own rates to the market level; 
  -- the Central Bank of Russia is continuing to grant 
sectorial credits, as well as technical credits and cash to CIS 
countries; 
  -- and the Central Bank of Russia is not giving out the 
needed information on its own activities. 
  Without cooperation from the Central Bank of Russia, 
lowering 
the rate of inflation will be nearly impossible. 
  [Signed] B.G. Fedorov; 29 April 1993. 
  Supplement 1: Calculation of the Additional Expenditures in 
Connection with the Adoption of Decisions on Increasing the 
Amount of Wages (Including Those of Military Personnel) 
  Specific items are listed, giving the additional 
requirements 
for each for 1993 (in millions of rubles) after each item: 
  1. Social Institutions -- 1,527,103.4 
  2. Science -- 396,089.1 
  3. Organs of State Power, Administration, Courts and 
Procuracies -- 233,763.1 
  4. Other Institutions and Organizations Funded from the 
Budget -- 1,669,808.7 
  5. Ministry of Defense -- 1,392,179.0 
  6. Internal Affairs and Security Organs -- 598,007.7 
  7. Payment of the Cost of Passage for Pensioners Living in 
the Far North's Regions -- 10,063.8 
  8. Expenditures for the Social Protection of Citizens 
Subjected to the Effects of Radiation as a Consequence of the 
Accident at the Chernobyl Nuclear Power Plant -- 173,111.4 
  9. Compensation Payments, Grants and Scholarships -- 443,700 
  10. Compensation for Expenditures to the Pension Fund for 
the 
Payment of Pensions -- 19,973.7 
  11. Payment of Military Pensions: 
  -- Russian Ministry of Defense -- 93,375.0 
  -- Russian Ministry of Internal Affairs -- 87,199.2 
  -- Russian Ministry of Security -- 45,091.8 
  The total calculated for 1993 is R6,689,465.9 million and 
the 
total calculated for the month is R743.3 billion. 
  The Basis: 
  1. Edict No 405 of the Russian President of 27 March 1993. 
  2. RF Law No 4693-1 of 30 March 1992. 
  Supplement 2: Calculation of the Additional Allocations for 
the Implementation of RF Presidential Edict No 443 of 12 April 
1993 on Urgent Measures for State Support of Undergraduate and 
Graduate Students of Educational Institutions for Higher 
Professional Education 
  Specific items are listed, with the total sum for each in 
millions of rubles: 
  1. To an Institution for Undergraduate and Graduate 
Students, 
1,100 RF Presidential Scholarships -- R1,524.7 million 
  The scholarship amounts: undergraduate students -- R17,100; 
graduate students -- R21,385. 
  2. For the Payment to Undergraduate and Graduate Students of 
Compensation for Expenditures in Connection with the Increase in 
Cost of Food -- R13,079.2 million 
  The per diem compensation amount: R85.50. 
  3. For the Granting of the Right of Free Passage to 
Undergraduate and Graduate Students from Another City, Once a 
Year, Round Trip -- R20,465.2 million 
  The average amount of the expenditures: for railway 
transportation -- R5,500; for air transportation -- R51,120. 
  4. Annual Apportionment of Additional Budget Allocations To 
Provide Undergraduate and Graduate Students with School Supplies 
and To Organize Health-Improvement Activities and Sanatorium and 
Health-Resort Treatment -- R13,821.1 million 
  The average amount of the expenditures: R8,550. 
  5. For an Increase in the Scholarship Amounts for Graduate 
Students (R8,550) -- R961.9 million 
  The total calculated for 1993 is R49,852.1 million and the 
total calculated for one month is R4.1 billion. 
  Supplement 3: Calculation of the Additional Allocations for 
RF Presidential Edict No 468 of 20 April 1993 on Urgent Measures 
for Ensuring the Health of the Population of the RF 
  Specific items are listed, with the total amount for each in 
millions of rubles. 
  Page 2, Paragraph 4: "the prevention of infectious and non- 
infectious diseases and reduction of the population's rate of 
premature deaths" -- R1,000 million 
  Page 2, Paragraph 12: "to approve prior to 1 August 1993 a 
program of measures for the establishment of a state system for 
providing food products to pregnant women, nursing mothers and 
children up to the age of seven, with dissemination of the 
indicated measures in 1994-1995 to the other least socially 
protected groups of the population" -- R116,770 million 
  Page 3, Paragraph 4: "to provide for an increase in the 
allocations to the institutions for health care, of the 
Gossanepidemsluzhba [State Medical and Epidemiological Service] 
and for the social protection of the population and to medical 
educational and scientific institutions, which are funded 
through the federal budget, by 25 percent of the funds targeted 
for wages" -- R104,872.7 million 
  The total amount calculated for the year is R222,642.7 
million and the total calculated for 1 month is R22.3 billion. 
<H5>  Letter to RF President B.N. Yeltsin and Council of Ministers </H5>
-- the Russian Federation Government Chairman V.S. Chernomyrdin 
[on Bilateral Russian-Kazakh Commission] 
  1. On 7-9 October, in Moscow, the first meeting took place 
of the Bilateral Russian-Kazakh Commission on Ensuring Practical 
Measures for the Fulfillment of the Multilateral Agreement on 
the Establishment of a New-Type Ruble Zone and of the Bilateral 
Intergovernmental Agreement on the Unification of Monetary 
Systems and the Assessment of Their Fulfillment. 
  At the same time, the expert working groups carried out the 
initial comparison of the legislative acts of the RF and the 
Republic of Kazakhstan in the areas of the monetary, budget, 
price, tax and currency policies, as well as those of foreign 
economic activities and customs regulation. 
  2. It was noted at the meeting that, despite the lack of 
substantial differences between the parties' basic legislative 
acts in the indicated areas, which creates a basis for the 
completion of the work on the unification of the legislation, it 
is necessary to carry out additional work to eliminate the 
differences in the standard acts under these laws, by which, in 
practice, the implementation of the first level of laws is 
provided. 
  In order to accelerate the work in this direction, the 
Kazakh 
side has taken upon itself the obligation to ensure the 
unification of the standard acts under these laws within the 
shortest possible time frame. 
  The assessment of the fulfillment of the obligations 
accepted 
by the Kazakh side should be carried out according to a set of 
agreed-upon synthetic indicators which characterize the 
readiness of the Republic of Kazakhstan's monetary system for 
unification with the RF's monetary system. The working groups 
have been instructed to prepare the list of indicators by 15 
October 1993. 
  3. It was repeatedly emphasized in the course of the 
negotiations that the parties support the dynamic and consistent 
establishment of all the necessary prerequisites for the actual 
unification of the monetary systems, the most important ones of 
which, in accordance with the signed agreements, are the Kazakh 
side's ensuring of a stable exchange rate for the Kazakh ruble 
with respect to the Russian ruble and the unification of the 
gold and currency reserves. 
  The practical work on the establishment of the appropriate 
mechanisms for the agreements' implementation in this part has 
not yet been started. Meanwhile, without these key elements, the 
unification of the monetary systems will remain on paper. 
  The only thing inadequate is the formal correspondence of 
the 
standard and legislative base and it is necessary to establish 
and to place into effect quickly the mechanism for the 
convertibility of the Kazakh and Russian rubles, the procedure 
for the unification and joint use of the gold and currency 
reserves and the procedure for credit emission control and 
budget deficit funding. 
  4. In light of what has been stated, something which is 
causing extreme concern is the unexpectedly adopted decision to 
speed up the pace of the unification of the monetary systems of 
Russia and Kazakhstan without consideration of the economic, 
organizational and technical prerequisites actually existing for 
this and without carrying out an assessment of the parties' 
degree of readiness for this extraordinarily important decision. 
  In violation of the letter and the spirit of the signed 
agreements, which stipulate the necessity of a transition period 
for preparing for the unification of the monetary systems, the 
ratification of the named agreements by the Republic of 
Kazakhstan's Supreme Soviet is becoming the sole condition for 
this unification. 
  The ratification stipulated by the agreements (or a 
procedure 
which replaces this) is not required from the Russian side. 
  The corresponding entry has been made in the Bilateral 
Commission's protocol without consideration of the opinion of 
the key ministries and departments which participated in the 
negotiations. At the same time, the protocol, in point of fact, 
is becoming a document which confirms the Russian side's consent 
to the immediate unification of the monetary systems with the 
Republic of Kazakhstan. 
  5. Under the influence of the RF Central Bank's management, 
the plan for immediately conducting a one-time exchange of 
old-series banknotes for series 1993 Bank of Russia notes in the 
Republic of Kazakhstan is again being moved to the forefront. 
This has already been rejected repeatedly by the government. It 
is being proposed that the exchange be carried out at the rate 
of 1:1, which means a direct economic loss for Russia measured 
in billions of rubles (at the present time, the official 
exchange rate for 1 Kazakh ruble amounts to 0.67 of a Russian 
ruble). 
  The Bank of Russia's motivation with respect to the urgent 
necessity of this step is simple -- the reserves of old-series 
banknotes for supplying cash to the CIS republics are running 
low. Thus, in order to solve this technical problem, created by 
the Bank of Russia itself, which can also be solved by other 
means (for example, by resuming the production of the old 
banknotes or by putting appropriate overprints on banknotes to 
be shipped beyond the RF's borders), the bank's management is 
ready to forego the Russian ruble's stability. Behind this 
paradoxical attempt by the Central Bank to undermine the 
country's monetary system, for the stability of which it has 
direct responsibility, as before, stands the longing to convert 
the RF Central Bank into a supranational organ not under the RF 
Government's control. 
  6. While actively supporting the necessity of accelerating 
the establishment of the operating mechanisms for economic 
integration between Russia and the CIS republics and taking into 
consideration the extraordinary importance of the practical 
steps in this direction on the eve of the elections in Russia, 
we nevertheless consider it necessary to declare that the 
short-term political gain from the unprepared inclusion of the 
Republic of Kazakhstan in the Russian ruble's zone of 
circulation will immediately be canceled by a new, powerful 
inflationary explosion, which is the inevitable consequence of 
the planned action. 
  If it is taken into consideration that, following 
Kazakhstan, 
similar demands for the immediate exchange of cash money will be 
put forward by the other republics participating in the 
Multilateral Agreement, then the barely begun financial 
stabilization process will be wrecked. The hyperinflationary 
shock caused by this unconsidered decision will make impossible 
economic integration within the framework of the CIS and will 
provoke the collapse of the monetary system in Russia itself. 
  7. Being aware of the listed consequences, we consider it 
necessary: 
  -- to suspend from the Russian side the implementation of 
Point 4 of the Bilateral Russian-Kazakh Commission's protocol; 
  -- to hold immediately a meeting of the Presidium of the 
Council of Ministers -- the RF Government and the Governmental 
Commission on Credit Policy on this matter; 
  -- to instruct the RF Ministry of Finance to conduct an 
examination of the RF Central Bank with respect to the facts 
about the unauthorized shipment of banknotes beyond the RF's 
borders, as well as of the procedure for conducting an audit and 
for bookkeeping for emission and cash transactions; 
  -- to impose a ban, right up to the completion of the 
examination, on the shipping of series 1993 banknotes by the 
Bank of Russia beyond the RF's borders, with the exception of 
the amounts acquirable by the CIS republics using funds in a 
correspondent account, through an interstate credits account or 
in exchange for freely convertible currency; 
  -- and to raise the question of the professional compliance 
of the current chairman of the RF Central Bank, V.V. 
Gerashchenko, and the deputy chairman of the RF Central Bank, 
V.I. Solovov. 
  [Signed] B. Fedorov; September 1993. 
<H5>  Memorandum to the Members of the Council of Ministers -- the </H5>
RF Government on the Critical Financial Situation and the Fate 
of the Reforms in Russia 
  A critical situation has arisen with respect to the 
political, financial and economic stabilization. The fate of the 
reforms is being threatened. This is not yet noticeable to 
everyone, but decisions must be made as quickly as possible, 
taking into consideration the inevitable aggravation of the 
political tension. The political struggle has quite specific 
boundaries, caused by the state of the economy. 
  1. The Elections and the Possible Defeat of the President's 
Policy 
  The country is on the eve of elections and there are only 
two 
approaches to ensuring victory. 
  The first is to abandon the financial stabilization policy, 
to distribute credits and to swell the budget deficit (the path 
of the Supreme Soviet and the opposition). This is the path to 
ruin. The jump in inflation and the economy's collapse will 
reduce to naught all the thus-earned political dividends even 
before the voting. This scenario of the development of events 
has already been realized in Ukraine with well-known 
consequences for the structures of power. 
  The second is to keep the financial stabilization policy and 
to strive for a real lowering of inflation. Only a lowering of 
inflation can show the voters the real successes of the reforms. 
Only a lowering of inflation guarantees the revitalization of 
investments and a way out of the crisis. 
  2. Stabilization Prerequisites 
  In the first half of the year, the president and the 
government pursued on the whole a consistent economic policy 
which produced quite specific results: 
  -- some slowing down of the inflation rate; 
  -- stabilization of the ruble's exchange rate over the 
course 
of more than 2 months; 
  -- the beginning of the improvement of the budget; 
  -- the limiting of the unfounded extension of credit. 
  This policy received international support and, at the 
meeting in Tokyo in June of 1993, a financial aid package for 
Russia was adopted. 
  All this testifies to the fact that we have a chance for 
financial stabilization and a way out of the economic crisis on 
the whole. 
  3. The Possible Development of Events 
  In July and August of 1993, the situation changed abruptly. 
Clearly noted was a departure from the stabilization policy 
under pressure from the opposition and individual members of the 
government, which could not be justified by good intentions of 
any kind. 
  If this trend is maintained, we can easily predict a 
possible 
scenario for the development of events: 
  The pressure from the various lobbies will force us to swell 
the deficit and to distribute preferential credits. Inflation 
will jump up by year's end to 40-50 percent per month and the 
ruble's exchange rate will "fall" to at least R2,000 to the 
dollar. 
  In a number of sectors, including agriculture, metallurgy 
and 
the coal industry, we are rapidly approaching the world prices 
with an almost complete lack of structural changes, of an 
increase in efficiency and of stabilization of production. This 
brings the threat that, by the fall, there will be a sharp drop 
in the competitiveness of our goods within the country, 
disastrous unemployment and a production slump with further 
intensification of inflation and the curtailment of investments 
and an increase in the flight of capital from the country. 
  4. The Budget Failure 
  Given all the struggle for the budget, it is in critical 
condition for the following reasons: 
  -- the loss of part of the revenues because of the Supreme 
Soviet's rejection of our draft budget (up to R4 trillion); 
  -- the constant adoption of decisions unfunded by revenues 
and other sources in the budget, despite the presidential edict 
of 3 June 1993; examples are the subsidies for mixed feed (R1 
trillion), the overstating of prices for grain (by at least R1 
trillion), the increase in the minimum wage level and many other 
expenditures for trillions of rubles; 
  -- and the lack of clear-cut coordination during the 
adoption 
of decisions which touch upon financial matters (often without 
consideration of or despite the Ministry of Finance's opinion). 
  Prior to year's end, the "hole" in our budget may exceed R8 
trillion, but attempting to close it, given the current 
politics, is pointless. 
  5. The Credit Failure 
  The struggle against inflation envisions limiting 
centralized 
credits and, first of all, preferential credits. We made it 
through the second quarter and the goverment, jointly with the 
Central Bank, pledged to limit the increase in credit extended 
to year's end, including in the third quarter, to a 30-percent 
increase in credits. This would ensure a lowering of inflation. 
  However, it is clear by now that the increase in credits may 
reach 50 percent in the third quarter. This threat is becoming 
real for the following reasons: 
  -- the collapse of the budget (see above); 
  -- the flood of additional credits in defiance of the 
Governmental Commission on Credit Policy (first and foremost, 
for agriculture); 
  -- the Central Bank's distribution of credits for the 
regions' so-called "urgent needs." 
  The government, as a collegial organ, does not see the 
entire 
picture of the financial situation in the country and does not 
realize the macroeconomic consequences of the decisions being 
made. The continuation of this financial policy means a change 
of course and the failure of the reforms. 
  During the financial stabilization period, the financial 
policy should be unified and have a single and firm management 
center. 
  6. The International Aid Failure 
  The president and the government have repeatedly pledged to 
pursue a stabilizing financial policy. This has been confirmed 
by the declaration on the economic policy, signed by the 
government and the Central Bank on 22 May 1993, which is also 
the basis for obtaining international financial aid. 
  In the spring of 1993, we received $600 million from the 
World Bank. In July, the first IMF credit was in the amount of 
$1.5 billion. The Paris and London clubs of creditors gave us 
deferments on the debts. This was of great importance for the 
improvement of our financial situation. 
  In September, another $1.5 billion were supposed to be 
received from the IMF and, by year's end, $600 million from the 
World Bank (this refers only to budget credits). On the way are 
funds for the privatization program ($3 billion), standby 
credits ($4 billion) and numerous bilateral programs. 
  After the "famous" monetary reform and the failure to comply 
with the control figures for the basic budget and credit 
variables the above-indicated above forms of international 
support were placed in doubt (this has been officially 
announced). 
  A real prospect is that we could be declared bankrupt and 
all 
credits would be stopped. There is no need even to talk about 
the loss of the international prestige of the president and the 
government. 
  7. The Way Out of the Situation 
  In the existing situation, it is necessary to make a 
political choice: either the struggle against inflation and a 
harsh stabilization policy or a change in policy, the 
repudiation of international support and isolation. 
  If the first version is chosen, there should be a 
declaration 
of a financial state of emergency, which means: 
  -- adopting, without the Supreme Soviet, an emergency budget 
(a set of measures) for the period up to the end of the year, in 
which new revenue sources will be introduced and unsound 
expenditures will be cut off. Such a budget cannot be adopted by 
consensus and a political decision is necessary; 
  -- pledging unconditionally not to accept new expenditures 
of 
any kind at least up to the end of the year; any decisions on 
the allocating of financial resources should have sources; 
  -- placing the Central Bank under the authority of the 
government for at least 6 months within the framework of the 
financial state of emergency in order to ensure the unity of the 
financial and credit policy; 
  -- enhancing the status of the Commission on Credit Policy 
in 
order to weaken the pressure on the government, making it a 
presidential organ, and concentrating in it all financial, 
monetary, currency and credit matters (with the elimination of a 
number of other commissions); 
  -- and increasing the third quarter's credit limit up to a 
maximum of 40 percent and turning to the IMF with an explanation 
of our situation in order to obtain assistance to the fullest 
extent. 
  Continuing the established fallacious practice of adopting 
decisions on credit, budget and currency matters means 
repudiating the policy of the president and the government for 
financial stabilization and the economic reforms. We need to 
obtain a budget which will be unconditionally fulfilled 100 
percent, even if it will also be very strenuous. The existing 
underfunding situation should be stopped. 
  8. The Governmental Commission on Credit Policy (Fedorov, 
Chubays, Gerashchenko, Mashchits, Moskovskiy, Shapovalyants, 
Gaydar, and Kazmin) examined the matter of the country's 
financial situation and adopted a decision to request that it be 
submitted to a special meeting of the government, also that a 
request should be made to the IMF that consultations be started 
on the financial and economic policies. Pending the discussion 
of the matter in principle in the government, the commission 
decided not to examine the matter of the allocation of 
additional credits. 
  The work has begun on the preparation of a set of measures 
for stabilizing the financial situation for examination in the 
government. 
  I request that the members of the government submit their 
own 
proposals on this matter. 
  [Signed] B.G. Fedorov; August 1993. 
<H5>  Report to RF Government Chairman V.S. Chernomyrdin </H5>
Concerning the Working Center's Information on the Currency 
Policy and the Inadvisability of the Struggle Against 
Dollarization 
  1. I cannot in principle agree with the conclusions about 
the 
impossibility or the harmfulness of the struggle against 
dollarization of the economy. 
  In addition to the purely political significance, this 
matter 
is directly associated with the strengthening of the national 
currency and the effectiveness of the state's monetary policy. 
  Abandoning the struggle against dollarization would 
undoubtedly mean acknowledging defeat in the struggle for a 
strong national currency. 
  2. The failure in the struggle against dollarization was one 
of the big mistakes of the last few governments of the USSR, 
when the absurd transition was permitted away from the limited 
circle of "Berezkas [foreign currency stores]" with primarily 
substitute means of payment (certificates and VPT checks 
[foreign money orders]) to the widespread introduction of 
foreign currency into circulation. Well known is the unfortunate 
experience of Kamentsev's absolutely correct decision, which was 
crushed under absurd pretenses. 
  It is well known that the matter is rooted in the Torgsins, 
unfortunately famous at one time, which were established under 
Stalin and which reflected a quite specific type of economic 
policy. It is typical that the people deciphered the name 
TORGSIN (trade with foreigners) as: Tovarishchi, Opomnites! 
Rossiya Gibnet. Stalin Istreblyayet Narod [Comrades, come to 
your senses! Russia is perishing. Stalin is destroying the 
people.]. Dollarization is currently leading to the death of 
Russia's financial system. 
  No less well know is the fact that the reforms in nearly all 
the countries of Eastern Europe have automatically entailed the 
closing of currency-only stores, including even prior to the 
particular successes of the economic reform and with the help of 
administrative methods. 
  3. In the purely professional sense, it is absolutely clear 
that the ousting of the national currency from the payment 
transactions: 
  -- devalues this currency, in this instance, the ruble (a 
stronger currency is more fully supplied with goods); 
  -- distorts the statistics of trade, of the balance of 
payments and so on; 
  -- makes the measures for monetary, currency, customs and 
other regulations of little effect; 
  -- sharply increases the possibility of tax evasion; 
  -- leads to groundless disproportions in prices; 
  -- promotes the flight of capital from the country; 
  -- disturbs the investment process; 
  -- discriminates against the country's citizens and 
belittles 
the national dignity; and produces approximately 1,500 other 
negative features. 
  It is impossible not to understand this. 
  4. Since 1989, I have been constantly trying to draw 
attention to the problem of dollarization but, apparently, 
unsuccessfully. It is not surprising that M. Gorbachev and N. 
Ryzhkov did not understand this in their time, but it is 
surprising that some of our reformers do not understand this. 
  Meanwhile, the scope of the problem is rapidly increasing: 
  -- in Russia, already just under a thousand retail trade 
enterprises are trading for currency; add in the hotels, 
restaurants, bars, sports clubs, airline companies, taxi drivers 
and many other things and it becomes clear that the infection is 
spreading unceasingly; 
  -- whereas, in 1990, we estimated the total amount of cash 
currency in the country to be approximately 10 percent of the 
amount of cash rubles, now, the cash dollars outnumber rubles by 
several factors (based on the market exchange rate); 
  -- the epidemic dollarization is whipping up the demand for 
foreign currency, driving the ruble into a corner and 
intensifying the disparity between the exchange rate and the 
purchasing power parity; 
  -- just the uncovered instances of tax evasion due to 
dollarization amount to many billions of rubles and, in fact, it 
could be trillions; 
  -- the balances of many commercial banks already consist by 
two-thirds of foreign currency and this alarming process is 
increasing and so on and so forth. 
  The conclusion: we are at the point when it is necessary to 
make a choice between dollars and rubles. It is clear that this 
means a choice between an independent economic policy and a 
puppet one. 
  5. It is clear that the economic methods (first of all, the 
raising of the interest rates) play a key role in the struggle 
against dollarization. Therefore, we have demanded and will 
demand from the Central Bank an increase in the rates in order 
to make saving money in rubles worthwhile. At the same time, it 
is well known that not a single country in the world is carrying 
out economic policy using purely economic, indirect levers. On 
the other hand, the administrative basis and the harshness of 
the penalties for violating the laws in any market economy are 
much higher than in Russia. 
  6. In principle, there exist no absolute, comprehensive and 
definitive methods for combating dollarization and also no 
obligatory preliminary conditions for this struggle. 
  In the USSR, prior to perestroyka, dollarization had been 
extremely limited at least because, purely administratively, 
there was no use for foreign currency. In Bulgaria today, 
trading for currency has been administratively banned and the 
lev's exchange rate is currently less than 30 lev to the dollar 
(in our country, it is almost 1,100), although everyone 
remembers that, not long ago, the lev and the ruble were 1:1. 
  Even a deficit-free budget is not an obligatory prerequisite 
for the start of the struggle against dollarization, although 
this is feasible as a theoretical desire. How many countries 
currently have or had in the past a deficit-free budget? There 
simply are no such countries. Another matter is the fact that we 
have pledged to try to fund the deficit exclusively through the 
issuing of securities. 
  Nor is the argument that it is first necessary to introduce 
100-percent selling of currency. This thesis is false in 
principle. Let us take in hand the IMF's reference book on 
currency restrictions. How many of the more than 160 countries 
have such selling currently? Very few. We have already let the 
moment pass when such a measure was possible and now it is 
causing the additional flight of capital, since, after what 
happened with the Foreign Economic Activity Bank, there is no 
confidence. Only the ruble's steadfastness, firm financial and 
monetary policies and normal interest rates will compel the 
selling of currency. 
  It is impossible to take away the right to possess currency, 
but it is also impossible to tolerate discrimination against 
one's own currency in one's own country. Currently, this is 
happening everywhere, even in Moscow, in the center of the city. 
  7. A curious argument being put forward is the thesis about 
the fact that combating dollarization will require an increase 
in the issuing of cash money. 
  The liberal economists should know that the amount of cash 
money in circulation, in principle, is generally of no great 
importance, if there is a normal emission procedure. This means 
that the cash money is acquired (purchased) by commercial banks 
from the central bank for non-cash money, i.e., a buying and 
selling transaction is carried out. At the same time, the cash 
money in the central bank's balance should be counterbalanced by 
currency, gold and state and other securities. It is not the 
cash emission which is destructive, but rather, the credit 
emission -- the distribution of specific credits by our Central 
Bank, using assets created out of thin air. 
  The banknote policy of the Central Bank, which has a free 
hand in this area, is a purely technical matter not associated 
with profound economic processes. Judging by appearances, the 
ability to divine a trend has emerged in the bank. 
  So that this argument is simply untenable. 
  On the other hand, a comparison of the market value of the 
currency supply and the ruble cash supply shows that all our 
efforts at revitalizing the ruble may prove to be of little 
effect, if a blow is not struck against the use of foreign 
currency within Russia and, first of all, the use of cash which 
does not go through the banks, avoiding control, statistics and 
taxation. 
  8. The failure to adopt measures for a decisive struggle 
against dollarization is equivalent to the acknowledgement of 
defeat and the lack of a national monetary policy. Measures 
within the framework of this struggle should include without 
fail: 
  -- a guaranteed obligation to accept the national currency 
-- 
rubles -- for all types of payments in the country; any instance 
of refusal to accept rubles should be classified as a crime; 
  -- a ban on the acceptance of foreign cash currency for 
payments, i.e., its obligatory exchange for the national 
currency; 
  -- a ban on demanding payment in a foreign currency for any 
services or goods, including for foreigners; a specific example: 
at the ruble's present exchange rate, we should be a supercheap 
country and be earning a great deal from foreign tourism. In 
practice, however, we are earning next to nothing and the number 
of tourists has decreased even in such cities as St. Petersburg, 
since currency is being demanded for everything at prices higher 
than European ones. As a result, we have a parallel economy 
which is profitable only for its direct participants and is 
corrupting the country; 
  -- a ban on receiving wages in a foreign currency; 
  -- a total ban on settlements between residents in a foreign 
currency; 
  -- the freedom to save foreign currencies in Russian banks 
and the gradual expansion of the opportunities for using it for 
current and other transactions; at the same time, the state 
should attempt to see to it that saving money in a foreign 
currency gradually becomes economically unprofitable; 
  -- a tightening up of the demands on authorized banks as 
currency control agents; 
  -- the full application and tightening up of penalties 
provided for by the articles on currency transactions (no one 
has abolished them) and by the law on currency regulation and 
the tax legislation, including the seizing of accounts, the 
closing of the violating enterprises, fines and other items. 
  9. Many of the indicated measures have already been 
announced 
in one form or another (laws, edicts and decrees) and have under 
them a specific legislative basis. The problem lies in the fact 
that no one has even actually tried to implement the adopted 
decisions and now the essentially criminal inertia is being 
portrayed as the impossibility of doing something. It cannot be 
said that nothing is being done, but what has been done is still 
a fraction of what is necessary. 
  It is necessary to demand firmly, first of all, from the 
Central Bank, the Service for Currency and Export Control, 
customs, the tax inspectorate and the tax investigation 
department, the Ministry of Internal Affairs and the Ministry of 
Security, the adoption of real and decisive measures in this 
area. If the authority is lacking, it should be granted. One 
would think there would be no opposition to this from any part 
of the political spectrum. 
  The dollarization problem directly adjoins the problem of 
the 
flight of capital and the concealment of currency earnings and 
they should be solved together, including by very harsh measures. 
  10. It is obvious that the failure to adopt harsh measures 
for the struggle against dollarization along with the pursuit of 
the above-indicated monetary policy may lead to irreversible 
processes, when the ruble's stabilization will be held back 
primarily by this factor. Even now, the monstrous level of 
dollarization is significantly devaluing the government's 
efforts in the monetary and financial areas. 
  As necessary as air is an administrative jolt which would 
get 
the financial stabilization process moving and blow up the 
sluggishness of our economic system. 
  This is why I consider the procrastination in the adoption 
of 
specific measures for combating dollarization to be intolerable. 
  [Signed] B.G. Fedorov; 6 July 1993. 
<H5>  The Theses of Finance Minister B.G. Fedorov's Speech at the </H5>
RF Supreme Soviet Session on 27 August 1993 
  Esteemed Supreme Soviet Deputies: 
  At today's meeting, only the first point of the president's 
table of amendments is of essential importance. This is the size 
of the republic budget's deficit. If this amendment is voted 
down, then the adoption of all the others will no longer be of 
any significance. And I want to say a few words about this. 
  The deficit which you adopted -- R26 trillion (originally, 
the deputies had incorrectly added up the expenditures for the 
budget items and were talking about R22 trillion -- a small 
error!) -- is an almost unique phenomenon in world practice as 
we know it. I would like you to ponder its economic and 
financial consequences. 
  Over the first 8 months, the actual budget deficit, taking 
into account the foreign credits, amounted to around R7 trillion 
and, consequently, for the Supreme Soviet's budget for the 4 
subsequent months of the year, the deficit increases by almost 
R20 trillion, i.e., R5 trillion in frivolous emission funds will 
be pumped into the economy monthly. 
  Considering the fact that further indexing of the budget is 
quite likely and the fact that there are still Central Bank 
credits for various needs plus benefits, we can, over these few 
remaining months of the year, go to R10 trillion in monthly 
credit emission, carried out, supposedly, for the economy's 
normal development. 
  The experience of all the countries of the world, including 
our experience of the last 2 years as well, clearly shows that a 
financial system which has this kind of emission goes to pieces 
and hyperinflation moves from the area of theory into the 
practice of daily life with well-known results. 
  Hyperinflation means, first of all, the impoverishment of 
the 
people. Even Lenin, an authoritative person for many in this 
hall, stated correctly that inflation is the worst type of 
compulsory loan. Inflation is a tax on each person in the 
country and on every enterprise. And the experience of all the 
countries where there has been hyperinflation shows that the 
stratification of society under these conditions reaches a 
critical point, a group of superrich people is formed and all 
the rest become impoverished. The "middle class" disappears. 
These are inflation's consequences. I will not talk next about 
investing, saving and an increase in production which, in 
principle, are impossible in the existing situation in our 
country. 
  I suggest that you ponder also the experience of Ukraine 
which, to a significant degree, adopted this inflationary 
development path. You know what happened recently with the 
Ukrainian karbovanets and you know how empty the stores there 
are and what kind of increase in inflation there is in Ukraine. 
I do not think that copying this experience would be good for 
the Russian economy. 
  A couple of words about the International Monetary Fund. 
Lately, there have frequently been complaints directed at the 
government and the Ministry of Finance that they are supposedly 
operating on this organization's orders. I assume total 
responsibility for declaring that all these accusations are 
unsubstantiated and false. We have actually joined the IMF and, 
like all the other member countries, we give it specific 
information about the state of our economy and hold 
consultations, but there has never been and will never be any 
talk about dictating anything to us. The financial stabilization 
policy is our policy. At the same time, it is clear that 
additional long-term credits will not hurt anyone, including 
Russia. 
  A few words about the course of our economic policy. In a 
situation such as we currently have in our country, at all times 
and in all normal countries, there can be only one plan of 
action. When prices increase, the Central Bank adopts a program 
of credit restriction. However, if these actions do not produce 
the expected results, then it is the duty of the minister of 
finance to put forward an initiative for higher tax rates and 
the restriction of state spending. In this instance, I am 
quoting almost word for word one of the works of R.I. 
Khasbulatov (1977), who can hardly be accused of monetarism. And 
this is precisely how our draft budget was put together. 
  As far as state support of the economy and the underfunding 
of the various sectors go, it is necessary to be fully aware of 
the fact that it is by far not always necessary to resort to 
subsidization as a constantly operating factor (although we have 
used it and will again), since this can cause stagnation at 
enterprises and a lag in the realization of scientific and 
technical progress. At the same time, it is necessary to avoid 
parasitical attitudes, lack of initiative and lack of economic 
enterprise. The constant and protracted injections by the state 
testify to the fact that, through the state budget and taxes, 
other sectors of the economy are being bled dry, for they are 
the source of these "injections" and the country is thereby not 
achieving the desired overall upswing in the economy. Again, 
this is almost a word-for-word quote from R.I. Khasbulatov 
(1987), who, with such opinions, might well become the minister 
of economics in our government. 
  There was a meeting yesterday of the Presidium of the 
Russian 
Government, which, over the course of 4 hours, discussed the 
grave financial and economic situation which exists in the 
country and specific measures for its improvement, which are 
quite similar to R.I. Khasbulatov's above-cited recommendations. 
  I have already repeatedly appeared here and explained why 
the 
underfunding and, in general, the tension with the budget are 
arising. At fault are both the executive and legislative powers, 
who constantly adopt decisions not secured by revenue sources. 
We propose to abolish a portion of these decisions and to seek 
opportunities for increasing revenues and reducing expenditures. 
Part of these measures will be submitted to the Supreme Soviet 
and part to the president to be formalized as edicts, however, 
the government intends to implement a large part of the measures 
independently. 
  In light of everything which has been said, the examined 
draft budget is absolutely unacceptable. From my point of view, 
it leads to the collapse of the country and I ask you not to 
adopt this budget and not to approve this deficit. I appeal to 
your civic stand, each of you specifically and all of you 
together. Finances and the budget should not be the hostages of 
any political battles, no matter which branches of power are in 
the conflict. In this instance, I am talking about Russia. 
History and the people will not forgive us if this budget is 
adopted. 
  If political ambitions prevail all the same over the 
interests of Russia's peoples and even over basic common sense, 
then I would like to remind you of P.A. Stolypin's words which 
were addressed to your Duma colleagues: "All your attacks have 
been calculated to cause in the government and in authority a 
paralysis of both will and thought and they all come down to two 
words addressed to authority -- 'hands up'." To these words, 
ladies and gentlemen, the government, with complete calm and 
with the realization of its correctness, can also respond with 
just two words -- "not intimidated." 
<H5>  Russian Federation Supreme Soviet Decree No 56801 of 27 </H5>
August 1993 on Russian Federation Minister of Finance B.G. 
Fedorov 
  Having discussed the situation which exists in the budget 
and financial sphere of the Russian Federation and assessing the 
activities of Russian Federation Minister of Finance B.G. 
Fedorov in this process as destructive the Russian Federation 
Supreme Soviet decrees that: 
  The Chairman of the Council of Ministers -- the Russian 
Federation Government, Viktor Stepanovich Chernomyrdin, is 
ordered to submit to Russian Federation President Boris 
Nikolayevich Yeltsin a recommendation concerning the removal 
from office of Russian Federation Minister of Finance Boris 
Grigoryevich Fedorov. 
  [Signed] R.I. Khasbulatov, Chairman of the Russian 
Federation 
Supreme Soviet, Moscow, the Russian House of Soviets. 
<H5>  On Russia's Financial and Economic Policy in 1993 </H5>
  Russia's economy is in a profound crisis which threatens 
to develop into a total collapse with unpredictable economic, 
political and social consequences. The decline in production and 
the decrease in capital investments, the disorganization of 
state finances, the increase in inflation, the decrease in 
currency receipts and the undermining of the country's solvency 
are being accompanied by a sharp lowering of the standard of 
living for broad layers of the population. 
  Under these complicated conditions, Russia's national 
interests require the drawing up of a strict and consistent 
policy aimed at: 
  -- the financial and monetary system's stabilization; 
  -- the elimination of economic disproportions and the 
production structure's improvement; 
  -- an increase in the efficiency of foreign economic 
relations and the restoration of the country's solvency; 
stopping the subsidization of foreign states through prices and 
credits; 
  -- and ensuring the social protection of the population. 
  Currently, the economic policy's priority direction should 
be 
financial stabilization and the strengthening of the ruble. The 
main danger is hyperinflation, which leads to economic 
catastrophe and the impoverishment of people. Restraining 
inflation is a condition for solving other most important 
problems of the economic policy. The implementation of 
stabilization measures is also a decisive prerequisite for 
attracting the large foreign resources necessary for Russia's 
economic revitalization. 
  The following should be considered the basic special-purpose 
guidelines of 1993's financial and economic policy: 
  -- lowering the rate of inflation by year's end to 5 percent 
per month; 
  -- reducing the consolidated budget's deficit to 5 percent 
of 
the GDP; 
  -- stabilizing the ruble's exchange rate by the second half 
of the year; 
  -- lowering the rate of decline for production and gradually 
stabilizing it; 
  -- increasing the rate of savings and capital investments 
with a simultaneous decrease in the share of state consumption; 
  -- increasing the share of expenditures for social security; 
  -- restraining the increase in unemployment. 
<H8>  I. Financial Stabilization and the Strengthening of the </H8>
Ruble's Exchange Rate 
  The government's policy in this area should be aimed, 
first of all, at eliminating inflation's main causes, 
neutralizing its destructive impact on the economy and the 
people's well-being and reducing the rate of price increases. It 
is proposed that the following emergency measures be adopted for 
these purposes. 
  1. Within a 2-week period, a draft law should be prepared 
and 
presented to the president for submission to the RF Supreme 
Soviet, which provides for: 
  -- gradually reducing the federal budget deficit with its 
maximum values being set for each quarter (10 percent of the GDP 
for the first quarter, down to 8 percent of the GDP for the 
first half of the year, down to 6 percent of the GDP for 9 
months and down to 5 percent of the GDP for the year); 
  -- the intolerability of exceeding the established quarterly 
limits; 
  -- making decisions about increasing budget spending only 
when actual funding sources are available, to the extent of the 
incoming revenues; 
  -- tightening up control of the execution of the state 
budget 
and the amount of state debt; 
  -- giving the government the authority to reduce (sequester) 
federal expenditures or to impose emergency taxes and fees in 
the event of an unforeseen decrease in revenues for a period of 
up to 6 months. 
  2. In order to reduce the federal budget's deficit, within a 
month, a program for strict economy should be developed, which 
inherently includes measures for: 
  -- determining the directions and amounts of all types of 
subsidies and grants and adopting urgent measures for 
translating them into an obvious form (a preference for grants 
to consumers and not to producers); 
  -- reducing direct and hidden grants to unprofitable 
enterprises and accelerating their reorganization, clean-up or 
closure; determining within the framework of the federal program 
for the structural reorganization of the economy the specific 
list of enterprises subject to closure or clean-up with an 
indication of the amounts of the grant reductions; 
  -- refining the federal program for the structural 
reorganization of the economy in order to obtain a clearer 
determination of the priorities for the economy's development 
and the concentration of capital investments in these directions 
and start-up projects with a simultaneous reduction in the 
number of construction projects using budget funding and 
preferential credits; 
  -- reducing the expenditures for compensation for the 
differences in prices and, in particular, reducing substantially 
the grants for compensation for the difference in coal prices; 
  -- increasing revenues from the privatization and sale of 
state property, stipulating their crediting to the fund for 
supporting entrepreneurship and small business; 
  -- discussing with the Supreme Soviet proposals on the use 
of 
the Central Bank's profits for covering the federal budget's 
needs; 
  -- analyzing the effectiveness of tax breaks and abolishing 
unsound ones, first and foremost, those for export-import taxes, 
the VAT and the tax on profits, i.e., for expanding the tax base 
(the proposals for abolition as of the second quarter); 
  -- introducing fixed payments for the use of oil and gas 
fields and other natural resource sites, which provide for the 
confiscation into the budget of the differentiated rent and the 
convergence of domestic and world prices for energy resources 
with a simultaneous raising of the rates for the taxes on 
profits (with the exception of the portion used for investing) 
and above-standard wages; 
  -- reducing expenditures strictly for defense with a 
simultaneous strengthening through this of the social protection 
of military personnel and their families; 
  -- strengthening control on the part of the federal tax 
service over the receipt of tax collections; 
  -- putting in good order the structure of the administrative 
staff and reducing its size; 
  -- reducing the expenditures for and increasing the revenues 
from foreign economic activities. 
  3. Over the course of 1993, a mechanism should be 
established 
for funding the budget deficit, which provides for stopping the 
direct extension of credit to the government by the Central Bank 
and carrying out borrowing by means of the issuing of state debt 
notes. In order to do this, it is necessary: 
  -- to approve the state's unconditional fulfillment of its 
obligations to creditors and investors, regardless of their 
legal status; 
  -- to raise the level of the interest rates for state bonds 
already issued, taking into account the rate of inflation and 
the interest rates' market level or to adopt measures for 
converting these bonds into re-issued debt notes (first quarter); 
  -- to begin issuing treasury bills and other new borrowing 
instruments, floated on an auction basis or on market terms; 
  -- to exempt the holders of state securities from all taxes 
on them; 
  -- to propose that the Central Bank adopt measures for 
encouraging commercial banks to invest in state securities. In 
particular, to grant credits to commercial banks primarily 
secured by state securities. 
  4. The anti-inflation orientation of the monetary policy 
should be strengthened, with a view toward lowering the rate of 
inflation by year's end to 5 percent per month. In order to 
achieve this goal, it is necessary: 
  -- to tighten up control over the increase in the money 
supply, determining quarterly its special-purpose guidelines and 
adjusting the monetary policy as need be; 
  -- to intensify the supervision of commercial banks' credit 
transactions and their observance of the established economic 
standards; 
  -- to change in 1993 to the regulation of the banking 
system's liquidity using the interest rates, reserve 
requirements and transactions in the state securities market; 
  -- to recommend raising, first and foremost, the level of 
interest rates for deposits in the Savings Bank by a factor of 
approximately 2 as compensation for the public's losses from 
inflation and as an incentive for saving; 
  -- to limit by strict guidelines financial assistance to 
enterprises on the part of the Central Bank, not permitting the 
automatic extension of credit to them for the purposes of 
regulating mutual settlements and replenishing working capital; 
  -- to consider during the determination of taxable profits 
the funds in currency accounts based on the Central Bank's 
current exchange rate in order to stimulate the accumulation in 
settlement accounts of enterprise funds in the national currency; 
  -- to propose that the Central Bank submit detailed 
information about its policy and transactions to the government 
once every 2 weeks. 
  5. The Russian economy should be protected from a massive 
influx of cash funds from the USSR's former union republics, 
which would have a destabilizing effect on the monetary 
turnover. In order to protect the Russian national currency, it 
is necessary: 
  -- to recognize officially as legal tender in Russia cash 
rubles issued by the RF Central Bank in the form of bank notes 
and coins, as well as ruble funds in accounts in Russian 
commercial banks and other credit institutions; 
  -- to conclude agreements with the CIS countries on payments 
and on the regulation of mutual requirements and obligations; 
  -- to stop the acceptance of payments from the ruble 
accounts 
of foreign commercial banks until bilateral or multilateral 
agreements on the procedure for settlements for mutual trade 
with the former union republics are concluded; 
  -- to determine a mechanism for the mutual exchange of 
Russian rubles and ruble funds in accounts in foreign banks; 
  -- to complete over the course of 1993 the reorganization of 
the system of relations within the framework of the ruble zone, 
proceeding on the basis of the goal of protecting the Russian 
ruble's stability; 
  -- to recognize officially the fact of the separation of the 
non-cash monetary turnover of the USSR's former republics and to 
propose to all the independent states refusing to use Russian 
rubles on their territory that they also begin their replacement 
in the cash monetary turnover; 
  -- to form institutes and legal regulations for the 
functioning of a market for the national currencies of the 
states which are former USSR republics; 
  -- to begin officially quoting the national currencies 
(including national rubles) with respect to the ruble -- the RF 
currency; 
  -- to begin the accumulation of reserves of currency 
(rubles) 
of the CIS countries as foreign currency; 
  -- to stop the RF Central Bank from granting credits to CIS 
states without special decisions of the Governmental Commission 
on Credit Policy Matters, which stipulate the providing of 
security for the repayment of credits on the part of the 
borrowing states (property and other assets); 
  -- to carry out work on converting technical credits into 
state debts of the corresponding countries with subsequent 
conversion into property. 
<H8>  II. Overcoming the National Economic Disproportions and the </H8>
Inefficient Production Structure 
  The most important task is the mobilization of finances and 
their efficient use for the economy's structural reorganization. 
In order to do this, it is necessary: 
  To encourage the public to save by: 
  -- setting interest rates for savings deposits with 
consideration of the inflation rate and the market rates for 
bank credits (January of 1993); 
  -- the Savings Bank's introduction of new methods for saving 
with favorable conditions for depositors with consideration of 
international banking practice (February-March of 1993); 
  -- the establishment of a system of state insurance for the 
people's deposits (April); 
  To carry out the mobilization of financial resources, 
without 
resorting to the indexing of working capital, in order to extend 
credits to the economy by: 
  -- expanding the network of banking institutions and 
providing an incentive for the enhancement of the quality of 
their operation (over the course of 1993); 
  -- adopting additional measures for the development of the 
interbank money market and the capital market (over the course 
of 1993). 
  To adopt measures for improving the enterprises' financial 
condition and for combating non-payments which require that: 
  -- the Central Bank, jointly with the Ministry of Finance 
and 
Goskomimushchestvo [State Committee for State Property 
Management], prepare specific proposals for improving the 
settlement system and for regulating the enterprises' mutual 
obligations (by 5 February); 
  -- appeals be made to international organizations for 
technical assistance in the areas of settlement systems and 
enterprise reorganization; 
  -- assistance be given using centralized resources to a 
limited number of unprofitable enterprises for their clean-up 
and reorganization, with strict control over the special-purpose 
use of credits and a number of the enterprises' financial 
indicators (including wages) and a review of production 
efficiency; 
  -- the system for distributing budget allocations for the 
preferential extension of credit to sectors be put in good order 
(including accelerating the introduction of futures contracts in 
plant growing and replacing the mechanism for extending 
preferential credits for early shipping of products to the Far 
North with specific support for the needy layers and enterprises 
of these regions' life-support system); 
  -- in the event that an enterprise is insolvent, its 
currency 
funds in bank accounts be used to cover its obligations; 
  -- a procedure be tried out in the first half of the year 
for 
the reorganization, clean-up and stopping of the activities of 
enterprises (based on the example of 2-3 hopeless bankruptcies), 
including replacing the management, appointing emergency 
managers, imposing strict economic planning conditions, selling 
off unneeded reserves, searching for new spheres of activities 
and other items; 
  -- the work on converting the enterprises' debts into 
securities be continued; 
  -- urgent measures for the realization of the bill turnover 
and the registration of the enterprises' mutual obligations as 
bills of exchange which can be taken into account in the market 
be adopted; 
  -- the work on the introduction of changes to the Law on 
Enterprises and Entrepreneurial Activities, with a view toward 
strengthening control over state enterprises, be accelerated; 
  -- and the matter of the possibility of using the state 
enterprises' property as security for their debts, with its 
subsequent sale, be decided quickly. 
  Ensuring the rational spending of budget funds is not the 
goal of the economy's structural reorganization, for which it is 
necessary to shift from the financing of individual enterprises 
to the funding of state programs and strictly limiting the use 
of budget funds for purchasing imported machine-building 
products. 
<H8>  III. Increasing the Efficiency of Foreign Economic Relations </H8>
and Strengthening the Country's Currency Position 
  The following measures are being proposed in this area: 
  1. The improvement of state regulation of foreign trade 
along 
such directions as: 
  -- unifying foreign trade conditions and stopping the 
granting of new benefits and abolishing unfounded benefits for 
regions, sectors and individual enterprises; 
  -- accelerating the development of the customs service and 
imposing as quickly as possible customs control at the borders 
with the former union republics; 
  -- gradually replacing the setting of quotas for exporting 
energy resources and raw materials with competitive selling of 
quotas and then with an export tax in order to weaken the 
incentives for exporting and to replenish state budget revenues; 
  -- extending the value-added tax and excise taxes to 
imported 
goods in order to create equal conditions for competition in the 
domestic market and to increase budget receipts; 
  -- gradually reducing centralized exporting and importing 
and 
establishing a competitive mechanism for the distribution of 
orders for deliveries of goods for state needs for exporting 
purposes; 
  -- establishing specialized financing of exporting and 
guaranteeing export credits in order to stimulate the exporting 
of technical assistance, domestic equipment and other finished 
products (including establishing an Export-Import Bank); 
  -- completing the formation of trading conditions with 
states 
of the far and near abroad; 
  -- tightening up control over exporting and currency 
earnings 
and extending the procedures for the registration of exporters 
of strategically important raw material goods and other forms of 
export and currency control to the exporting of goods to the 
countries of the near abroad; 
  -- drawing up a federal program for developing the 
infrastructure of Russia's foreign economic relations. 
  2. The stimulation of the process for the formation of a 
national currency market as a means for the efficient 
distribution of currency resources by: 
  -- substantially expanding the circle of participants in the 
official currency market by granting licenses for conducting 
transactions in a foreign currency to private exchange offices; 
  -- developing an interbank currency market, including a 
forward market; 
  -- providing non-residents with access to the currency 
market 
in order to increase the supply of foreign currency; 
  -- removing the restrictions on ruble accounts for 
non-residents; 
  -- stimulating competition among currency market 
participants 
in order to eliminate its fragmentation and to form a unified 
currency exchange rate level throughout the entire country; 
  -- eliminating the barriers between the cash and non-cash 
foreign currency markets. 
  3. The providing of more complete mobilization of currency 
resources within the country by: 
  -- preserving the state monopoly on transactions involving 
precious metals and stones; 
  -- eliminating the restrictions on private persons opening 
bank deposits in a foreign currency and using the funds in 
currency accounts for payments, transfers and exporting abroad; 
  -- granting state guarantees to private depositors, which 
protect them from confiscation, blocking and compulsory 
exchanging of currency funds for rubles; 
  -- raising the interest rates for currency deposits to at 
least the level of the corresponding rates of the international 
money market; 
  -- limiting foreign banks' access to the domestic market (a 
high cost for licenses, a high minimum capital, a requirement 
for the reinvestment of mobilized currency resources in Russia 
and other items); 
  -- expanding the opportunities for investing currency funds 
within the country by offering new types of accounts, securities 
and other financial instruments. 
  4. The strengthening of currency control by: 
  -- declaring an amnesty for enterprises and organizations in 
the event of their repatriation within a 3-month time frame of 
export earnings illegally left abroad or foreign currency 
illegally transferred abroad from Russia, while simultaneously 
tightening up penalties for persistent violators right up to 
total confiscation of currency funds and severe criminal 
punishment of the executives; 
  -- gradually easing restrictions on current currency 
transactions for residents (natural and legal persons of 
Russia), while simultaneously strengthening control over the 
movement of capital in order to prevent the illegal exporting of 
capital abroad; 
  -- expanding cooperation with the law-enforcement agencies 
and currency control organs of foreign states in order to 
identify capital illegally exported from Russia and to prosecute 
violators in court; 
  -- providing materials, financial resources, equipment and 
personnel to the Currency and Export Control Inspectorate by 
making the corresponding subdivisions of a number of departments 
operationally subordinate to it; 
  -- publicizing in the mass media the results of the measures 
carried out in this area. 
  5. On the basis of the exchange ratios actually arising in 
the domestic currency market, the application of a single ruble 
exchange rate to foreign currencies for all international 
transactions as a uniform criterion of the efficiency of foreign 
economic activities. In order to use the currency exchange rate 
efficiently as an instrument for regulating foreign economic 
activities, it is necessary to: 
  -- shift from covert to overt (when need be) subsidizing of 
consumers of imported goods, subsequently reducing these 
subsidies; 
  -- pursue firmly the policy for stabilizing and 
strengthening 
the ruble's currency exchange rate using economic policy 
measures and regular, well-founded Central Bank interventions in 
the domestic currency market; 
  -- use foreign loans actively to stabilize the ruble and 
start negotiations with the IMF about the early release of the 
$6 billion in funds intended for this purpose; 
  -- adopt measures for combating the "dollarization" of the 
economy, in particular, ensuring the unconditional acceptance of 
the Russian national currency as the only legal tender in all 
retail trade enterprises, restaurants, hotels and other 
establishments, with the conversion, when need be, of the prices 
for foreign goods and services into rubles at a single currency 
exchange rate; 
  -- extend to residents' currency accounts the conditions 
applicable to ruble accounts in the area of the financial 
obligations of enterprises and institutions (the use of currency 
funds to pay off their indebtedness to the budget and suppliers). 
  6. Concluding agreements with the Paris Club and 
representatives of bank creditors on regulating Russia's foreign 
indebtedness, which provide for reducing the amount of the 
annual payments for servicing the debt to amounts acceptable to 
us. 
  The work on regulating the domestic currency debt should be 
accelerated. 
  7. A sharp reduction in direct and covert aid to foreign 
states in the following directions: 
  -- stopping the granting of any new credits to developing 
countries which are not honoring their own debt obligations to 
Russia or are not capable of paying back foreign loans on time; 
  -- establishing firm control on the part of the Governmental 
Commission on Credit Policy Matters over the extension of credit 
to former union republics; 
  -- shifting to settlements with all foreign states on the 
basis of world prices. 
  8. Ensuring an influx of financial resources from abroad, 
which are necessary for developing the economy and solving 
social problems. Energetically pursuing the reform policy and 
stabilizing the financial and economic situation in the country 
will make it possible to attract large currency funds from the 
following sources: 
  -- loans from the IMF, the IBRD and other international 
financial organizations; 
  -- financial and export credits from various countries on a 
bilateral basis; 
  -- direct foreign investments; 
  -- free assistance for charitable purposes. 
  The government's policy in this area should ensure: 
  -- the development of a clear-cut strategy for foreign loans 
and investment cooperation; 
  -- the establishment of the legal, institutional, 
organizational and technical prerequisites for the influx of 
foreign capital; 
  -- the efficient use of foreign resources for solving 
national economic and social problems; 
  -- the timely fulfillment of the obligations for servicing 
the foreign debt. 
  (The program was submitted to the government by Deputy Prime 
Minister B.G. Fedorov who prepared it together with a group of 
members of the government with the help of Russian and foreign 
experts.) 
  Source: IZVESTIYA, 27 January 1993. 
<H5>  Russia's Financial Policy After the Referendum </H5>
  Today in Russia, there is still a chance of overcoming 
inflation and ending the year with relative stability. The 
annual inflation rate has decreased from 2500 percent at the 
beginning of January to 1100 percent per year and it is 
necessary to support this trend by every means possible. There 
is no production slump, enterprises are really adjusting to 
market conditions and the pace of privatization is picking up. 
  However, the failure to adopt decisive and comprehensive 
measures will jeopardize, even in the next few weeks, the 
seedlings of stability. Meanwhile, in the referendum, the people 
unambiguously expressed support for the course of the reforms 
begun in 1992 and this obliges us to take steps forward, 
including possibly enlisting the help of the authors of last 
year's reforms. We have no right to betray the voters' hopes and 
to lose the pace. We have already actually lost the first 2 
weeks. 
  The economic successes are a pledge of political stability. 
Stopping the monstrous increase in prices is the only result 
which each and every person in our country will notice. An 
increase in prices when goods are available, rather than the 
percentages of a production slump, determines the actual 
prosperity of actual citizens. There is not a single government 
in the world which, having suffered defeat in the struggle 
against inflation, has been able to remain in power long. On the 
other hand, tough politicians like M. Thatcher, who beat 
inflation, repeatedly win in elections, despite the problems 
with production and unemployment. 
  Our economic reform has been based, first and foremost, on 
common sense, on practical experience and on proven methods and 
forms and not on some theory, including the bankrupt theory of a 
"planned" economy, which has inflicted immeasurable damage. The 
market was not invented by armchair marxists, but rather, by 
life. Great Russia needs to rectify the errors accumulated over 
70 years as quickly as possible and to return to a normal 
economy. 
  The most important near-term tasks of the financial policy 
come down to the following. 
  In order to avoid a budget catastrophe, it is necessary to 
impose a ban until the end of the year on the adoption by all 
branches of power of new decisions which substantially affect 
the budget. It is necessary to de-politicize the economy and to 
declare firmly that "Finances cannot be the hostages of policy." 
However, this requires postponing the fulfillment of a number of 
recently adopted decisions by approximately 2-4 months in order 
to accumulate the needed resources. 
  It is necessary to hold rigidly to the limits on the 
increase 
in centralized credit (30 percent in the second quarter and 20 
percent and 15 percent in the subsequent quarters) and budget 
deficits. It is likely that, for a real struggle against 
inflation, it will be necessary to reduce the announced budget 
expenditures by approximately 40 percent. Special attention must 
be paid to a sharp reduction in import subsidies which 
discriminate against our producers and various kinds of breaks 
and exceptions, on which we are losing trillions without real 
results. 
  Only in this way is it possible to restrain inflation and 
improve state finances. It is no secret that, as inflation 
increases, the budget deficit grows continuously and inflation 
is thereby whipped up. At the same time, inflation is a unique 
tax on enterprises (hence, the shortage of working capital), on 
the people (a lowering of the standard of living) and on the 
entire country (the flight of capital abroad, since it is being 
devalued in rubles). 
  In all of this, a strict monetary policy, the rational use 
of 
credits and the requirement for their repayment and efficient 
use are of colossal importance. The Central Bank of Russia 
should, finally, stand guard over the ruble and protect our 
national interests and this includes stopping the uncontrolled 
subsidizing of the former USSR republics (many billions of 
dollars), struggling to preserve the unity of the monetary 
system within the borders of Russia, adjusting settlements and 
transforming the interest rates into an economic regulator. 
  Unfortunately, in this we are extremely far from solving the 
problems using normal market methods. It is being suggested to 
us that we solve the problem of non-payments, which is 
associated with inflation, the imperfect nature of the 
settlement system and the dependence still of many enterprises, 
by stimulating inflation and infusing new inflationary funds 
into the economy. The question arises: are we to conduct the 
so-called creditings every 6 months? There is a limit to 
everything and you cannot cut the bough on which you are sitting. 
  No matter how strange it is, the struggle against inflation 
assumes a further liberalization of prices. For example, the 
level of subsidization of the coal industry comes to at least R2 
trillion. At the same time, everyone acknowledges the need to 
close dozens of inefficient mines, but nothing is being done. Is 
there any country in the world where the coal subsidy amounts to 
20 percent of the budget revenues? Profitable mines should live 
well, but poor ones need to be closed. The opposite path -- 
subsidizing all of them -- reduces interest in results, ruins 
the budget and intensifies inflation. 
  Moreover, our strange tactic of "restraining" some regulated 
prices over the course of many months and then raising them many 
times over all at once is an additional and even more dangerous 
source of inflation. We first scoff at a sector which is losing 
profitability and then we throw into the economy a chain of 
sharp price rises which creates chaos and does not permit 
enterprises to enter into a normal operating rhythm. Along with 
the popular decisions on pensions and wages, this price policy, 
rather than the "bad" enterprises, gives the country a fever and 
creates "the inflation of costs." This is why, in order to 
regulate prices, it is necesary to introduce a system of monthly 
regulation (for example, gas and transport tariffs) with a delay 
with respect to the inflation index (for example, 0.75 of a unit 
of increase in the price index). 
  Finally, a set of measures for expanding the currency market 
in order to stabilize the currency exchange rate should be among 
the immediate tasks. How much is it possible to talk about the 
need to admit non-residents and to restrict the circulation of 
foreign currency, where is the interbank currency market and 
where is the stimulation of foreign investments? Only by 
increasing the influx of currency into the market, including by 
tightening up the monetary policy and currency control and 
removing the various kinds of customs and tax obstacles is it 
possible to manage to bring the ruble's exchange rate to a more 
realistic level. 
  But fixing it artificially, as is being proposed, would be 
suicide and the end of the reforms. The Russian ruble's exchange 
rate, even if economically poorly grounded, reflects our 
economic mechanism, our regulation and our political situation. 
We will not be ostriches, hiding our heads in the sand instead 
of solving the problems. I believe that all obligatory selling 
of currency, and this needs to be abandoned gradually, should 
proceed through the currency market. It is impossible to accept 
a practice whereby you sell currency today to the Central Bank 
at one exchange rate, but you receive rubles when the exchange 
rate has already changed by 30 or 40 percent. 
  Financial stabilization and a firm ruble are possible and 
there are prerequisites for this. Just after several months 
people would feel this, the ruble's exchange rate would 
stabilize and interest rates would begin to decrease. It is only 
necessary to display the political will. 
  [Signed] B.G. Fedorov, Deputy Prime Minister and Russian 
Minister of Finance; 13 May 1993. 
<H5>  Emission Is Opium for the National Economy (Notes on the </H5>
Obvious) 
  "Emission is opium for the national economy." First USSR 
People's Commissar of Finance G.Ya. Sokolnikov -- one of the 
fathers of the financial stabilization of the twenties -- at one 
time proposed hanging such a sign near the VSNKh [All-Russian 
Soviet for the National Economy]. Today, such a sign would be 
just right in the Central Bank or the Russian Supreme Soviet. 
  There is hardly any need for special proof of the obvious 
truth about the fact that people are alarmed, first and 
foremost, by prices, or more specifically, by the increase in 
them, i.e., inflation. Just the lowering of inflation will be 
felt by one and all. The fetish of production for the sake of 
production and the unreliable figures for the volume of 
production or purchases are not things you can have for supper. 
  What is even stranger is that many forces -- from the 
parliament and PRAVDA's editorial staff to managers and 
academicians -- do not want to or cannot understand this. What 
is being repeated is the situation at the beginning of the NEP 
[New Economic Policy], when the Narkomfin [People's Commissariat 
of Finance] was accused of an "anti emission bias" and of 
destroying industry. During those years, just like today, the 
"Red Economic Managers" were certain that the crisis was not in 
an excess of money, but rather, in its shortage, in the lack of 
working capital and in the inadequate attention toward 
investments. Just like today, there were calls to fight against 
the "dictatorship" of the People's Commissariat of Finance. 
  It must be said that the Bolsheviks had wisdom and the 
country did get stable money which became the basis for an 
economic upturn. Unfortunately, history did not teach anything 
to a great deal of people and financial stabilization is opposed 
to the interests of industry and the people, which is either a 
lie for purely political purposes or a delusion. 
  Let us leave aside the politicians who are ready to destroy 
the state in order to remove a disagreeable government. The 
sincere lack of understanding of the stabilizing financial 
policy is based, first and foremost, on economic ignorance and a 
lack of understanding of the laws of a market economy. 
  For example, Let us take the thesis: We will issue more 
money 
and we will help everyone (science, health care, education and 
the army). A typical delusion. Emission does not give anything 
to anyone -- it takes from those who have something. Given a 
fixed quantity of goods, an increase in the money supply means 
only one thing -- devaluation of the money and an increase in 
prices. In increasing pensions through emission we are taking 
money away from the teachers. In giving something to the 
teachers through this same emission, we will take from the coal 
miners and so on. Emission (inflation) is the worst form of tax 
on enterprises, citizens and the state. Not to understand this 
is criminal. 
  Under the conditions of uncontrolled inflation, there can be 
no normal development of production nor a rise in the standard 
of living. On the contrary, inflation destroys savings, 
investments and long-term credit and gives rise to the flight of 
capital, a technological lag and the sharp stratification of 
society into a handful of superrich and an indigent majority. 
This is precisely why we are coming out so sharply against the 
budget approved by Russia's Supreme Soviet since it is aimed 
directly at the disintegration of our economy and the 
impoverishment of the masses. 
  That same G.Ya. Sokolnikov successfully compared the calls 
for development through emission with the requests of a dying 
person who demands morphine from the doctor in order to lessen 
the pain. By injecting the morphine, it is possible to ease the 
death pangs. But if there is hope for a recovery -- why poison 
the body with a toxin? This would be the gravest of errors. Let 
us continue this comparison -- even a healthy body degenerates 
from the frequent use of narcotics, becoming absolutely hopeless 
at a certain stage. We have already reached this stage. 
  The widespread thesis of our current "Red Economic Managers" 
is that the emission will go for production needs and for 
investments, which will lead to an increase in the supply of 
goods and, finally, it will reduce inflation. They say that 
struggling against inflation is possible only through an 
increase in production. Besides, such delusions have not shown 
up currently. The problem lies in the fact that the money is 
being spent right away, while the production effect is 
frequently achieved after years, if it is at all. 
  Financing investments through emission is a dangerous folly. 
Inasmuch as the inflationary effect occurs almost immediately, 
while the capital investments have a lengthy cycle, then, after 
just a month or two, the money initially issued will not suffice 
and new inflationary infusions will be needed. The larger the 
inflationary investments, the higher the inflation and the lower 
the effectiveness of these investments. 
  Today, every cook and every deputy are trying to give 
instructions on how to pursue the financial policy. Every "Red 
Economic Manager" is trying to discuss monetarism, although he 
understands this subject no better than he does the theory of 
relativity. Let us discard the theories. There was no monetarism 
50 or 100 years ago, but everyone knew how to fight against 
inflation. 
  Almost every day, we hear: of course, the deficit is bad, 
but...; of course, we understand the country's difficult 
financial situation, but.... All the branches of power should 
rise above the important but private matters and concern 
themselves with ensuring the interests of the state as a whole. 
Yet a rise in the economy and in the standard of living always 
begins from the stability of the money, no matter how much the 
populists want to prove the opposite, placing immediate 
political goals above the national economic interests and 
attempting to regulate a market economy using the methods of the 
economic practice of the period of stagnation [the Brezhnev era]. 
  The means for combating inflation are well known and, in 
essence, do not depend on the type of economy. It is simply that 
in a planned economy inflation is manifested in the shortage of 
goods, while it is manifested in the rise in prices in a market 
economy. 
  No one throughout the world has yet devised anything new in 
comparison with lowering a budget deficit by reducing spending, 
increasing revenues (including through taxes) and tightening up 
monetary policy (first of all, by raising interest rates). 
  These simple methods are often extremely painful, but they 
are of basic importance. At the same time, the experience of 
dozens of states shows that the faster financial stabilization 
is carried out, the faster the economy and the people get on 
their feet. We have already been mocking the country for 8 years 
-- instead of obtaining normal money in a year. 
  Under contemporary conditions, calling for lowering taxes, 
for example, by a factor of 2 without reducing spending means 
calling for increasing emission. On the surface, this is a very 
popular slogan but, in actuality, with emission funding of the 
deficit, this would mean the redistribution of the available 
monetary resources from all to a few, which will not save the 
economy and will intensify the social stratification even more. 
All this is not as absurd as it is dangerous. 
  Today, we still have a chance of going forward to a normal 
economy and a normal standard of living. The disease needs to be 
treated rather than neglected. Otherwise, the sick person will 
finally die. 
  [Signed] B.G. Fedorov, Deputy Prime Minister and Russian 
Minister of Finance; 15 September 1993. 
<H5>  The Losers in the Struggle Against Inflation also Lose the </H5>
Elections 
  Elections and an election campaign never promise anything 
good for the economy. This is why the faster they proceed, the 
better. 
  It is very important not to fall routinely into the abyss of 
pre-election populist promises. At the same time, the faster a 
competent parliament emerges, the faster the balance between the 
branches of power will be restored. 
  This year was marked by the fact that the majority of the 
practical people and the theoreticians finally understood that 
the state's economic policy consists by three-fourths of the 
financial and monetary policies. 
  The people have sensed the ruble's importance. Be that as it 
may, 1993 was much more stable than the preceding year. Hardly 
anyone can accuse the government today of changing the rules of 
the game too often. The mutual crediting of the enterprises' 
indebtedness through emission was not permitted, emission 
replenishment of working capital did not occur and technical 
credits and deliveries of cash to CIS countries were stopped. 
  The Central Bank's interest rate, which had remained 
unchanged from May of 1992 through March of 1993, was raised to 
210 percent, i.e., by 100 percent. The rates for deposits in the 
Savings Bank rose sharply. As of 1 October 1993, preferential 
credits were abolished (i.e., subsidies were not put into the 
budget). In July, the system of obligatory selling of currency 
was changed (only through the market). The ruble's exchange rate 
is being stabilized over the course of 4 months (and no one 
simply believed in this any more). 
  The liberalization of prices for coal, oil, grain and bread 
has continued. A system of subsequent indexing of prices for 
certain other monopoly goods and services has been adopted. The 
import subsidies have been done away with for all practical 
purposes, i.e., a unified currency exchange rate is actually 
being used. 
  Credit in the current year is increasing substantially more 
slowly than it did last year. The governmental commission on 
credit policy has started working: during last year's critical 
third quarter, Central Bank credit increased by 185 percent, 
while it did so by only 50 percent this year. 
  Despite all the difficulties, the budget restrictions were 
carried out and, still, we are setting the goal for the budget 
deficit at 10 percent of the GDP. At the same time, for the 
first time, securities have begun to be used to fund the deficit 
(state treasury notes and gold certificates). 
  In 1993, for the first time, Russia felt itself to be a real 
member of the world community -- successful negotiations have 
been held with the "Big Seven" and the first IMF and IBRD 
credits have been received ($2.1 billion). 
  However, the most important result, apparently, is the fact 
that the situation has settled down. We have begun to 
understand it much better and the economic policy has gradually 
started to take on an intelligible form. 
  But there were also failures produced by the extreme 
sluggishness. The state machinery, in essence, is operating 
using old methods and, in addition, is constantly being eaten 
away by the irrepressible transfer of the most skilled workers 
into commerce (especially financial, credit, tax and currency 
specialists). Instead of cutting the staff and sharply raising 
wages, we are constantly producing unneeded departments. 
  Under these conditions, it has still not been possible to 
carry out really radical changes, especially in agriculture. As 
a result, we have not been able to reduce subsidies to the 
needed extent and the budget deficit as a whole. The sectorial 
part of the government frequently refuses to think about the 
sources of funds and does not understand the overall 
macroeconomic picture. Reducing subsidies and inefficient 
expenditures as a whole is our next task. 
  The mechanism for extending credit through centralized 
resources has not been changed and, as a result, we have very 
poor repayment of these credits. Many of the sectorial workers 
view the centralized credits in the old way, as a form of free 
financing. The credits should, undoubtedly, be repaid, while 
purely budget expenditures should be in the budget. If we do not 
work out mechanisms for extending credit and financing the 
Agro-Industrial Complex and for supplying the North prior to the 
end of this year, then 1994, in this sense, may prove to be lost. 
  The Central Bank of Russia has still not turned into a real 
central bank and its monetary policy leaves much to be desired. 
There is no flexible interest policy, there is no normal system 
for the refinancing of commercial banks, the many accessible 
levers of the monetary policy are not being used and the needed 
bank oversight is almost non-existent. 
  Despite the numerous promises, real measures for combating 
dollarization were not adopted in 1992. However, the fact that 
the Central Bank of Russia recently adopted after all a decision 
on banning cash settlements in a foreign currency as of 1 
January 1994 is encouraging. In addition to protecting the 
ruble, this measure also has purely political significance. 
Moreover, it will stimulate settlements using credit cards. The 
main thing is that the words did not blow away in the wind as 
has happened before. 
  The problem of the non-payments, although it has become much 
less significant than it was in 1992, still remains extremely 
acute. A decision has been prepared on the compulsory conversion 
through commercial banks of overdue indebtedness into notes with 
specific repayment time frames. This means that bankruptcy 
procedures can be applied to defaulters after the expiration of 
the note's period. 
  1994 will be the year of budget reform, which includes 
the separation of the budgets and the transition to a new 
classification. The separation of the budgets means the 
separation of the income tax and the profits tax, i.e., the 
federal parliament establishes its own taxes, while the 
parliament of a federation entity establishes its own taxes. At 
the same time, the VAT will remain a federal tax based on a 
single rate for deductions for all the territories and will be a 
source for the redistribution and subsidization which are 
inevitable under our conditions. The transition from a 
unitary budget system to a federative budget system will 
occur. 
  This system, naturally, will give freedom of actions to 
"strong" regions which will have real budgets and will stop 
making humiliating trips to Moscow. The "weak" regions will 
receive subsidies at the 1993 level and will be forced gradually 
to learn to live within their means. 
  The new budget system will make it possible for such regions 
in default as Bashkortostan, Tatarstan and Yakutia to find an 
honorable way out of the dead-end situation. A single-channel 
nature for paying taxes is intolerable in a unified state. You 
can refer as much as you want to any documents, but the shift to 
"payments" to the federal budget will mean the end of Russia. 
The fact that Bashkiria and Tataria have already adopted 
measures for regulating the indebtedness to the federal budget 
for 1993 raises hope, although the key questions should be 
decided in the 1994 budget. 
  The ruble zone remains a colossal problem. There are no 
opponents of economic and currency integration. Everyone is for 
establishingt a large "common market" and restoring normal 
commercial exchange between the former union republics. However, 
very few people understand the complexity of this matter. There 
are quite a few people who are in a hurry to recreate the USSR 
without looking at the economic realities. The largest and most 
imminent danger is the merging of the monetary systems and 
deliveries of cash to other countries without a real merging of 
the economy and without real coordination of economic policy and 
practice. This unprepared merger will be a catastrophe for 
Russia. It is another matter if someone wants to join our 
federation. 
  Foreign aid has never been and is not now a key factor of 
the 
financial policy and of the reforms in Russia as a whole. At the 
same time, in the form of new credits, investments and debt 
deferments, it can promote the acceleration of movement forward 
and an easing of the transition period's negative consequences. 
It is necessary, as quickly as possible, to abandon the 
commodity and investment credits which the governments of the 
Union and Russia took on an enormous scale -- this is a matter 
for enterprises and companies. Centralized importing 
should die off completely. 
  The state's role is purely financial credits for 
replenishing 
currency reserves and solving the foreign debt problem. 1993 was 
marked by the development of the negotiating process with the 
Paris and London clubs, but without everything being put in 
order at home. As a result, irresponsible declarations appeared 
about the desirability of writing off the debts, i.e, actually 
acknowledging Russia's status as a helpless "third world" state. 
It is impossible to agree with this, all the more so since 
abandoning debt payments is equivalent to stopping new credits 
and investments. 
  We need a firm political will in order to keep the budget 
deficit within reasonable limits (R4.6 trillion in the fourth 
quarter), to continue the harsh limiting of credit and to 
achieve a rate of decline in the ruble's exchange rate by an 
approximate factor of 2 below the rate of inflation. Currently, 
there is still a real chance of achieving financial 
stabilization and lowering inflation by December to 15 percent 
per month and to 10 percent by February of next year. Only these 
achievements will demonstrate the correctness of the course. 
  The losers in the struggle against inflation also lose the 
elections. 
  [Signed] Boris Fedorov, Russian Minister of Finance. 
  Source: IZVESTIYA, 16 October 1993. 
<H5>  A "Financial Constitution" for Russia </H5>
  On days when everyone is discussing the upcoming elections 
and the referendum on the constitution, it is not out of place 
to recall also the basic provisions of the financial policy, 
which, strictly speaking, are somewhat more important than a 
discussion about the participation or the non-participation of 
ministers in the parliament (although, in my opinion, legitimate 
ministers will not impede either the government or the 
parliament). 
  We are talking about the compilation of the simplest 
principles and provisions, which can arbitrarily be called a 
"financial constitution." All these principles have undergone 
the test of time and practice in dozens of countries in the 
world and it would be useful to us in Russia to use this age-old 
wisdom. Without this, we will never achieve real financial 
stabilization and simple order in the economy. 
  The First Principle. The Central Bank is independent of both 
the government and the parliament; its main task is supporting 
the national currency's stability and the level of prices. One 
would think that these are obvious things, something already in 
the law. However, we do not yet have a real monetary policy and 
the Central Bank is ready to discuss whatever you want, except 
the struggle against inflation. 
  At the same time, the Central Bank's independence should 
include the principle of the irremovability of its head over the 
course of a fixed term, if he performs his main task as 
indicated above. The Central Bank's head should not receive or 
solicit any kinds of instructions from the government and the 
parliament within the limits of his authority, including by the 
direct telephone which was inherited as a legacy from the USSR 
State Bank. 
  The Second Principle. The government does not have the right 
to obtain credits from the Central Bank and is obliged to cover 
the budget deficit exclusively using loans from non-financial 
institutions and the public in the form of securities and other 
similar instruments. In turn, the Central Bank does not have the 
right to extend credit to non-financial institutions, to grant 
special-purpose or sectorial credit or to purchase securities 
directly from the federal government or a local government. 
  And here everything is obvious -- the size of the deficit 
should be determined by the confidence of the public and 
companies in this government. If they purchase the securities 
there is confidence and, if they do not purchase them, reduce 
the deficit. Covering the deficit using Central Bank "credits" 
(i.e., emissions) means stimulating inflation and the collapse 
of the economy. 
  The Third Principle. Any spending decisions above the 
approved budget can be made only after a preliminary 
investigation of the source or a reduction in other expenditures. 
  In private life, everyone understands that if there is no 
money in your pocket and no one will make you a loan then the 
purchase must be postponed. In public life in our country, 
everyone is very good and spends money which is not there. But 
if money is created out of thin air, given the same amount of 
goods, then, without a doubt, prices increase and those who 
earned money by working, having sold their own product, are 
robbed. This destructive practice is extremely dangerous and 
directly contrary to the national interests. 
  A most trivial thing is needed: before spending or promising 
money, reduce other expenditures, impose a new tax, sell 
something or simply curb your appetite. Only deceiving the 
people is prohibited. 
  The Fourth Principle. The parliament can accept or reject 
budget expenditures submitted by the government, but it does not 
have the right to initiate spending. We already have dozens of 
adopted laws and decisions which are impossible to fulfill 
without destroying the state. 
  It is annoying to hear on television: "The Ministry of 
Finance is not fulfilling the law on support of the northerners 
(grain, military personnel and so on and so forth) and the 
government's other promises." First, the government does not 
adopt the laws. Second, the Ministry of Finance is not a wicked 
uncle who hides money and does not give anything to anyone -- 
there simply is no money. And third, many laws (just like edicts 
and decrees) simply cannot be fulfilled, have not been checked 
and have not been well grounded. 
  The former Supreme Soviet, with enviable persistence, 
attempted to take the place of the executive power and wanted to 
give, distribute and extend credit itself. This is a clear 
violation of the principle of the separation of powers. Yes, the 
government has made and is making a lot of mistakes, but there 
should be only one accountable in the country, so that there 
would be someone to hold responsible. Logic of the type "we will 
promulgate the law and let them try not to fulfill it" is 
intolerable in a civilized state. 
  I suggest to all parties, movements and candidates for seats 
in the State Duma to whom Russia's interests are dear that they 
support the indicated provisions, which have been tested in real 
life, and include them in their own campaign programs. Then we 
will finally see the day when everything embedded in the budget 
will be fulfilled, while the prices in the stores will cease 
going through the roof. 
  [Signed] B.G. Fedorov, Deputy Prime Minister and RF Minister 
of Finance; 9 November 1993. 
<H5>  The Dollar Will Cost R10,000, if We Retreat from the Reforms </H5>
(the New Year's Prediction of Finance Minister Boris Fedorov) 
  The current financial policy is causing a strong reaction 
in the opposition. And this means that a consistent financial 
policy has been implemented. 
  Prices over the past year increased by a factor of 9 (as 
against a factor of 26 in 1992), while the rate of increase in 
prices amounted for the first time to 12 percent in all in 
December. The results could have been better many times over, if 
it had not been for the budget compromises, the promises of new 
allocations, which were not backed by financial sources, the 
artificial overstating of the purchase prices for grain and our 
continuous struggle against the Supreme Soviet, the Central Bank 
and the sectorial lobbies in the government. 
  Lowering inflation means easing the problem of the shortage 
of working capital and the devaluation of savings and 
investments. This is why even the production slump in the past 
year was not as great as the opposition had prophesied. However, 
900-percent inflation is still catastrophically much and it is 
simply ridiculous to talk as if we had too harsh a policy or 
shock therapy. Only incompetent or dishonest people can reason 
so. It is typical that, in all sectors without exception, wages 
in 1993 increased more than inflation did. 
  Back at the beginning of the year, we were criticized for an 
understated and unrealistic ruble exchange rate. But from June 
through year's end, the exchange rate decreased in all from 
R1,100 to R1,250 to the dollar, i.e., in all by 10 percent while 
prices increased by a factor of approximately 4. Our prices are 
fast approaching world prices, which means the end of the era of 
prosperity for low-efficiency industries which lived through the 
enormous price explosion. Now, many do not like the 
strengthening of the ruble, although this is a direct method for 
combating the exporting of our national wealth at a low price. 
  The time has come to ask the many authoritative managers of 
giant enterprises and the generals of agriculture -- but what 
about your labor productivity and why should we support you when 
your goods are going for the world price, but you are paying the 
people kopecks? I consider it a violation of human rights when I 
am forced to buy an item at a price higher than the world price, 
yet it cannot stand up to criticism of any kind. 
  We managed in 1993, over the fierce resistance of the 
Central 
Bank and a number of members of the government, to stem the flow 
of money, subsidies and credits to the CIS countries. 
  In 1993, despite the resistance of the Central Bank and 
various sectorial lobbies, we managed to raise interest rates 
substantially and to reduce the various benefits which always go 
to the least strong and efficient and are driven into the 
ground. What did this produce? First, the savings of the public 
and enterprises are now much better protected from inflation. 
And second, the all-devouring demand for gratuitous credits on 
the part of the Russian economy's "black holes" has been sharply 
restricted. It is no secret that outright plundering of state 
assets is going on behind the fine slogans about supporting one 
sphere or another. 
  I do not know who will be at the rudder of Russian financial 
policy in 1994 -- this is for the president and the prime 
minister to decide, but I think that it is necessary to demand 
from those who lay claim to power absolutely specific steps and 
obligations. I would consider the minimum program for 1994 to be 
the following: 
  -- the people's savings: provide interest rates higher than 
inflation so that savings would actually increase and people 
would be able to accumulate money for long-term purchases. Until 
this is done, there will be no investments and industrial 
upswing. At the same time, it is necessary to pay reasonable 
compensation for savings for the losses from the liberalization 
in January of 1992, but through non-inflationary sources; 
  -- the public's real incomes should increase by at least 20- 
30 percent and the dollar equivalent of the average monthly wage 
should increase from $100 to $250; it is necessary to introduce 
tax regulators which reduce the disparity in incomes between the 
richest people and the poorest people; 
  -- inflation should, in the very near future, be reduced to 
less than 5 percent per month, which is equivalent to 80 percent 
per year. This will mean an opportunity to reduce the interest 
rates' overall level, to stimulate investments and for 
enterprises to plan their own activities; 
  -- to the extent that the budget deficit is reduced to 5 
percent or less of the GDP and it is funded through market 
borrowing, it will be possible to reduce the tax burden on 
commodity producers; 
  -- the ruble's currency exchange rate, given a favorable 
turn 
of events, will not fall in 1994 below R2,000-2,500 to the 
dollar, which will make our exporting more significant, 
facilitate importing and force enterprises to think about 
competitiveness, productivity and quality. At the same time, all 
the remaining restrictions on exporting should be removed 
completely. 
  These are the most basic requirements for the financial 
policy in 1994. Will we have enough courage to accept these 
obligations and to answer then to the people? 
  I have carefully studied the opposition's demands and 
programs and have come to the conclusion that, in the financial 
area, no one is proposing anything basically new, except 
for a sharp increase in spending (social needs, investments 
and so on). I am all for such spending. However, no one is 
saying anything serious with respect to the sources of 
funds for these expenditures. And this means just one thing 
-- a further increase in the budget deficit and, consequently, 
inflation. But inflation, I reiterate for the hundredth time, 
strikes at the pockets of actual people, enterprises and the 
entire state. 
  On the eve of the new year, 1994, I will attempt to give a 
prediction in the event of a change in the exchange rate. A 
change in policy, a repudiation of the more than moderate policy 
pursued by us in 1993 (and correspondingly, a repudiation of the 
people who personified this policy, since a policy is always 
specific people), will mean the "Ukrainization" of our economy: 
  -- a rate of price increases by a factor of 20 over the 
year; 
  -- a dollar exchange rate in the area of R10,000 (the 
exchange rate can be fixed, so that this will be a "black 
market" exchange rate); 
  -- a further lowering of labor productivity; 
  -- a decline in the public's real monetary incomes (in 1993, 
there was an increase of 10 percent) by at least one-third; the 
dollar equivalent of the average wage will drop to $50 per month; 
  -- savings and investments will decrease in real terms; 
  -- the dollarization of the economy will intensify anew; 
  -- some prices will be fixed and an attempt will be made to 
confiscate money, especially currency, in banks; 
  -- a shortage of many types of goods will emerge again, 
stores will become empty and emigration will intensify. 
  I think that, instead of an enormous market around the Kiev 
Station in Moscow, where Ukrainians chasing after rubles, which 
have become a real currency, sell masses of goods, there will be 
a similar market in Kiev and trading there, possibly, will be 
Russians chasing after "karbovantses." I do not exclude the 
possibility that our miners will travel to Kazakhstan to earn a 
living -- currently, there are Ukrainians travelling to Rostov 
for half wages. It may be that our delegation will travel to 
Tashkent to request credits, while Russian enterprises will be 
trying to keep money in "zaychiks" in Belorussian [Belarusian] 
banks. 
  The only possible consolation for our adversaries is a 
production increase of 3-5 percent through an increase in the 
production of tanks and missiles. In truth, I do not think that 
this will bring much joy to Russia's citizens before the new 
year, 1995. 
  I do not believe people who change their views, who pursue 
one policy today and are ready to pursue another tomorrow. I do 
not believe in enterprise managers who have forgotten about 
labor productivity and production efficiency and know only one 
way to solve problems, by requesting money from the president or 
the prime minister. For us, there are only the interests of the 
state and of our citizens and they are demanding the 
establishment of strict financial order in the country and the 
continuation of the reforms, which have only one goal -- the 
improvement of our lives. 
  In the old parliament, at most 10 percent of the people 
supported the reforms and now at least 30 percent of them do. 
This is not too bad for the first time. The only way to stop 
marking time is to accelerate the reforms decisively and to draw 
closer to a normal life worthy of the citizens of a great 
country. Slowing down the reforms is the path to perdition, to 
the prolongation of the troubled times and to the betrayal of 
Russia's national interests. 
  Enough of deceiving and being deceived. Enough of false 
compromises. Enough of keeping in office people who are 
incapable of anything constructive. Enough of trying to cross a 
hedgehog with a snake -- what results, as is well known, is 
barbed wire. The elections have warned us. 
  God forbid that Russia should again swerve from the true 
path. Especially since the most difficult steps have already 
been taken and we have the forces. 
  [Signed] Boris Fedorov, Russian Minister of Finance. 
  Source: IZVESTIYA, 31 December 1993. 
<H5>  Russian Ministry of Finance Press Release on Russia's </H5>
Current Financial Situation (Forecast for the Third Quarter), 24 
June 1993 
  1. Analysis of the economic situation makes it possible to 
draw the conclusion that the country's financial situation may 
improve in the next 3 months and the inflation index will 
drop below 15 percent per month. 
  2. The Central Bank of Russia's interest rate by the middle 
of July should rise to approximately 150-160 percent, 
approaching the market rates. It is predicted that there will be 
an increase in the ruble's attractiveness and an 
intensification of the demand for them, as well as a tightening 
up of the policy of the government and the Central Bank with 
respect to trade and the offering of services for foreign 
currency (dollarization). 
  3. The ruble-to-dollar exchange rate has entered a stage of 
relative stability and will probably remain at a level of 
around R1,100 to $1. The arrival of large sums of 
currency in the market is expected prior to year's end, which 
will make it possible for the exchange rate to draw somewhat 
closer to the purchasing power parity. Up to $14 billion have 
been accumulated in accounts of banks in Russia and there is a 
trend toward a decrease in the flight of capital. 
  4. The credit commission has adopted a decision to fix the 
net increase in centralized credit in the third quarter at the 
level of R4 trillion, i.e., in relative terms, to maintain it at 
the second quarter's level. The second quarter's limits 
have been fulfilled both for the budget deficit allotment 
and for the remaining types of credits and credit increased 
slower than inflation by a factor of almost 2. 
  5. The plans are for the budget deficit to be kept at 
the level of 10 percent of the GDP with a gradual increase 
in issuing securities in order to fund it. In connection with 
the presidential edict on certain measures for combating 
inflation, it is anticipated that the budget will be strict but 
realistic, i.e, it will be executed much better than in the 
first half of the year. 
  6. Better execution of the budget, the limiting of 
inflation, 
the possible reduction in the amount of the obligatory selling 
of currency and the abolition of the quota system for a number 
of export items will halt somewhat the increase in 
non-payments. 
  At the same time, it is recommended that enterprises reduce 
as much as possible deliveries in the event of a risk of 
non-payment, use the capabilities of the law on bankruptcy, hire 
debt-collection firms, change the servicing banks, sell unneeded 
reserves and assets, determine the optimum size of the work 
force, and look for a more profitable line of goods, as well as 
investors and partners and ways to enter the foreign market. 
<H5>  Russian Ministry of Finance Press Release on the Status of </H5>
Russia's Budget, 29 June 1993 
  1. The Russian Government has submitted to the Russian 
Supreme Soviet a draft of the federal budget refinement. The 
stable financing of the economy and the payment of wages, grants 
and other social expenditures depend on the budget's rapid 
revision by the Russian Supreme Soviet. 
  2. The delay in submitting the budget has been caused by the 
large number of new decisions on expenditures, which have been 
adopted since the beginning of the year and which have actually 
ruined the previously adopted budget, since the previously 
unforeseen expenditures exceed R10 trillion. In addition, it has 
been necessary to index the majority of the expenditures, taking 
inflation into account, which increased the budget deficit even 
more. 
  3. The concept of a refined budget is extremely simple: a 
deficit funded through inflationary Central Bank credits should 
not exceed 10 percent of the GDP or R12 trillion, which will 
make it possible to continue the anti-inflation policy. 
Exceeding this sum, which has been determined as the maximum 
permissible amount, will mean a financial catastrophe and a 
subsequent burst of uncontrolled inflation. In this instance, 
the Russian Supreme Soviet is taking upon itself the 
responsibility for the intensification of the economic crisis. 
  4. Various measures have been undertaken in order to reduce 
the deficit, including a reduction in certain types of unfounded 
subsidies, including for importing, an increase in the excise 
taxes on energy resources, the introduction of special budget 
funds for the specific support of agriculture and the coal 
industry and a tightening up of the expenditures for the 
majority of budget items, including administrative and staff 
items. Temporarily suspending the enforcement of individual 
articles of RF laws which provide for new additional benefits 
estimated in trillions of rubles is also being proposed. 
  5. The proposed budget will be sufficiently tight, with sums 
smaller than everyone would like, but at least it will be 
realistic, i.e., it will be fulfilled 100 percent. Otherwise, we 
will again find ourselves in a situation of chronic underfunding 
of literally all the budget's items. 
  6. Signs of financial stability have been noted in the 
country and it is extremely important not to destroy them with 
ill-considered populist measures. 
  The Russian Ministry of Finance is appealing: 
  to all people's deputies with a request that they accelerate 
the budget review and make it possible to finance the economy in 
a normal fashion, at least in the third quarter; 
  to all workers and enterprises which are currently dependent 
on the budget and suffering from its collapse to display 
self-control and to await the adoption of a sensible decision by 
the Russian Supreme Soviet. 
<H5>  Declaration of the Russian Ministry of Finance on the </H5>
Central Bank of Russia's Decision on the Exchanging of Treasury 
Notes and USSR State Bank Notes Issued from 1961 through 1991 
and Bank of Russia Series 1992 Notes, 26 July 1993 
  The Russian Ministry of Finance declares its disagreement 
with the Central Bank of Russia's decision on the compulsory 
exchanging of old-series banknotes. The RF Ministry of Finance 
declares that it did not participate in preparing this decision 
and considers it politically and economically harmful. It looks 
like a planned political action aimed at causing public 
resentment of the president, his government and the policy 
pursued by them. It is no accident that this decision was 
adopted precisely at that moment when the first signs of 
financial stabilization appeared. 
  The RF Central Bank's decision signifies the latest outright 
deception of the public, which had been promised several weeks 
ago a calm, gradual withdrawal of the old notes up to the end of 
1994, and it actually comes down to the confiscation of part of 
the monetary assets of the people and enterprises, since the 
compulsory depositing means the devaluation of the money. This 
is reminiscent of the actions of the USSR State Bank and 
Pavlov's Government in January of 1991 with the well-known 
adverse results. 
  Practice has proven that using such measures to combat 
corrupt elements and criminals is of no use. The victims will 
turn out to be, first and foremost, the people who have 
accumulated money for a large purchase; vacationers; pensioners 
who do not trust banks and keep money in cash; and inhabitants 
of the remote regions of Siberia, the Far North and the Far East. 
  From the standpoint of the struggle against inflation, this 
RF Central Bank decision is not simply senseless, but harmful. 
The undermining of confidence in the state, the sharp decline in 
the ruble's exchange rate, the flight to the dollar and the 
numerous abuses and machinations during the exchange will 
inevitably lead to a weakening of the anti-inflation policy. 
  This exchange will have an extremely negative effect on the 
mutual relations with the countries which are former USSR 
republics and which, to one degree or another, use cash Russian 
rubles. Old-series banknotes are circulating in these countries; 
many of them are not prepared to introduce their own money. The 
exchange has caused chaos in these countries and a worsening of 
attitude toward Russia as an unreliable partner, which is 
already having an adverse effect on the situation of the 
Russian-speaking people living there. At the same time, matters 
regarding the future ruble zone have not been settled, as a 
result of which a new round of inflation in Russia is 
inevitable, inasmuch as the free deliveries of Russian cash 
money to the former USSR republics will continue, despite the 
fact that the non-cash money ceased to be equivalent to Russian 
money back in July of 1992. 
  On the whole, the decision about an immediate exchange of 
old-series banknotes may be categorized as a strike against the 
economic reforms in Russia and as a step which contradicts the 
president's policy and the referendum's results. It should be 
revoked immediately and the executives who prepared it should be 
held accountable. 
  For its part, the RF Ministry of Finance will make every 
effort to continue the policy of financial stability, to lower 
the rate of inflation, to ensure the Russian ruble's stability 
and to establish civilized forms of settlement and credit 
relations with the countries which are former USSR republics. 
<H5>  Russian Ministry of Finance Press Release, 10 August 1993 </H5>
  1. The Russian Ministry of Finance confirms its official 
position of unconditional rejection of the Central Bank's action 
with respect to the money exchange, about which the ministry had 
not been informed and in which it did not participate. In this 
instance, the ministry shares the opinion of the absolute 
majority of Russian citizens, not to mention that of the 
professional economists, financiers and bankers. 
  2. The Russian Ministry of Finance does not possess any 
official documents which confirm the approval by the government 
or even the discussion by the government of this action. All 
decisions of the government on monetary matters should 
absolutely be prepared with the Ministry of Finance's 
participation. According to the ministry's information, a whole 
series of members of the government did not support the Central 
Bank's action, including publicly. 
  3. The past 10 days have fully confirmed the economic 
senselessness and political harmfulness of the Central Bank's 
actions. Therefore, the Ministry of Finance is continuing to 
stand on its position about the necessity of the complete 
abolition of all restrictions on the money exchange as they are 
illegal, in order to restore the public's confidence in the 
state. 
  4. With respect to the Central Bank's delivery of R50 
billion 
in new banknotes to Uzbekistan, the Ministry of Finance has not 
received, despite the official inquiry of 2 August, any 
documents confirming the "sale" of the banknotes. The Central 
Bank has made an attempt to explain this action as a "sale on 
credit" and with clumsy allusions to documents which have no 
bearing on the matter. 
  In particular, the Ministry of Finance declares that there 
has been a direct violation of the intergovernmental agreement 
on state credit of 21 May 1993 and the supplement to it with 
full commodity breakdown of the amount of credit, which was 
approved by the Uzbekistani Cabinet of Ministers on 8 July 1993. 
Deliveries of 1993-series cash monetary notes against this 
credit have not been provided for by the agreement and the 
protocol. 
  Thus, again without an agreement with the government and the 
Ministry of Finance, an action has been undertaken, which is 
directly contrary to the Central Bank's arguments during the 
explanation of the money exchange and which exceeds the Central 
Bank of Russia's authority. 
  [Signed] The Collegium of the Russian Ministry of Finance. 
<H5>  Russian Ministry of Finance Press Release on the Current </H5>
Currency Situation, 10 August 1993 
  1. The Russian ruble's currency exchange rate has remained 
relatively stable now over the course of 2 months. At the same 
time, the increase in the ruble's popularity has forced the 
Central Bank to shift from the guideline of R1,100 to the dollar 
to R1,000 to the dollar plus or minus 5 percent. The disparity 
between the market exchange rate and the parities of the ruble's 
purchasing power is decreasing gradually. 
  2. Rumors are constantly circulating in the market about 
alleged mass Central Bank interventions and about an impending 
drop in the exchange rate and hardly professional forecasts are 
being made. Some publications have been repeating over and over 
for 60 days in a row that "this is it, tomorrow the reverse 
trend will begin." A number of commercial structures which have 
been playing at this have already lost serious money. 
  3. In point of fact, the state's currency reserves over the 
2 
months have increased by several billion dollars and, for the 
first time, every cash ruble in circulation is backed 
approximately 75 percent by hard foreign currency, while the 
entire money supply is backed by almost a third. In Russian 
commercial banks, due to the foreign trade balance, the volume 
of currency deposits is increasing continuously. 
  4. The basis of the coordinated tactics of the Central Bank 
and the Ministry of Finance in recent months is the striving to 
further the exchange rate's stability, without permitting its 
excessive and sharp strengthening, since this would inflict 
damage on exporting. 
  5. Key factors in the ruble's strengthening are the raising 
of the Central Bank's interest rates up to 170 percent, the 
adequately strict monetary and budget policies and the change in 
the mechanism for the obligatory sale of currency. 
  6. The assessment of all the above-presented factors makes 
it 
possible to talk about the possibility of maintaining a 
relatively stable ruble exchange rate up to year's end and not 
just up to September (approximately at the present level). Even 
as of August, this will begin to have a noticeable effect on the 
rate of increase in inflation in the direction if its lowering. 
<H5>  Russian Ministry of Finance Press Release on the Supreme </H5>
Soviet's Adoption of the Draft Law on Refinement of the 
Indicators of the Russian Federation's 1993 Republic Budget, 12 
August 1993 
  On 22 July 1993, the RF Supreme Soviet adopted the draft 
law on refinement of the indicators of the Russian Federation's 
1993 Republic Budget. 
  The proposals submitted by the RF Government on ensuring the 
financial system's stable functioning and aimed at strengthening 
the budget's revenue base and restraining the increase in its 
deficit were completely voted down during the discussion process. 
  The examination of the refined indicators for the 1993 
budget 
in the RF Supreme Soviet showed that the most important 
instrument of state regulation of the economy -- the budget -- 
is being used to an ever greater degree by the parliament for 
political purposes. The deputies' alleged concern for the 
Russian economy was manifested in the form of an increase in 
budget spending in practically all sectors of the national 
economy and the social sphere with a simultaneous reduction in 
revenues, which was motivated by the well-known thesis about the 
necessity of removing the "tax burden." 
  This step has been assessed by the Ministry of Finance as a 
manifestation of political populism in a hypertrophied form, 
which has nothing in common with the economic stabilization 
measures. The implementation of the budget adopted by the 
Supreme Soviet, the deficit of which has actually increased as 
against the original budget submitted by the government by a 
factor of 2-3 and amounted to R26.9 trillion, or 23 percent of 
the GDP, will mean (as world experience and analysis of the 
actual methods for funding the deficit testify) a sharp jump in 
the rate of inflation to 40-50 percent per month. As a 
consequence, there will be an equal increase in prices and 
further stratification of society through a lowering of the 
standard of living of the least protected layers of the populace 
with a simultaneous unfounded enrichment of individual groups of 
entrepreneurs. 
  Thus, the budget adopted by the RF Supreme Soviet runs 
counter to the course of economic and social development and 
cancels out the work done on stabilizing state finances. The 
execution of the adopted budget will lead to a revving up of the 
inflationary spiral, an increase in the state debt, which is 
already so burdensome for the economy and the undermining of 
confidence on the part of international financial and business 
circles which are rendering assistance in the implementation of 
the reforms in Russia. 
  Under these conditions, the RF's financial condition even as 
of October of this year may be assessed as critical, inasmuch as 
the actual funding source for the budget deficit today is only 
the Central Bank's credit emission, which should increase in the 
second half of this year by at least 100 percent, which, 
undoubtedly, is of a purely inflationary nature. 
  The measures being undertaken in conformity with the 
economic 
policy pursued by the Russian Government jointly with the 
Central Bank of Russia to hold the increase in centralized 
credit resources at the level of 30 percent, which make it 
possible to avoid a sharp inflationary pumping of money into the 
economy, as well as to limit the increase in state spending, 
will be in vain in the event that the republic budget's refined 
indicators are approved and there is a failure to adopt at this 
time the measures on introducing a number of revenue sources 
abolished by the RF Supreme Soviet. 
  We consider it necessary to report also on the violation by 
the RF Supreme Soviet during the approval of the republic budget 
of existing legislation with respect to the observance of the 
procedure for adopting the refined indicators of the RF's 
republic budget and on the permitted technical inaccuracies of 
the draft law drawn up by the Supreme Soviet. 
  In connection with what has been presented above, as well as 
with the impossibility of fulfilling the adopted amendment to 
the RF's 1993 Republic Budget because of the catastrophic 
consequences for the country's economy, we consider it necessary 
to return the draft law on the refinement of the indicators of 
the RF's 1993 Republic Budget to the RF Supreme Soviet for a 
second examination at a joint session of the Soviet of the 
Republic and the Soviet of Nationalities of the RF Supreme 
Soviet. 
<H5>  Russian Ministry of Finance Press Release, 26 August 1993 </H5>
  In order to make clearer the Postfactum agency's 
information, published 19-21 August 1993 in a number of 
newspapers (FINANSOVYYE IZVESTIYA [FINANCIAL NEWS], DELOVOY MIR 
[BUSINESS WORLD], MOSKOVSKIYE NOVOSTI [MOSCOW NEWS] and others), 
on the RF Ministry of Finance's incomplete use of RF Central 
Bank credits, the RF Ministry of Finance considers it necessary 
to come forward with the following explanation. 
  By RF Supreme Soviet Decree No 5312-1 (Point 6) of 1 July 
1993 on the Funding of State Expenditures from the Russian 
Federation's Republic Budget in the Third Quarter of 1993, the 
RF Central Bank is permitted to grant credit in 1993's third 
quarter to the Council of Ministers -- the RF Government, the 
manager of which is the RF Ministry of Finance, to cover the 
deficit of the RF's republic budget in the amount of R3.2 
trillion within the limits of the overall amount of credits, 
established for 1993, for the indicated purposes. 
  In accordance with the indicated RF Supreme Soviet decree, 
on 
14 July 1993, an agreement was concluded between the RF Central 
Bank and the RF Ministry of Finance on granting credit to the RF 
Ministry of Finance in 1993's third quarter in the amount of 
R2.6 trillion (against the R3.2 trillion provided for in the 
third quarter of this year). The establishment of the lesser 
amount of credits by the RF Central Bank for the RF Ministry of 
Finance for the third quarter based on the agreement in 
comparison as against the RF Supreme Soviet's limit was caused 
by the joint obligations of the Council of Ministers of the RF 
Government and the RF Central Bank, as fixed in the Declaration 
on the Economic Policy of 22 May 1993. According to the status 
report for 25 August 1993, of the credits in the amount of R2.6 
trillion provided for by the agreement with the RF Central Bank, 
R1.934 trillion have been used. The remaining R666 billion are 
intended for funding of budget deficit in September of this year. 
  As for the RF Ministry of Finance's "saving" of credits 
issued to it by the RF Central Bank for investment and 
conversion programs, in accordance with Agreement No 23 of the 
RF Central Bank and the RF Ministry of Finance of 28 April 1993, 
the Ministry of Finance is transferring funds to the 
correspondent accounts of the appropriate commercial banks after 
these banks have concluded agreements with enterprises which are 
to be the recipients of the credit. According to the status 
report for 25 August 1993, of the R400 billion allocated to the 
RF Ministry of Finance on 28 June 1993 for investment credits, 
R328.8 billion have been transferred to the commercial banks; of 
the R300 billion allocated for conversion credits, 
correspondingly, R148 billion have been transferred. The 
remaining funds intended for the indicated purposes, in the 
respective amounts of R71.2 billion and R152 billion, are being 
held in the corresponding accounts in the RF Central Bank's 
OPERU [operations administration] and will be used to the extent 
that the customer enterprises conclude agreements with the 
commercial banks. 
<H5>  Russian Ministry of Finance Press Release on Russia's </H5>
Financial and Economic Situation, 31 August 1993 
  1. The following factors were the basic causes of 
inflation's acceleration (to 25-30 percent) in August: 
  -- the banknote exchange, which provoked an influx into 
Russia of hundreds of billions of rubles in cash money from the 
CIS countries and the sharply increased demand for durable goods 
in order to use up cash money; 
  -- the increase in prices for energy resources, electricity 
and transport tariffs (an even indexing system has now been 
introduced); 
  -- the seasonal easing of the credit policy in connection 
with gathering in the harvest and the shipments to the country's 
northern regions. 
  2. The ruble-to-dollar exchange rate, despite the gloomy 
predictions of the "experts," in accordance with the Ministry of 
Finance's forecast, was stable and, if the financial 
stabilization policy is continued, it may remain up to the end 
of the year at the level of the beginning of June (R1,100 to the 
dollar, plus or minus 5 percent). 
  3. The Central Bank's monetary policy remained moderately 
harsh, although it is obvious that the centralized refinancing 
rate (170 percent) remains basically favorable when credits are 
granted for a period of 6-12 months. 
  4. The budget is, as before, the most important source of 
inflation, since approximately half of the Central Bank's credit 
emission goes for it. At the same time, in the first 8 months of 
the year, a strict budget policy was pursued and the actual 
deficit (taking into account the foreign sources for covering 
it) amounted to around R7 trillion. If the borrowing from the 
Central Bank is successfully kept at the level of R6.5 trillion 
until the year's end, then it is possible to expect a dying down 
of inflation and relative stability for the ruble's exchange 
rate. 
  5. The Ministry of Finance submitted for discussion at a 
meeting of the Russian Government's Presidium a program of 
measures aimed at financial stabilization. In particular, this 
program includes: 
  -- measures for increasing budget revenues; 
  -- the revocation of spending decisions which are not 
secured 
by revenue sources; 
  -- a reduction in subsidy-type spending; 
  -- strict measures for combating dollarization, right up to 
the closing of the violating enterprises; 
  -- the compulsory conversion of the enterprises' mutual 
indebtedness into notes with period of 3-12 months with 
subsequent application of the bankruptcy procedure to insolvent 
payers. 
  The government's presidium supported this program and 
ordered 
the drafting over the course of a week of drafts of laws and 
decrees for immediate implementation. The adoption of the 
Ministry of Finance's program in the next few days means a 
continuation of the stabilization policy and a lowering of 
inflation. 
  6. The alternatives to the harsh financial policy are the 
Supreme Soviet's destructive budget, a burst of inflation, a 
sharp decline in the ruble's exchange rate and a financial 
catastrophe which will affect one and all. High inflation always 
means the impoverishment of the masses, the disappearance of the 
"middle class," the stopping of investments and the 
impossibility of saving and social and political shocks. The 
daily experience of Russian citizens of recent years has shown 
that any increase in nominal wages and pensions is quickly 
"eaten up" by inflation. 
<H5>  Russian Ministry of Finance Press Release on Russia's </H5>
Current Financial and Economic Situation, 23 September 1993 
  1. In September of this year, no substantial changes 
occurred in Russia's financial and economic policies. The limits 
on the increase in centralized credit were exceeded somewhat, 
however, a concentrated infusion of an inflationary money supply 
into the economy was successfully blocked. 
  2. The Governmental Commission on Credit Policy, at its 
meeting on 23 September, established a limit for the increase in 
centralized credit for funding the budget deficit in the fourth 
quarter in the amount of R4.6 trillion, which means maintaining 
the financial stabilization policy. A shortage of financial 
resources above the planned deficit can be covered through a 
reduction in non-priority spending and a search for new revenue 
sources. 
  The government is issuing decrees almost daily, which are 
part of the package of financial measures proposed by the 
Ministry of Finance at the beginning of September. 
  3. The sharp decline in the ruble's exchange rate on 23 
September was not caused by economic fators, but rather, is 
associated with the political situation in the country and the 
Central Bank of Russia's inability to react rapidly to events 
using the monetary policy's available instruments. For its part, 
the Ministry of Finance will take all the steps necessary to 
ensure the stability of the ruble's exchange rate. 
  The Central Bank of Russia's interest rate has been raised 
to 
180 percent and, by governmental decree, is supposed to be 
brought up to 200 percent. At the same time, as of 1 October, 
there will be a substantial raise in the interest rates for 
Savings Bank deposits, which has been called upon to stabilize 
the situation. 
  The government has sanctioned the issuing of a gold loan for 
1993 in an amount equivalent to 100 metric tons of gold (more 
than R1 trillion), which will also further the "tying together" 
of the commercial banks' liquid assets and a decrease in the 
goverment's inflationary borrowing from the Central Bank of 
Russia. 
  4. The change in the political situation in the country 
means 
that Russia will be living according to the government's budget 
until year's end and will accelerate the carrying out of those 
stabilization measures, the approval of which previously came 
under the jurisdiction of the Supreme Soviet. 
  The government does not intend to engage in populism and, on 
the threshold of the elections, distribute cash funds right and 
left. On the contrary, the stabilization policy, the abandonment 
of mutual creditings and replenishments of working capital and 
the reduction in preferential credit extension has been 
confirmed once again. For the majority of points of the 
financial and economic policies there are no longer any 
contradictions between the Ministry of Finance and the Ministry 
of Economics, which has strengthened the government's unity. 
<H5>  Russian Ministry of Finance Press Release on the Ruble Zone, </H5>
21 October 1993 
  In connection with the recent appearance of numerous 
contradictory reports about the process for the formation of the 
new-type ruble zone, Deputy Prime Minister and Russian Minister 
of Finance B.G. Fedorov has announced the following: 
  The process for the establishment of the new-type ruble zone 
does not provide for the immediate unification of the monetary 
systems right after the signing or ratification of the 
Multilateral Agreement on Practical Measures for the 
Establishment of a New-Type Ruble Zone and the corresponding 
bilateral agreements. This requires the actual convergence of 
the economies, the market institutes and the legislation. 
  The establishment of a ruble zone does not mean one-sided 
advantages for any of the parties, the automatic extension of 
credit, the unrestricted distribution of cash money and so on. 
This is a process which implies the consideration of mutual 
interests and mutual responsibility. It is necesary to go into 
it with open eyes, recognizing all the danger and the complexity 
of merging basically different economies under the conditions of 
the quite complicated situations in all the countries. 
  The signing of the multilateral agreement on the 
establishment of the new-type ruble zone does not preclude the 
introduction of national currencies in the CIS countries. 
Moreover, it is stipulated in the agreement that these countries 
may establish fixed exchange rates for their own currencies with 
respect to the Russian ruble during the transition period, which 
will also be the basis for this ruble zone. 
  Russia respects the decision of a number of states regarding 
the introduction of national currencies and does not intend to 
discriminate against them in economic and credit relations. 
  Introducing national currencies while supporting stable 
exchange rates is the most important condition for the normal 
development of trade and economic integration, since it will 
make it possible to eliminate the existing uncertainty in the 
mechanism for settlements and payments. 
  No one in Russia is coming out against economic and 
political 
integration with the former USSR's republics, in favor of which 
the economic, historical, cultural, geographical and national 
factors testify and, first and foremost, the obvious advantages 
of a large market. However, the persistent striving by 
individual executives of the Central Bank of Russia to 
accelerate this process artificially without consideration of 
Russia's actual interests and capabilities, as well as of the 
degree of readiness of the agreement's participating republics 
for the monetary systems' unification is extremely dangerous and 
unacceptable. 
  Just as stipulated by the multilateral agreement, all 
countries desiring to join the new-type ruble zone have to go 
through a transition period, in the course of which all the 
parties will have to undertake significant efforts for the 
convergence of their economies and the unification of the 
monetary systems. Just as soon as this transition period ends 
and the unification of the key economic variables and mechanisms 
for regulating the market is actually achieved, it will be 
possible to begin working on the complete unification of the 
monetary systems on the basis of the Russian ruble. Today, 
however, we are just at the beginning of this path and the 
rubles in circulation in a number of CIS countries differ 
basically from the Russian ruble, being essentially these 
countries' national currencies. Raising the question of the 
immediate unification of the monetary systems at this stage is 
premature. 
<H5>  Russian Ministry of Finance Press Release, 5 November 1993 </H5>
  The RF Ministry of Finance proposes the inclusion in the RF 
Constitution of the following provisions which may arbitrarily 
be called a "financial constitution." Without this, we will 
never achieve real financial stabilization and simple order in 
the economy. 
  1. The RF Central Bank shall be independent of both the 
government and the State Duma; its main task shall be support of 
the national currency's stability and the level of prices. 
  2. The government shall not have the right to obtain credits 
form the Central Bank and shall be obliged to cover a budget 
deficit exclusively using loans from non-financial institutions 
and the people. 
  3. The Central Bank shall not have the right to extend 
credit 
to non-financial institutions and to grant special-purpose or 
sectorial credits. 
  4. Any spending decisions above the approved budget may be 
adopted only after a preliminary investigation of the source or 
a reduction in other spending. 
  5. The State Duma may adopt or reject budget expenditures 
submitted by the government, but it shall not have the right to 
initiate spending. 
  The RF Ministry of Finance appeals to all parties and 
movements and candidates for State Duma Deputy with a call to 
support the indicated provisions, which have undergone the test 
of practice in dozens of countries, and to include them in their 
own pre-election programs. 
<H5>  Russian Ministry of Finance Press Release on the Work with </H5>
Foreign Credits, 9 November 1993 
  In connection with the issuing of Decree No 1060 of the 
Council of Ministers -- the RF Government of 16 October 1993 on 
the Organization of the Work Associated with Attracting and 
Using Foreign Credits, the RF Ministry of Finance is making the 
following known: 
  1. Drafting a program for foreign loans, submitting it to 
the 
government and holding negotiations on specific credits and 
guarantees which make up the RF's foreign debt, as well as their 
official registration, shall be the prerogatives of the RF 
Ministry of Finance. 
  Any negotiations, agreements and protocols of intent not 
formalized in the appropriate manner by the RF Ministry of 
Finance shall not be legally valid and shall have no bearing on 
Russia's official loans. 
  2. The RF Ministry of Economics, in accordance with the 
decision of the government, shall be responsible for "filling" 
commodity credits and controlling their use. 
  3. The RF's foreign loan strategy in 1994 shall consist of 
the following: 
  -- a reduction right up to the total abandonment of the 
obtaining by the government of commodity and special-purpose 
investment credits; 
  -- an orientation toward the credits of international 
financial organizations for the purposes of the balance of 
payment, reserves and large infrastructure projects; 
  -- the attracting of new credits on behalf of the state 
within limits which take into consideration the necessity of 
repaying the existing indebtedness and the federal budget's 
capabilities; 
  --and flexible regulation of the attracting of credits from 
abroad by private firms and banks. 
  Specific commercial projects and commodity deliveries should 
become exclusively a matter for independent economic entities. 
  4. An explanation of these matters may be obtained in the 
Department of Foreign Credits and the Foreign Debt of the RF 
Ministry of Finance. 

